[Daily Discussion] Sunday, June 24, 2018 -- TITLE
#New post: [\[Daily Discussion\] Monday, June 25, 2018 →](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8tnl16/daily_discussion_monday_june_25_2018/)
Can we get this over with already? This foreplay garbage is annoying.
This is no regular Bart, this is an attempt to put in a bottom by a whale
This is when it goes sideways at $6,200 & we all waste our day expecting something huge to happen at any moment.
Blast from the past

https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/2sleod/daily_discussion_friday_january_16_2015/

This was the lowest point in 2013-2015 bear market. Check it out to see how the sentiment was back then.
Completely missed out on the BGD. Now feeling MASSIVE FOMO.. I am going to regret whatever I choose to do here.

I am not cut out for this :(
Yesterday and today I bought 20% of my long term stack, some alts and some BTC, moved coins to hard wallets with no plan of selling them anytime soon. I plan to add more every 10% drop of BTC and every 15 - 20% drop of alts. I hope thats the right way for longer term investment. The plan and mathematics looks good on paper, but it is completely different when you are in and watching loses, fear starts kicking in and you get all those crazy ideas that everything is going to crash and won't recover ever.


I am still inexperienced at crypto stuff, learning about the tech and TA for the last 6 months, and what I have learned is that you have to stick to your plan and your strategy, turn off your emotions and do other things with your life, but it's easier said then done.


Is there any advice from experienced people, how do you manage to turn off your emotions, are there any other tactics you use in bear market, how are you accumulating except DCA?
See you all in a few years
Never woke up feeling more bullish before.
Well I know this sounds crazy right now but... I'm buying
Is anyone else growing uncomfortable that Bitmain has 42% of the hashing power of btc?  No matter what the price is doing, one company approaching 51% land is no bueno.  And I assume they have some of the cheapest electricity costs so the further down the price goes they will be the last lights on.
Feels so fucking good being on the other side of the liq hunt
The selling needs to pick up. Hit that floor/bottom quickly!!!
The race to the bottom has started officially! 
Part of me wants to short it hard right now. Other part just wants this all over so bad...

This here may be another DCB cycle. Don't remember 10% 1h candle that didn't reverse the trend at least short term.
About to hit weekly bollinger band low. last time we did that was 3 years ago. 
[deleted]
[deleted]
I'm honestly amazed.  I never thought I'd see 5k again
Interesting that some alts seemingly have not bounced as high? 

My LTCBTC and ETHBTC ratio shorts are in even higher profit than last night.

Are we in for more pain? Or is BTC going to rally and leave alts in the dust? 
Speaking as a long term permabull, hopefully we get a dramatic capitulation soon and this bear market turns around faster than last time.  It's a train wreck, car crash, meteorite hit, etc and it's fascinating to watch the market crash like this.  How low will we go?

As someone who stubbornly accumulated through a multi year bear market, 6 months isn't too painful yet.  Pendulum swung to the bull too far, so it has strongly reversed to the bear.  It shall swing back at some point.  This is a herd market like any other. 
https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8t7fc6/daily_discussion_saturday_june_23_2018/e173fu9/

/u/Stokinator deleted his account.

yea, that's at least a small buy signal. It's at least a lagging indicator
I closed my shorts, flipped long at 25% size, I was hoping for 5500, but you know, this market should have been there by now when it hit new lows below 6K. #bitcoin. I also bought some #ETH #DASH #XMR. [timestamp](https://twitter.com/ibankbitcoins/status/1010863733319483392)

[Reasoning from earlier](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8tfcql/daily_discussion_sunday_june_24_2018/e17e3s0/)
I noticed several comments already "I give up. Withdrawing my funds..." and apparently /u/stokinator deleted his profile. You guys like polls, right? You think the capitulation is close? 

**Is this the capitulation?**

https://www.strawpoll.me/15957076

Another week of FUD anyone?

If this is a mini reversal, be prepared for another load of recycled FUD to push us right back down.

Hope not though. 
[deleted]
Bulls from $20k to $5.8k - We're not in a bear market.

Bulls at $5.8k - I think the bottom is in. Bear market is over.
Anndddd new bottom for 2018.
Weren't there a lot of people crying around here in february because they missed the sub-6K buy? Is there anything different between now and then? Price action was just as bad, it was just faster leading up to the feb low. Now is your chance!
[deleted]
Since a lot of money seems to be waiting for a bottom to FOMO back in, doesn't it mean a group of big whales can engineer a bottom wherever they like?
Despair over at r/cryptocurrency. Finally bears are upvoted, bulls are downvoted. Won't be leveraging long but it inspired a small buy, acting contrary to sentiment over there has been good to me recently
BTC price action today shows an important lesson.  THAT is why you never assume the bull divergence is cancelled until the candle closes.  We were way below yesterday's open and now our daily candle is green!  Can't believe we've gone green on the daily.  Incredible.

Things to watch for: MACD bull div (first since ATH) may come on daily- this is stronger than RSI bull div.  Hasn't happened yet, will take another 1-2 days.  https://www.tradingview.com/x/LWfTDTAi/

Other fun stuff: Here is one I've never seen before... A 4 part bull div on the 2 hour: https://www.tradingview.com/x/UvEhtfia/
I just converted 2/3 of my Bitcoin stack to fiat (1/3 cash, 1/3 tether to buy back in later)  because I was simply too exposed financially. And I need some good night sleep.

So, this is very likely the bottom...
So I've been in this for a long time and I'm feeling the pinch right around here. It's very vague but I think it means one of two things:

- a lot of people are acting irrationally right now
- this is usually a good indicator of when to buy or sell

(Shoutout to all my fellow peoples who didn't sell at $15k+ because of greed. I feel your pain. Lessons learned!)
finally the institutional money is flowing in. were all saved ! 
Gox will do civil rehabilitation! - Dumps

I've never seen so much good news lead to nothing but dumps as in this year.  It's really bizarre.
Poloniex Bitcoin Deposits and Withdraws suspended...any idea why? (Haven't seen that before)
At this point, breaking yesterday's high of 6250$ and staying there is pretty crucial.

EDIT: I mean until the end of the day. Not done now.
I think were at the stage where we shake out all remaining weak hands.  Anyone seeing btc below 6k this am and trades on emotion will dump their coins.  Alt coin holders should be especially nervous.  Hopefully we find the real bottom soon after so we can start turning this ship around.
I think we are in it for another pretty serious leg down after the this current daily closes. Sideways with a 100$ price fluctuation give or take 

Trading off similarities from a previous price ranges would have netted you some serious gains. I did so with opening a short from $6700 when I saw the similarities between the 6 and 7k range. 

On the daily I see this:

https://www.tradingview.com/x/9IMl3iim/

Looking to open a short around $5950 with target of $5300-$5500 

Will close and swap long on a SERIOUS bounce. 

Edit: Added 25% of short at 5935. Adding up to 6.1k will bail over 6.2
Goddamn I say goooodddddaaamnnn.

If this is a dead cat bounce, give that cat a freaking olympic medal in high jump
Always funny to see when there's a clear sign of life that we haven't seen in two months at a spot that's a good spot for a short to intermediate trend reversal and people are still looking for a short, it's like the opposite of the previous eight weeks. People were always looking for an excuse to long. Wait for a small retrace and go long lol. Ultimate disbelief
I cant watch Simpsons anymore :(
Think I'll get an opioid perscription if I show my doctor the charts?
The magical X is approaching https://www.tradingview.com/x/88kjyYAF , only 200$ to go.

But I expect a daily chart RSI bounce any minute now,it's like a clockwork if you look at the charts long term. 
5 coin detected

Just watched a special on bitcoin on Bloomberg.  

Seems like most are worried about the "hard cap" on btc at 21mm. 

Can anyone make a good argument around btc being infinitily divisible working in the same way as infinite money printing, just inverted? 

inb4: Yes, I know btc is only divisible down to a satoshi but that theoretically could be rewritten in, like 1000 years, if needed.
Keep some cash to buy all the way down boys, that thing is not going bellow zero, so patience and cojones.
Was a while since we saw this wick pin bar on the 1D https://www.tradingview.com/x/7K0xKCJX

Also aligns well with previous bottoms
Welp ethereum is about back to where it was (checks watch) 13 months ago.

This is fine.
God damnit why didn't I sell in late April?
I expect total market capitalization to drop to 100 - 150 billions. That would be more then enough of a crash with shitcoins dying probably and only valuable projects finding supports. Hope that in that case BTC will find support around 4,5k
This is so damn exciting. i'm down 30&#37; and all i can really do is just watch this in awe.

(I'm not afraid of my money here)

I placed buy orders all the way down to 4k.

This is serious great oppertunity to enter long term.
Bitcoin at 5.8 Limited Edition
I activate my trap card.
Btw, shorts should not get overconfident.  This is a highly manipulated market and could easily be pumped up to $8k, even if we end up at 4k a few months later.  Don't let your guard down and remember anything is possible.
Just bought more. I thank everyone who bought between 7000 and 20000 since last year bull run decided to sell NOW or even below.   
  
Come to papa you cheap coins yo
To be a whale, you gotta think like a whale. Have money ready 
The only good thing about this dump is seeing shit like "EOS" getting destroyed. 
[deleted]
BTC bounced where it did because ETH bounced right off major support on 1d. Makes you wonder.
Serious question, but has anyone considered the possibility that this entire market just slowly dies?

I know people are going to quote decentralised, deflation, security, storage etc.

But we also recently saw most users of Facebook ignore the negative news of what happens with their data... Sometimes people just don't care. A bit like a Segway perhaps, revolutionary, but inconvenience was greater than it's practicality.

So is it not possible crypto has it uses, but it just may not be a multi billion dollar market?

Curious on thoughts.
2 Normies friends of mine that shouldn’t hold BTC yet and have no correlation with each other just told me they sold the BTC they bought in December. They both told me they couldn’t handle the pressure. This is a very bullish for me, the weak hands are experiencing max pain right now.
It just keeps going, I am amazed. Its relentless. 
To keep a rational mind and looking also at some fundamental stats, at current prices mining is still profitable with an energy price below ~13.5 $cents. This means quite a few western countries are now mining at a loss. China is still running at a profit as energy prices are about 0.09 $usd. 

Taking this into account I was expecting at least a bit of a drop in hashrate, but instead the next retarget will see a 23% increase in difficulty. This is a hefty increase, and partially the result of a big shift of hashing power from BCH to BTC. 

https://fork.lol/pow/retarget

Take all of this at face value, but clearly, there's still some confidence in the crypto/mining environment.  
While I still see no reason for the downtrend to stop, the last time ETH had built up this many shorts, we had a week long rally. May takes 1-2 days before it kicks in.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/Nv1pFrRo/
https://www.reddit.com/r/CryptoCurrency/comments/8tixp0/this_market_is_amazing/

I take it back. /r/cryptocurrency is already bullish again. 
"This is boolish"
Gdax status page showing Ethereum network Major outage, why ?
WTF I am watching right now, lol
Thats an interesting 5 minute candle
looks like a short squeeze is in play 
wew lad
Holy fuck it just dropped under the $100b market cap
We are entering “no brainer” territory
Tether is now in the TOP10.
To me, the bitcoin realm has four seasons:

* Summer: Energy, Enthusiasm, Bright (Price surging, breaking ATH, and exceeding all expecations)
* Fall: Days grow shorter, everything cooling down, winter is coming^TM (Price plunges from ATH, doom and gloom, new lows are made, final capitulations of weaker hands)
* Winter: All is lost, long dark nights, hibernation (Price stagnates at 20-25% of ATH, then a final capitulation of some strong hands)
* Spring: Hope, longer days, warmer, investment seeds sprouting (price breaks through the first couple major resistance levels, ATH targets begin to be spoken of yet again)

In my opinion, we will be entering Winter soon, and I personally think it will take at least another 6 months before Spring comes. My plan is to begin a buy and hold plan once we stagnate and to buy bigger chunks when significant resistance levels are broken after this period with stop losses. My final small buy will be when ATH breaks.

This shit is hard to stomach, I must admit. I think it will prove to be another great buying window, however, and one I intend to capitalize on. Bitcoin is doing just fine. Gotta play the cycles, stay educated, and try to help the space in the meantime. 

Cheers.



Jesus christ, finally. I knew my bullish morning feeling wouldn't fail me!
The Bitcoin price can not go lower than the current (6025) price. This is a fact. Rest easy tonight. 

Edit: I guess we are not resting easy tonight.
This sub was screaming 3K BTC yesterday. Now we have a BGD created solely by a market maker and everyone suddenly thinks that we've bottomed out?
It's always darkest before the dawn....

As someone that has been making my living doing this these past 5 years trading BTC/USD exclusively that looked awfully like a mid-term bottom. We are going to push up from here, maybe visit 6100 before doing so but will defo be testing 6700 within the coming days.

And to those that are saying it was a singular whale... I call BS. I watched that push down from 5800 on multiple exchanges, was pretty obvious that the move was rejected, people got very ancy and people started buying up causing everyone to freak out that was short. Everyone always gets itchy trigger fingers around such substantial prices.... Doesn't take much to cause extreme moves when the stakes are so high around vital price points.

ps on a working 'holiday' in Bali, if anyone is here hit me up, lets grab a drink or three.
Fuck me just closed a long from 6100, that was $12k in the hole at the bottom, in profit at 6220 and I think my heart is on its last few beats. Was literally hovering over the sell button at 5790.
This hurts really really bad but I bought more anyways... Fuck it. Go hard or go home !!!!!
Looks like it’s about ready to shit the bed 
Oh no is this the death of the wyckoff distribution meme
15 on the fear index usually there’s some upside action at this level

 [fear greed index](https://alternative.me/crypto/fear-and-greed-index/) 
Now we wait for the 5.9k retest. 
Sorry, I've been away for the whole day. Have we decided if this was a reversal or just a technical bounce? Skimmed through some comments, but seems like we are all still confused, lol. Personally, I might wait a bit for a confirmation or a trend to develop.
Opened my third short in 2 weeks at the peak of that last bear flag @$6120. I'm setting my target to $5.6k and if it looks like it'll capitulate further then I'll adjust as needed.
I aint gonna lie, up until about mid of June i knew roughly what was going on and was quite comfortable. Now I'm slowly starting to wonder how low we might go. Take that as you will. I aint selling though, ive put a good ammount of money into this but im more than prepared to see it go to zero.

That being said, this last half hour or so hasnt been too bad. nice long lower wick and a tiny bit of volume behind the back pump. Obviously, on the big picture we still have a long way to go but i think (or hope, not sure at this point tbh) that bulls might be slowly coming back

side note: shorts are starting to drop... one more flush down to bring back the greedy bears and then squeeze them? i honestly have no clue at this point. still gambling but with decent risk managment lol.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/38etOboO/

edit: went for a shit around 5800 and came back to 6200. what the fuck is going last few days, safe to say the volatility is temporarily back
setting my stop loss at $6090 just in case this decides to head back down
I noticed that major support between $5500 and $6000 got pulled.

Although there is still that buy wall of 2,000 BTC at $6,000, although my guess that one is fake so people start panic selling once $6,000 goes down a second time 
I feel like a winner scooping up some discount btc and ltc. See ya one year from now and we'll see how this goes.
Since my last entry has made me a bag holder (~7500) i'm looking at todays prices and seeing 18% off

DCAing on a potential bottom seems like a play I can get behind
Looks like a bull flag more than a bart.
Anyone seeing this falling wedge?

https://www.tradingview.com/x/8jau1X8d/
Well my long from last night was very short lived. We have bullish divs forming on lower time frames now adding to the higher ones.
But I'm staying out until I get a better entry, not comfortable longing this market currently.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/Fww1xOBd/

If we get to 5.5K that might be the better entry for a long. Above 6K might be a good entry for another short, depends how, if, this bounces.

!long xbtusd close 6040


Hasn't bitcoin been reliably predictable these past two months? Daily drops average 4% on a pretty even 1:1 slope. There hasn't even been resistance anywhere along the way. (Sorry, trading sideways for 3 hours doesnt count as resistance in a 24/7 market)

Are there any bulls left here? How could you possibly see anything changing this pattern?

Also on current track btc is set to hit under 5k before July even ends.
Bitmex swaps funding rate will continue being extremely high for shorts at -0.2007% in the next funding cycle (so I'm paying 2% every 8 hours on my 10x short), but then turns positive to +0.0024% in 15 hours. Their algorithm basically tells you where the traders are moving and it looks like a lot are moving towards long positions hoping that 5.8K is the bottom.
[Eth and other alts are in a falling wedge](https://prnt.sc/jyvpjg). Another counter-trend rally could be on the cards soon if we can paint some sort of bottoming action on the charts. The "weak hands" who sold here are likely to fomo back above $7k, then panic again as every long gets stopped out and we start making newer lows.

The bulls new narrative would be that 5.75k was the wyckoff spring.

Complete and total if-scenario speculation
Too much hope

Still short
Never-ending Barts. Reverse Barts. Inverse Barts. Bart Barts. 
It seems we have reached the phase where most have given up buying except for those who have taken profit near the high and are now reinvesting. Even for the later group they seem mostly waiting for 5k. If it doesn't capitulate in the coming week, I'd feel slightly bullish as it shows there is still enough buying despite the despair.
Find the post
https://twitter.com/xDatNgo/status/1010814198966697984
If 5800 falls, this is utter disaster. Bitcoin is 10 years old, it shouldn't behave like a shitcoin at this point in time.
At this point and at these losses, I no longer care if it goes to 0. see you guys if it ever gets back to $10k. Going to travel around the world a bit. Have 20-30 countries in mind.
Excellent short entry 
Looks to be setting up for another push downwards. Holding my short and contemplating adding more soon
5.4 may be the next horizontal support (double bottomed there in Oct/Nov 2017)
ppl dont trade against the trend, that's like number one rule of trading
Houston, we have a bounce. Wonder how long it will last? 
What's the opposite of Bloody Sunday?

Edit: I'm gonna go with Bouncy Sunday for now
I still don't believe the alts have seen enough pain. Tron is still worth 2 billion. Verge is worth 300m. DENTACOIN is worth 110m. Seriously these valuations are still absolutely absurd, and until I see them return to normal I still can't feel that good about anything more than a mild DCA. I've converted about 1% of my standby fiat to crypto on this most recent drop and will look to add a similar amount next week if we hold steady or continue dropping.
I see so many posts talking about bottoms. Everyone wants to catch "the bottom". It could instigate more counter-trend rallies, as everyone goes long thinking "the bottom is in." Then, the rallies run out of steam and bears have tons of ammo to trigger lots of stop-loss out of longs. We've seen this a few times already.

This will happen for as long as everyone tries to call bottoms in a bear market and everyone wants to catch "the bottom." In 2014, we gave up calling bottoms and just thought Bitcoin was a bottomless pit and everyone just threw all their money away. That's when the true bottom hits - when you run out of longs to rekt, public has sold and moved on, and bears either can't or don't want to risk trying to take it even more lower.

**TLDR:** Confusius say, he who pick bottom get stinky finger.
I am not gonna lie, this price action is not what I expect after price dropped to new low, usually at least in any previous crash, we experience market orders absolutely crushing the orderbook. This price action feels either a slow grind down or sellers slightly exhausted in the short term especially since its Saturday night over here. Kind of a strange price movement. 

Take it with a grain of salt, I have been known as the "1/IBB indicator"^TM.
[removed]
Surprisingly no real capitulation down, felt like there would be a lot of stop losses being triggered below 6k. Seems like it will be one of those slow declines. 
And again in weekends down.  Same as last weekends.
is 6k the new resistance now?
5k8 broke on Binance. is the support at 5k7?
Hey folks, what is the short long ratio atm? 

Whenever I see a link to the BFX data it never works in my browser.
Someone please tell me what the green tick column in the positionbot page is for!

Curiosity got the better of me and I clicked it... Nothing happened.

EDIT: I cannot verify that nothing actually happened...

EDIT2: u/justanotherlogin?
This was were you x25 leveraged the wicks on BTC futures. 


Didn't get filled for x25 times though which sucks

Edit: Buying myself a lambo


Sorry mods but 

#WHAT THE FUCK JUST HAPPENED TO BITMEX SWAPS ? :D
the push to 5755 was just to liquidate some high leverage longs before they pump it back up.

we all know what happens next 
What a beautiful bounce.
Banger
Now that's a bounce...
this looks like a squeeze but [shorts](https://www.tradingview.com/chart/wEQZhPtI/) don't seem to be closing on bitfinex.  am I missing something?
Since I'd got stopped out of my previous short yesterday (in profit) I've been undecided on which direction to get back in. Kinda wanted to go long but have had real bad luck going against the trend so I reshorted the bounce (at $6232) with a stop just above $6300 in case this is just a DCB. If that gets hit I may open a long from there expecting it to go to at least $6500 if this keeps going up
I've lost a lot of money in the last 6 months, at first I was utterly devastated, but to my surprise I'm now finding these unrelenting downward trend to be hilarious. If I lose it all, so fucking what, it's only money, and life goes on. But mark my words, the incoming bull run is coming, it may not be until another 50% drop, but when it does come it's going to be like January in reverse; market sentiment can violently flip in a day. To those who think it's dead, I truly believe that yes, a lot of shit coins are going to never recover, but this is GOOD for the overall market, were way too saturated with garbage.
Some coins are on the brink of adoption in 2018, and a lot of people have overlooked this due to the bear sentiment, but I'm personally going to be stocking up on my winners in the coming weeks.
Longs are up a bit, shorts down about 2k, and we are still under $6K? That's almost too bearish.
[deleted]
The price (and hope) looks like its fading again... if we go below $6K again I don't think we are coming back above it for some time.
sideways bull is your friend. When no one makes money and its slowly going up for like 3 months. Traders hate this; LONG loves this.
Going to start buying at 4.8-5.2k, looking at fibs, horizontal support and vp. Think we will see a strong bounce there but still dont see us breaking 6-6.4k as we just spent 5 months breaking that level. Expecting a bounce then sideways for weeks as the price will be stuck between two big levels until capitulation.. maybe to 3-4k ? Bottom there then we restart the next bull.
I don't expect bitcoin to blow through its 5k psychological support on this drop. Buyers are getting jumpy, worried their limits won't fill. Too many people wanting to buy between 5-5k. Eth is also approaching its prime technical support area (420-365). BCH is as well (680-600). Too much coin and money exchanged hands over the course of a week in these ranges for us to not bounce from these ranges. 
Been looking for similarities on the disbelief rally in April since it's very possible we see another one

https://www.tradingview.com/x/HtaXuhoH/

https://www.tradingview.com/x/CrFCnA91/

We gonna do another one? Look at the 4 1h red candles after the BGD. Looks pretty much the same so far. Guess we'll see soon enough


I see the discount on futures has closed *significantly*. I'm considering entering a new hedge short, but I was not expecting to see that. I've been away most of the weekend, and I may just wait to see what Monday morning brings us.

I set my stops from 5900-6000 after the leg down this morning, and I obviously got stopped out on the BGC. Still out of position for now. 
I've taken to checking the markets every other day or so and not really needing news. I have to say the benefits of doing that are primarily that I've gained some perspective. The number is low but I remember the tech and all the cool things happening in the space. 

Thought I would just offer this up for anyone who has been watching every hour of this. Take a step back and maybe don't check the markets for a few days. 
Longs are still going up after this fall, which just seems crazy to me. The descending triangle is pretty much complete as I have little doubt that the daily will close below 6k. The normal way to calculate the price target is the height of the triangle to the support line, but I don't think that will work here since 11.7k - 6k = 6k which puts the price target at 0, lol. So I think percentages will work better here in which case the price target is 3k, which may seem a little low but as BTC can go crazy high during bull times, it can go crazy low during bear times so I wouldn't be surprised if we touch 3k in the future.

Also, a reminder that it takes a lot more to move BTC in one way or another. A 10% move is 580 dollars now, so even if we get a long squeeze that pushes the price down 10% we'll still be above 5k. I also think that a long squeeze to 5k or 5.3k is totally possible in the coming week(s).  Depending on how fast we get down there I will probably be buying there. I've been burned so many times recently that I'm hesitant to get into another position so soon but if we get another -10% day soon I think we'll be quite oversold and it will be pretty safe to buy. Long term, though, I would love to fill up my bags at 3k.
I am withdrawing my BTC from Bitmex to go completely fiat. The short funding fee is ridiculous, and I'm not going to 1x short it, losing 0.6% / day.

I feel that 90% of traders including me will probably fail at predicting / catching occasional bounces and would be better off just sitting out completely. (Maybe until 4.9k, 3k)


Can a Bart become a Marge?
someone clearly didn't want the daily to close below 6k. 
Alright, bulls, you win today.
I have a suspicion, we are in for one of those kinda nights....    Im excited! :D
There were sorrows and despair for like 10 minutes, I’m not sure that’s enough 
Was this the reversal?
We going up or going down?
Went all in at 5800 with tight stops.

It held better than I thought it would. 
This has been the most consistent weekly drop in Bitcoin's history since late 2014 right before the bottom. We've never had another period of so many red weekly candles. For the past 7 weeks, 6 of the weekly candles were red, one was green and it was just a ridiculously long bear flag.

I don't think we're near the bottom yet, mainly because nothing can make me bullish at this point. This is going lower. But the past 7 weeks have been rough, even by crypto standards. 


[deleted]
Was there hidden bullish divergence on the 1d because the hourly looks like shit.
Some whale is crashing Binance
Why did i close my short 

Yo soy un punto 
Anyone else scalping this? Much easier since some algo's shut off.
We need to regain that sell pressure again and break 5800. The faster we hit the floor at whatever level it is the better.
Is this going to keep going down? So tempted to pick up a few coins... but most can go down further if this keeps going down
CME futures last trade is this friday, 29 june. Is there public info available about the amount of short contracts?
Another leg down incoming 
Is that the Wyckoff Spring that I heard so much about.

Shorts have not even started to close and we bounced 400$ in an hour
Wtf is going on

Trap ?¡?
Wow, that was quite a rejection at 5724. Below there be dragons (institutional buyers).
That 5820 long I opened last night feels awfully good right now after people ridiculed me for buying & going against the trend. To me it was so obvious how oversold we were which I stated yet people thought there couldn’t be a bounce here. Have a great day everyone, I think I actually bought the legitimate bottom of this dump. 

EDIT : Took some profits at 6180 for an extremely nice gain. 
just fomo’d into a long after waiting for about a week or so.. really hoping that this BGD is the start of a reversal
Havnt made a trade in over 2 weeks or so.

Long @ 5820, SL @ 5740. 5x leverage

I just do not believe that shorting can be this easy. We’ve had a major sell off since 10,000 without any significant bounce. I can be totally wrong & might get rekt but I feel confident about this position plus am keeping this SL nice and tight. 
Eating my popcorn and wondering if we are going to break that 5800 wall
I am *so* confused right now...
If BTC manages to close a green candle on the daily, it looks like a false breakout pattern - which is super bullish. The margin shorts are still in play, so a short squeeze is a possibility from here up.

[https://www.tradingview.com/x/T7904us9/](https://www.tradingview.com/x/T7904us9/)
I'm not exactly sure why everyone is so excited about a "bottom" here..? We literally broke through a support, down to 5800. IMO, we're going to keep going down.
Underlying market fundamentals are in the garbage can and no new money coming in, one green candle clearly put there by a market maker and everyone is using !s like the golden age is back. 
https://www.tradingview.com/x/97iOQXeZ/

Looking at these rough trendlines (we're on the bottom of a channel), plus seeing the significant resistance on the order book buy side ($10 million needed to fall just $200) suggests that the next day is going to be critical for Bitcoin. [tm]
lol perps shorts got rekt. almost hit my dream asks
Badger King is Risen
I've been away from here for quite a while, any summaries on what's been happening the past month or so?

Coming back to look at the price, they trigger an instinct to buy but with how rapid the decline has been definitely makes me weary without all the info.
When is the squeeze homies?
This is just Virgins selling to Chads below 6000
Looks like it’s about to bart back down 
Opened a 10MM JPY long here ... i think this was the last dip before at least a relief rally. The sellers are getting exhausted and are shorting on margin. Let’s see where this goes.
[deleted]
i look at this the other way.  like "holy shit' this thing hit 20k?!  now we are correcting?!  that means every buy in below last ATH is a good buy as long as you hold it for 3-4 years.  At some point it will break ATH's again and you will have the opportunity to get out, or ride the next wave
I get the theory behind fear, denial, despair but honestly I think people will still be calling moon shots at $500. This market and technology is like nothing seen before, I don’t think the normal rules apply here
Isn't this normal since Bitcoin inflation per day is $10.6M?
Well, would you look at that! Almost up again on my 6300 long-riding long. Will probably close at a small profit because I want out. Just gonna buy and hodl if it dumps again.
Some people here saying there is going to be a serious move down. But the price has already collapsed from $20k to $6k. The serious move has already happened. Perhaps price will go down further, but imo this is buying territory. The sentiment has really swung from bull to bear. The lower the price the better the buying opportunity.
[deleted]
I was all ready for 5500 in the morning and then a stupid green candle shows up from no where.

This Bitcoin fella surely knows how to fuck around.

By the time I decide to wet my feet, I'll have no fucking life left in me.

What a tease!
Does anyone know anything about when GDAX automatically logs you out of your account?

I am traveling and my phone died.... Don't think i will be able to get replacement parts until mid July and idk if i want to buy a new phone while traveling. It turned on for 5 seconds before the battery died and i was able to grab the 2fa code to log in. I am trading but i am worried i will be logged out at any second. I am being careful not to delete my internet history/saved password etc.

But will i be automatically timed out after a week/2 weeks/ etc?

Do you think coinbase Pro coming out on the 29th will log everyone out and force us to log back in?
If you assume the current price is true and try to draw a long term upwards line, the last time the market was sane was july 17 at 1850.

This is over 1k different a price point from the last time we were 6k

https://www.dropbox.com/s/2pm24ganm1oiojk/Screenshot%202018-06-24%2005.29.50.png?dl=0

If you say the we haven't been sane since 1k, you could get an estimate of 4k

https://www.dropbox.com/s/gsv4tcyzmshg8u1/Screenshot%202018-06-24%2005.32.59.png?dl=0

<3 kill me

edit//

If you drop back another low hey look 2.3k prediction https://www.dropbox.com/s/vg7fa0jx6xpdf8j/Screenshot%202018-06-24%2005.46.44.png?dl=0


Is there a charting app that's better than Tab? Or do y'all just open TradingView in a browser?
I love the smell of grilled bulls in the morning
I would have turned 0.29 BTC into 1 BTC with my short from 6630 2 days ago

Fell asleep after the football and didn't get to close my short under 5.8k :(

Looks like a whale trying to paint a fake bottom to me
Making a bold prediction here.

We will be up by end of month, candles are print during towards the end of the period.

Big doji incoming 
[deleted]
As long as it stays above 5927 or so on Bitfinex, could be testing a double bottom.  Of course if that goes, then the depths of hell is the limit.
Looks like yesterday's daily rsi bull div won't play out, but there's plenty of signs downward momentum is slowing.  Here is one I've never seen before...  A 4 part bull div on the 2 hour: https://www.tradingview.com/x/UvEhtfia/

Edit: Well looks like we arent closing today's daily below yesterdays open so daily rsi bull div is still in play.  Congrats to those who bought that bottom.
https://www.tradingview.com/chart/BTCUSDT/8zEn6IgF-Catch-it/
Bounce volume is pathetic, this is gonna get ugly, still noone wants to buy the dip.
[removed]
Perma bulls... Help me understand, why are you guys so married to your hodling? Surely the smarter thing is to go short and pick up more coins. 

Don't hate the player
[Wake me up when September beings](https://i.imgur.com/U60Smmp.png)
Does anyone think we are about to head back into a bull market any day now? Or more likely muddle and/or fall?
Is now the time for capitulation?
Wonder where the floor is or the bottom.
Always have capital reserves.
Still no parabolic short increase, we probably have at least 200$ to go ? :D

Getting exciting now! https://www.tradingview.com/x/VeekVXaS

ETH is at 1 year last ATH level too, 420 is quite a psychological limit I guess https://www.tradingview.com/x/H2KDRZR4
We have to be approaching bottom soon...no?
I mean this is getting stupid. Its gotta bounce at some point.
Good ol fake out before the break out.  Haven’t seen one of those since last summer.  
Grrr...so tempting. Still want to wait a little longer though.
No suicide hotline posts up in r/bitcoin or other crypto subs yet. I’m still trending bear
this is madness, FTS
Thank you redditors for your swift response :)
Kind of a weak dump, any chance we're oversold?
Eth is still making lower lows, I don't think this is over just yet.
Coindesk: Bitcoin has lost 70% of it's value from ATH, here's why it's good for bitcoin.
tomorrow Monday backlogged wires from the weekend will start arriving to exchanges. We will be able to see how confident dip buyers are (if there are any left lol).
Most likely a trap
Reversal is going to happen very close to the current price.
Coinbase needs to get under $5900 already so we get can this over with.
[deleted]
I went on a bachelor's trip over the weekend, and decided to keep my yolo long open and slowly tend to it rather than close it early. The price hit my target of $5800 as long-term support leading back to November 2017, so I slowly started adding to my position, as I anticipated a short squeeze incoming at a minimum with the possibility for a short-term reversal. I apologize for not posting earlier, but I literally just got home a few minutes ago. I'm thankful for this bounce, though I haven't decided if I'm going to ride it out for a while or lock in my profits yet.

!long xbtu18 add 5800 10x 25&#37;

!long xbtu18 add 5670 10x 25&#37;
It seems no Short squeeze on Bitfinex yet, the Short order number still sit at 28970. Or my chart freeze?
[deleted]
5k psychological point is almost guaranteed. Come back here for that. Close your eyes for now!
Jordan Belfort has some FUD, freshly served.

[https://www.facebook.com/jordanbelfort/videos/10156930934298465/?hc\_ref=ARThKAqtk3zx8nsSAeV4ZTHDAu6NvqvuL6MVmAKQLj1HMCW4OY1yMt9jdl2JASgC9rI](https://www.facebook.com/jordanbelfort/videos/10156930934298465/?hc_ref=ARThKAqtk3zx8nsSAeV4ZTHDAu6NvqvuL6MVmAKQLj1HMCW4OY1yMt9jdl2JASgC9rI)
There is support here but it looks to me that sell volume is far too great to be contained.

There is little support between 5.6k and 5k or so. I am expecting a large markdown in price.
See, here's the thing: even if Bezos, Buffett and Bill Gates teamed up to drive the price of Bitcoin down, they'd run out of coins to dump eventually. Players of all sizes on the long side of things understand this. The only way you could really drive it down would be to stanch demand, and dropping the price won't do that. This is basic economics. When price goes down, demand goes up. When supply runs out but demand remains, the price goes up. There is a limited supply of Bitcoin. They need to work on the demand side, and from the looks of things, they're doing a pretty awful job of it. I've yet to hear a single well constructed argument for why we should continue to drop, especially in light of the many times we've visited 6K this year and the shallow and short excursion below it.
this might be the reversal bulls are looking for, we dropped to 57xx range for a while and now 6xxx range
[deleted]
Almost like someone called this 49 minutes ago.
When this thing finally does turn.. don't sell no matter what. leave that order book thin for the bears. Panic will end , calmer minds will prevail and people will start thinking? Do I really want to sell this low? go to sleep and buy back $1200 higher?
What's the target price to confirm a triple bottom? 8k? 
 I think we'll see 5.3k today.
Capitulation patterns are starting to occur in some alts. Bullish.

I will consider to close my latest hedge from 6600 if there’s a decent bounce at 5000. There’s at least decent probabilistic chance for that.
ded cat bounce. Prepare for moar pain
♫♫ *It's all over but the crying* ♫♫

♫♫ *...and everybody's crying but me* ♫♫
How BTC would move if it followed 2014 Bitfinex movement:

https://www.tradingview.com/x/7DqcEAmA/

(Ignore the numbering. These are not meant to be EW's)
I'm trying to place a limit order on binance for if BTC hits 5k. But selling my tether, I need to put in my bid in satoshis. How can I determine what the bid to put in satoshis to equal the price of BTC being at 5k? Or in other terms, how can I place a limit order to buy at 5k with my tether
these candles look like brail or something, where all the volume @ ??
Sell me your BTC, cowards!
Yowsa, B-Cash rocketed up 15% on the 1hr BGD... BTC/ETH not so much... wonder why?
Who thinks this reverse head-and-shoulders we are tracing out is going to complete? Who thinks it's going to break down and to lead to a bare minimum 5800 retest and the potential of 6,000 becoming resistance?

This is seriously a really big week ahead of us
[deleted]
[deleted]
LUL redditards celebrating a $300 short squeeze. We have much further down to go LUL
I'm buying super simple.. 5k,4k,3k and 2k. Should we reach each number.

Where this all ends well I'm super hopeful it's the upper 4k range. 
Don't panic. Just zoom out. Unless its [NIKKEI 225](https://imgur.com/a/mVgFPSc) you are talking about. 
The anti crypto but otherwise quite good site HN has an anti bitcoin story on front page again :D https://news.ycombinator.com/item?id=17383844

Nice bottom indicator?
[deleted]
[deleted]
Woke up just before the bounce at $5800 ..wow someone above must love me a lil
Tbh, I wouldn't be surprised to see $500 either way right now...

I think an upwards move depends on catching some shorts.


According to the [poll taken earlier today](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8tfcql/daily_discussion_sunday_june_24_2018/e17hf8y/) (166 votes as of writing), this was not the bottom. ...unless it was and we all are wrong.

Edit: I don't mean to project anything by this. I am not saying this was (or not) the bottom "because 100 people said so". It's just a proof this chop is very confusing, and you're not the only one confused trader here. That's it.
Does anyone else remember that leaked document from JP Morgan back in February I think that predicted BTC to go down to $4700 before making another bull run? I don't know if it was legit or not. 
interesting how we fall massively a day after phil potter of bitfinex quits after tether admits they cant do an audit.

wonder what happens on monday. whales know something for sure 
Guys I am down from €62000 bought Dec 2017 BCH+ETC+XRP+BTC then lost Qty: 20 BCH. trade rest of them in March 2018 to BTC 5.6 then to ZCL for BTCP. Loss BTC qty:2.2 after BTC: qty4.4

Trades BTC few time in March and April 2017  and gains to BTC quantity: 5 but later dropped to BTC qty4.6.
Then traded BTC to ETH qty:50.
ETH drop in May traded to LTC: qty245
LtC drop traded to Btc: qty:4
Then Traded BTC to ETH qty: 45
Then Traded ETH to BCH: 25.8

Now i am holding BCH quantity: 28.8
Seriously very very down
We aren’t breaking 6200
Is there a name for the positive feedback loop for when people sell and then disperse throughout the internet downvoting and spreading gloom and doom scared the price will go up while they are in fiat?

>the return of part of an output signal to the input, which is in phase with it, so that the amplifier gain is increased and the output is often distorted.

The electronic definition of positive feedback loops is quite beautiful in describing the phenomenon I see.
[deleted]
Sub 4K 
Guys, this sideways at the absolute 2018 HAS to be a bear flag, right? Otherwise that'd be the greatest troll to drop $100 below to $5800 and zoom up?!
MTGOX will suddenly add 137k BTC & BCH to the market in a short period of time. That is a lot of coins. Some whales think they can sell 10k coins today and rebuy 2-5x that amount on the date that MTGOX distributes the coins. 

The only risk is if too many shorters sell over 137k coins and need to cover , then the price dump will be averted since the shorts will effectively have to cover when the GOX coins get dumped. However it doesnt seem likely that we will hit that many shorts.

So basically everyone mark you calendars and expect a fire-sale on the date of distribution.

This explains the recent price decline. Overexposed longs and some large holders are getting out of the way with the intention of possibly reopening for cheaper base prices during the projected sell off (Q1 2019?).
Lol all u shorting losers is what’s wrong with the market. Hope you all lose your money. 
Thank goodness someone is pumping this POS.
Anyone else ok with the entire CC market crashing and bitcoin going to <1000usd just to teach all the lambo kids and get rich quick scammers an expensive lesson?
Is it still ok to hold my 9k? I also have one in 8.10k.  Wait for a bounce later to minimize my lose, not gonna aim for profit.  Still waiting for the best opportunity to buy.
I predicted this earlier on.. I said 5800 looked like good support in another post but still got downvoted. 

https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8tfcql/daily_discussion_sunday_june_24_2018/e17dqot?utm_source=reddit-android
Even those of you who somehow still believe in bitcoin; why do you not set stop losses?

Whatever your exchange, you can minimalize losses with a few clicks. Everyone who set them even at 6k before today saved themselves a nice bit of coin. Set it at something you even find ridiculous, say $5k, and you could be very glad you did later.
Lol it’s a joke boys, I think a lot of us are at a loss right now but we just gotta keep hoping it bounces back 
glad i took profits on the run-up and know how bubbles work, got a nice weekly dca on again, and looking forward to buying super cheap alts at the bottom. sorry boys there will be no bull in this market for years, but it's great time start an accumulation schedule (hope you didn't blow your wad at 10k+, that would be idiotic)
I'm not one to say I told you so but I have been short and predicting continued down side for a while now. I'm sure in 18 months when lightning network is proven to not work the price will continue to drop.
hope you didn't miss the ticket for the next bull-run
Could it be the Gox victems selling already now, with the knowledge they will get their gox coins + gox fiat back next year or something?
This current market is like a black hole. Suck away your money, suck away your soul.
It's called a bear market ladd. It needs to slow bleed so everyone who thinks they can get rich quick are wiped the f*** out.
But "going down" is foreplay.
This is just another leg down in a long line of legs since $20K...and likely many more to come.
I like it
[deleted]
[https://i.imgur.com/vTMatLN.jpg](https://i.imgur.com/vTMatLN.jpg)
Just remember to check all the other local low days as well. 

The real indicator is when /u/ibankbtc goes long and someone taunts him for it :) 
best part of that old thread!!!!! https://imgur.com/GV19a3w


The legend lives on!!! :D
15 upboats and 344 comments. Wow we've grown
Don't sweat it. Do yourself a favor and look at the monthly candles after the previous ATH. The price remained near the bottom for months before the next bull run started. You will have plenty of time to buy low.
its consolidating pretty well here

so if I were yo, I'd buy and set my stopless $50 below current price. 

Your risk exposure is under 1%.

But if it pumps some more from here, it'll pump a few hundred bucks, so the r/r is pretty good 


BGD? Been looking for a definition for ages...
Just chill don’t trade on your emotions or you’re gonna have a bad time 
Just buy here, or any time, and hold.  Remember the best time to buy BTC was 5 years ago...the second best time is today.

/s
You seem to be using your brain, that's a good start and more uncommon in crypto than you may think, but it of course doesn't mean you won't get burned although it makes the odds more in your favor. As for how to deal with a crazy bear market like this is simple: money you can afford to lose, fuck lambos and delusions be honest with yourself and don't go above. Period.
I think you are doing it right. Just remember to overcome greed and actually take profits when the time comes.
What's the trigger of your emotions? You looking at the prices. Stop looking at the prices.
The emotions become desensitized after a couple years. It's a cycle, and once you see the cycle twice you're too busy buying every big dip below 50% of ATH to be emotional about these losses - all you see are future gains. I was losing it last year trying to get my BTC stack growing before 1 whole BTC would never be something I could afford to buy. In some ways this bear market is relief.
I'm basically following the same strategy - I've been buying more every $1000 on the way down from $9000.  The two most important factors are to eliminate emotion as much as possible, and not to overinvest (you do not want to be forced into selling at low prices).  There is always some risk it never recovers, but this is a speculative asset class, and your allocation should reflect that.
Consider the money lost already... technically it is.  You basically upgraded your USD to Bitcoin.  Would you go back to an iPhone 3 after upgrading it to an iPhone X?  
Never change Chad, we need you.
Only a matter of time 
Wait til $4k
Same, just started DCAing finally with fresh fiat I had been accumulating on an exchange
I am.

Bitmain are not good for mining in general. I mean, great if you're mining to get coin. But bad if you want a decentralised network of miners on small machines across the globe.

But that's not been possible for ages. They recently released an ASIC miner for Zcash and that fucker has the power of 14 1080 ti's and uses half the power. Killed the gpu miners of that coin dead and one of the reasons I've turned off my own miners.

Fortunately, even though the price is crashing the value of my GPU's are not.
Not really. Mainly because they've probably been far over 51% for a long, long time. They just disguise it with proxies. 
yeah, that's worrying, a PoW change would be good imho. 
It doesn't matter, in practice. What's the worst scenario? Bitmain abandons mining (which they won't do) and there is a short lived network crisis. We already seen one in December when network load exceeding hashrate by a significant margin. Difficulty readjustment happens every 2 weeks. It will go down and others will fill in the niche. 
Where do you get that they have 42%?
People don't want to sell because they are afraid prices will go up right after they sell. Only miners have no choice but to sell to cover their expenses.
Yeah, like in december.
I got stopped out after moving them to 5900 and 6000 this morning, so now I'm looking at where to re-short. I'm going to give it some time.

I guess I should update the bot.

!short XBTU18 close 5950
same here
This past month I keep looking at the number of the most recent bottom on Bitfinex and none of them have subjectively sounded like a bottom but I have to say 5755 fits the bill. 

Moreover, this BGD is rather relevant due to the price point it happened at.   


Lets see though. Time will tell. 
Jesus fuck. Show us the ROI screenshot at least.
pics or it didn't happen
You are a rockstar. Hopefully I can have similar fortune with my long taken May 1st
those strong hands
The absolute bottom " 6K? Well done for getting out I guess but I don't think this is the place to close but then again if you've been underwater for like 5 months then fair play...
Good one.  That's the way to do it.
Phenomenal - putting hodlers to shame with that one!
You are a living legend.
screenshot is from Coinbase Pro.
how much were the lending(margin) fees? 
Lambos?
Gg on that juicy profit.
You should not close. Gonna see 4k real soon.
Indeed. Hypothetical 15 million USD market order on GDAX takes the price down 400 USD or up 2,150 USD.
It's not explosive at all to the upside.  It just broke a strong support level and is beginning the slide below that.

If the price drops to $5K in the next 12 hrs, then could be some coiled energy, but not here.
They just dropped more before the bounce
Most alts dropped a lot more, too. This isn't over. Everyone is moving into tether to wait and see how this shakes out.
I've noticed that the bots aren't as efficient anymore. When BTC dumped from 6.8k to 6k the other day my shorts on alt ratio's didn't move, they only started dumping a day later. 
It is a reflection of how willing people are to leave fiat, go to BTC, then go to the outer rim where their alts are. You see the fiat gateway alts pump a little, and you see some bleed off of btc to alts, but no new money is coming in and people largely don't trust this big green market maker candle nonsense. 

I would argue most of that action is from people in crypto not going in and out of fiat who are making desperate, premature, trades. 
ETH also hasn't hit its ATL for the year on this dump yet.  It reached a lower point during April.
[deleted]
Today could be the day of reckoning, I wouldn't be surprised if we tested 5k today. 
This is probably going to continue for several more months until the dust is fully settled.

I'm just going to keep DCAing, saving most of my fiat until the "bottom".
Of course I'm too stubborn to sell but I said when we hit $6k the first time I could see it still going lower. 
And yet, the market never does what we hope or think it will do
Dayum. RIP Stokinator. 
Was he even a real guy? I started to get the feeling he was trolling or an irony account. Edit makes him look nutty.
another soul broken by bitcoin
lol.  I always posted "Bullish."  in his comment section ironically.  Good times.


Lol. Just when it was about to be fun having him around..
What? Good God. I loved seeing that guy around here. He was funny and I liked downvoting him.
"Pre-blockchain internet"... oh no. That man is an investor of elastos.  A promising NEO ICO [that just jumped off a cliff.](https://coinmarketcap.com/currencies/elastos/)
XMR is indeed fascinating.

It's a coin that is highly respected by BTC, ETH and BCH investors - no matter their otherwise ideological controversies.
Agreed, this is going to be a slow grind down. 
Privacy coins? They are increasingly being banned.
it'll wick down to 0, order book will dry up.  I will buy 21 million coins at that point.  Then send some to another account and trade them back and forth up to 500k.  Then I will have won bitcoin.



Capitulation comes as a thief in the night. 


Not nearly enough alt-coin mining equipment on /r/hardwareswap
Capitulation will happen when multiple whales flood the market with sells at market price 
imo capitulation needs a deep wick like the February one.
>and apparently   
>  
>/u/stokinator  
>  
> deleted his profile.

All part of crab-17, his reason to post here is no more.
lmao deleted his profile
I’m really surprised u/stokinator deleted his profile 
He probably deleted his bank account too. Anyway, is that a BUY signal? :)
How can you delude yourself to believe capitulation is close when the market only lost 10% in the last 7 days.  Talk to me about capitulation being close when we lose 10% in 10 minutes after losing 50% for the week.
I put in a sell, with the intent to fed myself with green toilet paper months from now, no matter what happens.

This is new. And so we are capulating.
In my opinion we have hit capitulation and are beginning to enter despair.  A little father left but we're getting close
load the same korea FUD
Shouldn't have bought so much corn
How about two!
I surely wasn't expecting that. Jesus. At least a benefit of being deep underwater is that you're comforted by [this cute octopus](https://cdn.newsapi.com.au/image/v1/f456bdfb614f184119937da0030cff81) and many of his friends that are exactly as cute. 
february 6k low has a V-ish rebounce, right now we're just slowly bleeding
volume is 1/3 of then
I love reading old Bitcoin threads from several years ago.
Seems plausible. If that's the case they'd probably wait to see how low it can go.
You can engineer it too, if you buy enough. 
It depends on which whales...could Bezos, Gates, Musk and Buffett team up and engineer a bottom?   Yes, of course.   Or any of of them could it alone.  Whales can engineer every top and bottom they want in this market.  They can draw the chart for the next two years on their wall and make it happen, almost exactly.  

So not sure what your point is there.
Seriously, starting to see some despair with emotions running high, taking the wrong side of a trade.

Perfect example: https://www.reddit.com/r/CryptoCurrency/comments/8tfwcd/daily_discussion_megathread_june_24_2018/e179td6/

"The only way to get my money back is by shorting the market" 


Despair indicates ongoing attention and engagement. 

I'm more aroused by boredom and indifference and that still feels like a long, long way away. 
> Can't believe we've gone green on the daily. Incredible.

It is. Also the markets tomorrow will wake up to this, and not < 5900 and desperation in the air.

But isn't "day close" in UTC, though? If so, then it's still 6.5h away.
And if today's daily candle closes below 6k again over the next 6-7 hours, and bitcoin continues to drop towards 5k next week, can we expect you to show up here and tell us that the "bullish divergence" has been cancelled?
Do these usually have multi day follow through when it does break upwards?
I actually saw this and was planning to buy a couple hours ago (from timing recent pumps), but I forgot to set an alarm. lmao
The pain and shame on my part is very real. I got in sometime late 2016. Exited my initial investment 50% down from where we currently sit...aside from that I took ZERO profit. My greed and the euphoria got the better of me. I’ve lost multiple fortunes. At this point, I’ve bitterly resigned myself to the fact that that money is gone now. My only saving grace, which I felt terrible about later on, is that I got my initial investment out. I’ll never sell below ATH. If we don’t get back there, I’ll just eventually die of natural causes and be buried with my ledger. Not even kidding. 
😂👏🏻
It's the pre rally dump. ;D
All it is is the removal of future doom. It does nothing to ameliorate the present doom. 

Most good news is some wishy washy thing that might happen in the future but will be most likely forgotten by the time it arrives or never happens. 
Unless without the good news the dump would be much deeper.
Good news doesn't equal adoption. I think only adoption will get the price going again. 
Might be good news for the people who lost coins but how is it good news for the market? 100,000+ BTC will now enter supply, this is extremely bearish.
How is it bizarre?

It's an asset based on nothing but speculation, it isn't a stock. 
In a bear market good news just causes little rebounds before trend continuation. Long term trends always trump the news. When long term trends reverse on news it's usually just a catalyst for an already overextended market.
What. The. Fuck.

Poloniex, please. Not. Now.

**The last thing we fucking need right now is exchange shenanigans!!**
Happens a few times the past 2 months nothing new
LOL
Ok I had to add to my short on that "news", although it is probably nothing.  But very low risk/high reward play at this moment.

(There is nothing on their Twitter, but the don't seem to use it for much.)
What exchange are you on? Every one I look at is under $6200?

Edit- Nevermind, I misread that as meaning it already was. Thanks for clarifying
Did we break the high? Highest I saw was 6189.
This guy trades.👍
This 4H close is identical to the previous daily close. High chance are that it's going to dump before this 4H closes. 
When is the daily close?
if we fail to break  6-6.1k in the next 24 hours I'll consider this too, however support to 5300 looks pretty serious and a lot of shorts are due to close so I doubt it will hit 5300 that fast, a bounce around 5600 is more likely.
Eh, I'd say it would have to pass *and stay passed* over 6250 for a minimum of 6 hours to count as a real bounce. But this might be actual resistance, which is still good for bitcoin.
This one's tough. It'll be hard closing on a small retrace. Genuinely can't tell if this is going to be the beginning of the relief rally for a 2-4 weeks or we're in for a little more pain first. 

I wanted to see some real fast panic selling but all we got is panic buying lol
The previous eight weeks are a bit different than the last two hours.  
One of them is 8 weeks - 1344 hrs.  And the other one is 2 hrs.

And some people wisely trade on the chart and not "signs of life".   


Bro do you even death cross on higher timeframes?
Eat my shorts. 
$300 to go. $5839 now.
I thought i am the only guy who is watching this.. I drew a 2nd trendline with the 20k top and the new 10k top too, in 2015 we needed 3 new trend lines to enter the bull (like in the text books lol), 2 we got so far 
Who would be worried about a hardcap? And if they're worried, they shouldn't even be in Bitcoin. Not going to fix something that's not broken.
with LN, it can be divised even further already as far as i know.
2,100,000,000,000,000 Satoshis.
False narrative, obv. as they reign in control over BTC and other cryptos, they want to ensure it is not non-inflationary, because that would be real money, and real competition to fiat currencies.
Full retrace is always fun. Bitcoin is holding up surprisingly well. August 2017 prices would be tempting though.
The other bears have stop just above the previous bull Ath. 
That was the peak of one 'bubble' though. It stayed significantly lower for the months that followed. If you bought the $420 peak and didn't use the opportunity to buy when ETH was 30-70&#37; lower for the next 4-5 months. Well, sorry.
You got greedy, PotatoKing21.
Because you thought it was going "to teh mo0n".
I'm down for it going to that level if it kills a majority of the garbage coins. The amount of overvalued shitcoins out there is ridiculous.
I don’t normally agree with you (sorry!) but this is 100% true.

Crypto has all the stability of a fat person getting in a dinghy.
There have been so many instances lately where a whale could pump through resistance and change the market structure but it just never happens. 7.8k and 6.8k where critical points and it was so close to being broken. If this was manipulated, it would have been easy to pump through it and change the trend or at least the structure of this downtrend. 

https://www.coinigy.com/s/i/5b2f71ffa0bdb/


But you are right, this level could be a spot for a reversal. 

Gotta be a fucking idiot to sell at this point.  
[deleted]
It's due for a bounce, so sell for 2 or 3% profit if you get a chance.
I'm very ready to dump this through support at 5.8k with my other whale friends :D 
[deleted]
The real show will start once binance start accepting deposits. 
I thank Bitmex everyday for adding the EOSBTC futures with up to 20x lev :D

The main net + so many unsure "constitution" dramas + frozen accounts whatever was the perfect short storm + accounts opened up so people could dump

Just wait until Binance add it...
so dramatic.  I'm down like 65 percent which is a huge chunk of change I couldn't really afford to lose if that makes you feel better
*engage tinfoil hat* 

That may be the goal.
Agreed
The market won't turn around until every get-rich-quick 2017 bitcoin "trader" is wiped out. That's you.
This is only round 1, this lasted 3 years last time.
people will invest once the value is there beyond pure speculation 
That’s harsh 
I had that support 5% lower for eth, but perhaps I have too much breathing room on my line.

Eth making a batman right now though makes me think it's going down, and in today's precarious moment BTC could go with it.
What does it make you wonder?
How do you know that? you could even argue that 5700s are a major bitcoin support on the 1d too.
BTC also has support at $5800 going back to November, while the ETH/BTC ratio has been much worse over the past few months than it is now. I usually track alts to look for a reversal with Bitcoin, but I still think ETH bouncing was just one of many factors leading to the BTC squeeze that just happened.
There are lots and lots and lots of people who believe this. They just don't enter the market because why invest in/trade in an asset that you think is due for death any year now. Most who have any experience with it know it will be an extremely long and slow process if it *does* happen.

There are very, very few people here who believe it will happen though. But outside of crypto groups/subs, there are quite a few. 
The "what if nobody actually cares about Bitcoin" type of comments show up when we're really near the bottom. 
Can someone who lived through the Great Bear Market when it bled from 1200 all the way down to 150 chime in here?

How does this compare? The same? Different?

Consider that 1200 to 150 is as 19000 to, I dunno, 2000 plus change I guess?

I still think the main dangerous of buying now is that you won't make the most *efficient* buy. That if you wait a bit, you will get a cheaper BTC.

I am still afraid to exit 100%. 
> Serious question, but has anyone considered the possibility that this entire market just slowly dies?

Did gold die? Bitcoin can still be a great store of value for the long-term. Nobody has the answer here. Time will tell.

I personally don't think something that has been around for almost 10 years suddenly dies. The price may go down but global adoption and interest can still grow the next years / decades.


well at SOME point people might just buy "for the lulz". Imagine ETH going to 10$ or 5$. Anyone with a decent salary could then buy a few 100 just because then, and with all the money and funds backing it, the assymetrical upside is quite big. 


I mean look at stuff like DarkDoge or whatever, they still have a small market
Considered this many times over and, yes, there're a billion reasons why BTC could die. Crypto in general will prevail, though.  The tech behind BTC is not exclusive to BTC and government-issued crypto, like the Swedish e-krona or the South Korean S-coin etc, might very well take over.
I think that pretty much all of the "normies" think this is dying, one way or another (bubble, Ponzi, pyramid, scam, etc). But it seems that the majority of the people who are in crypto feel bullish long-term because bitcoin has always risen from the dead in the past. 
Does anyone consider the sheer predictability of questions of this nature at moments of this nature a tad comical?

The majority of what's around right now will die and deserves to die. It's pure, insulting junk. The rest will come back stronger eventually alongside increasing purpose. 
I am a technologist and from a fundamental perspective I believe that decentralized technology is the future. Scalability problems are solvable. But how long it would takes is uncertain.
This!!! People are dead certain market cycles are driven purely by literally nothing and psychology.

Surprise motherfuckers, market cycles are driven by business cycles, and crypto does no business whatsoever. 

Also, all other (stocks, currencies, bonds, commodities) markets are supported by governments. Even though they are, some of them still die!

I'm giving the chance of next bull occuring way less than 50% unless blockchain starts pulling in real revenue.

On the other hand, while I think the only event that can get a bull back in the game are several revenue generating blockchain projects, at least if/when it happens it will be extremely clear bull is back on the menu.
It’s always worth “considering” this question.

but at the moment the answer is a stronger “no” than its ever been imo. This could change though so worth thinking about.
Indeed crypto and blockchain can revolutionize its way into many corners of our lives worldwide and specific coins will still end up being totally useless. I still haven't seen any watertight argument for why BTC is immune to this possibility.
It won't fully die for me unless visa (or whatever) allows me to buy anything I want from anyone in the world I want. Until that happens, I'll continue to use crypto.

And I am first world, there are likely many more compelling arguments from the unbanked on why it will always have some value and use case. 



Yes. The speculative era of BTC is over. 

It will rise once corporations demonstrate profits from adopting blockchain technology, and others follow. 
I DO believe it will reach multi billion dollar market.

Sound money, predictable low inflation, anonymity, censorship resistance... All too good and too important.

This is just cooling off period from over speculation. Soon enough we will find the bottom (if we haven’t already) and things will again look positive.

IMO, everyone should think at this point “When is the best time to get back into the market”.
>A bit like a Segway

Segway is shit, how can I store this if I live in a city where I need to travel short distances? It is still much to heavy for its purpose. Their are much smarter small electric vehicle solutions out there and I am 100&#37; sure that they will have a great future...
Speaking of Segways, anyone else hyped for Elder Scrolls 6?
Of course a lot of people have considered that.
Afaik blockchain is more efficient/secure at certain tasks than regular methods. If that's hold true then it will continue to have some value. 
Buy high, sell low. Classic. 
In 2014, when bitcoin was around $200, after bleeding out from $1,100 over six months - and volumn was dead, the media was dead, and the community was a ghost town - it got to a point where a tumbleweed blew across the street and I said to myself, "This money is gone. Lost. Done. So there's no point in selling now, because it's basically worthless anyway." This is when I wanted to buy the least, but should have bought the most. This was the point of max pain for me. And, it turns out, the bottom. 
With friends like such: Socratically evoke them to objectively reason.

Help them gain clarity. 

It's difficult alone in a cloudy sea of emotion & jadedness.
[deleted]
It's not even remotely close to max pain yet.  And your friends held through a $14,000 drop, so they are far from "weak hands".   All that info is very bearish for me.
Mother in law called me. Asked me to sell her 1 btc at 6200.
I was sitting at Which Wich ordering lunch when the drop to 5750 happened on Binance...and my finger hovered over the Sell button for a while.  Then I said “F*** it, what’s the point” and by the time I got home the BGD happened and I said “Well at least I didn’t f*** that up”.
That's funny. All my friends are taking advantage of the discount.
Maybe they’re reading this sub full of bears, these “influencers” ”shorters” can definitely cause shaky hands. Only thing is, many normies will abandon crypto entirely to never return. In the long run, will that be good for the value of your coins? We need to “make Crypto great again”!
*"If price ever reaches €3k I'll buy a whole coin!"*

- My neighbor who is invested with little money since 2017 and slightly in the red now
Why would anyone mine at a loss if they can just buy bitcoin cheaper on market?
Miners can hedge themselves by using futures. Every big mining firm that has even one financial advisor in their company is doing this. That was originally the entire point of creating futures markets. Commodity producers who expected lower prices in the future could lock in the present price by hedging themselves. 
Sound 
Hey Sloppy, saw you contemplating scaling out some of your shorts, but it seems you kinda want to hang on to it. Any thing changed on your thoughts of the latest shenanigans today?
>The nerds, geeks, pussies, (smartest people in the world) stay calm and just do their job like the fucking bosses that they are. These people arent emotional over anything money wise. 

>The only people bitching over price are greedy emotional pussies. 

>Get over the market. It’s amazing. 


Is this parody?

Anyway they turn bullish the moment they get a $400 BGD, forgetting that the price was there 2 days ago.

I kinda wish someone would teach they how to hedge their stack through shorting, but they would likely get their entire stack liquidated within a day. 
> The nerds, geeks, pussies, (smartest people in the world) stay calm and just do their job like the fucking bosses that they are.

oh my god
> Every one trying to find reason for the bear market. Let me tell you. There is no reason at all. None, no conspiracy no whatever.

Maybe people just like money.
I should make a BitcoinDory account
Hmm, I withdrawed some ETH this morning from Gdax but nothing came in on my wallet. No transaction hash but also no error. Already created a support ticket. So this outage kinda confirms my problem.
Tether slowly making its way up the charts.
Sell sell sell?
It already was yesterday 
I bought tether because of it's strong fundamentals, not the price.  Fake audits, bald faced lies on their website, a total lack of transparency, using shell companies to acquire bank accounts, etc.  Tether is the future, I've never been so sure of anything.  Once institutional investors catch wind, it's going to the moon.
This is proof that crypto is still in a huge bubble. Once Tether collapses, we'll see *real* desperation.
Solid plan/strategy! A lot more should make and keep to a thought-out plan. 
I like the analogy! So, in your opinion, winter will be hovering between $4500-$6k for several months and then a capitulation to ~$3k before a recovery? 
This.
so watch how the southern hemisphere markets are reacting?  Got it!
RIP
Lmao 
It is bioluminescently impossible for bitcoin to go below $5970. 


How can that be a fact? Too much resistance?
The price is going below $1,000 this year. I’m 100% positive on this. Bookmark this:)
Notice that, because the market did something you didn't expect, you've placed blame on a "market maker", instead of evaluating yourself to see what signs/clues you missed. You've absolved yourself of all responsibility (subconsciously to protect your ego) for what just happened.

That BGD, no matter who started it, occurred because buyers were antsy and didn't want to miss the bottom. These people had their finger on market buy, just waiting. I'm not saying this is the local bottom, but buyers who are antsy indicate this is feeding ground for a lot of people, and it is in this vicinity.
This sub is very impatient.  I've learned not to take any single movement as anything more than just one datapoint.  When on the way up, I thought we were going parabolic too fast/early long before we actually did.  Sold a bunch too soon because of it.  Live and learn, patience is King.
Gee, its almost like people can change their minds after events in the market unfold. 
They were screaming 3k 45 minutes ago.  Scared me out of buying this morning, that’s for sure.  Now I want to throw this phone in the lake missing a bounce like that.
So many butthurt bottom shorters wow.
> solely 


Not sure it was a market maker.  I saw giant sell orders being countered by many small buy orders.

Not saying this is the bottom.  But that green candle wasn't initiated by a MM/Whale the same way that the green candles we see in barts are.
Re-read your post again...think about it.
I buy bitcoin on localbitcoins via people who quick sell to my ad. This morning and last night pretty much nobody sold to me, it took hours to buy what I would usually buy in 30 minutes or less. 
[deleted]
>  that looked awfully like a mid-term bottom. We are going to push up from  here, maybe visit 6100 before doing so but will defo be testing 6700  within the coming days. 

Around 12-14 hours ago we went from 6100 to 6250, resulting in just another 400 dollar candles in the downward, breaking the 5900, and then it tried to recover for about few hours, resulting in another downward push which for some reason lasted less than 5 minutes where at the time and now I do not see the reason for that being a fall to 5400's in a 12 hour candle. I just really don't know how it seemed like the absolute mid-term bottom rather heading for the lower 5k ranges.

The only thing that I disagreed with myself, is when the 6k range broke, it should've break faster, and it was weird that 5900 hit and then it returned to 6.1k, at a point that it turned me bullish, but even though a 6250 push happened, it lasted very short and we went for breaking the 5.9k which was more than convincing that there is no trend reversal.

Now we sit at a shit range, I would really get frustrated if this does not break to the 6400-6500 where I think it will not go higher than that. All in all, this range is shit, and when we hit 5800 I slept fine, I guess this is not the case anymore.
Thanks for sharing your insight. You have 3.5 years of trading experience on me, and I felt similar vibes.
Thank you Adele.
F
we still have oversold bull divs or ?
You mean accumulation? The meme isn't dead yet, we are just setting up for the "spring" lol.
Feb. 6th it got to 8, so there's more room to drop. 
It was 15 on feb 2nd, too, then proceeded to drop another 2.5K in the next four days.
How does this index work?
Now you think you wait for a restest - that's how you end up buying back in at 8k.
DCB 
Mm I’ll let u know in 2 weeks
technical reversal bounce.
DYOR
actually make that $6088 just to give it a bit more breathing room 
This weekend, almost all of them were real, the buy walls
Could just be people thought it was a reversal so they don't expect it to get there.

But every time we see these huge buy walls lately they get pulled and we just dumparooni afterwards 
People said the same thing at 9000... and 8000...
what's your rationale behind buying ltc?
You feel like a winner today, because the price hasn't had time to drop more.  See if you feel like a winner in a month or two.  And yes we will see in a year as well.
Don't think of it as 18% off, think of it as you had to pay an 18% premium 
I see bitcoin going to the bottom, but it is impossible to tell if the bottom is below 4k or 6k, and then go up again around the time of next halving. I think I should DCA for the next 24 months to keep buying before the next rally.
You aren't dollar cost averaging you're chasing losses.  The former is a legitimate investment strategy the latter is the symptom of a gambling addiction.
Let it break upward one time
Falling wedges are generally considered a bullish signal, correct?
It looks like a descending channel to me.
nice one, but that support line looks a bit fudged.. could easily draw it with a steeper slope

They break up, then come back down.

Just a giant fucking dick tease 
Position closed with success



* Position: long xbtusd

* Opening value: 6,150.00

* Average value: 6,150.00

* Closing value: 6,040.00

* Leverage: 5.00X

* Stack: 100.00%

* PnL: -2.04%



**Price for xbtusd should be between 0 and 5950.36**

[Check Open Positions](https://www.anotherbot.info/)


Do you just leave BTC without 1x short on Bitmex?
The funding fee is utterly ridiculous
There was crucially important resistance along the way which spanned the distance between that huge candle in early april: 6.8k and 7.8k. The trend is going to reverse sooner than later, next week or first week of July. How can you see this pattern change? By one big FOMO red candle lol. We are too far extended. I'm guessing that we'll see another rally to 7.2k - 7.8k before downward continuation. It should be obvious by now that we entered a secondary phase in this bear market with the dump from 20 to 6k and formation and breakdown of that triangle as the first. 
yes it's very sideways with a slight downtrend. Trading the 4h charts has been good
> Hasn't bitcoin been reliably predictable these past two months?   
> Are there any bulls left here? How could you possibly see anything changing this pattern?   

I don't have a crystal ball, so I don't know what's going to happen next, but couldn't those exact two sentences have been said at $18k about going up and bears?
No trend lasts forever.  Exactly at the moment when most believe it will continue to decline, it reverses - this is how markets always work.   I agree it COULD decline further, even much further.  However, for those of us who believe in the tech long term, the risk/reward is excellent at these levels.  I am buying now, and will buy more at $5000, $4000, $3000, $2000, and $1000, if those levels are reached and nothing fundamental has changed. 
90% of this sub is bullish, and has been since 15k+.

People with real skin in the game are not so foolish. There is no way this isn't going to plummet further.
to get to $7,000, you first need to get through $6,300, $6,500, $6,800(something that we haven't been able to achieve numerous times)

the bear case, is imagine if this thing can't even break through $6,300...guess how low it'll go then?
Barts, Barts, Barts! 
Come on in Barts lovers! 
Here at the Titty Twister we’re slashing Barts in half! 
Give us an offer on our vast selection of Barts! 
This is a Barts blow out! 
Alright, we got white Barts, black Barts, spanish Barts, yellow Barts. We got hot Barts, cold Barts. We got wet Barts. We got smelly Barts. We got hairy Barts, bloody Barts. We got snapping Barts. We got silk Barts, velvet Barts, naugahyde Barts. We even got horse Barts, dog Barts, chicken Barts. 
C'mon, you want Barts, come on in Barts Lovers! 
If we don’t got it, you don't want it! 
Come on in Barts lovers!
To be fair I would not classify this as a Bart. The left side drop was not vertical, it was a sustained drop. Only the right side is vertical.
BatBarts too
Well it did behave like a shitcoin going up like crazy, this is the other side of that same coin.
Wow you're gonna love the next few months then aren't you... 
As long as bitfinex allows wash trading... It's gonna be shit
The only problem with that line of thinking is that a good number of (rich) people in the world still think BTC is pointless and has no value. It took humanity centuries to realize how valuable gold is. Of course I don't expect it to take that long for bitcoin but you have to realize that many people have built there entire wealth on the current financial system. They aren't going to move over to a new system just because you want them to and some might actively fight against it. Give it time. A new generation of people who find it valuable are using it and the next one will grow up with it and won't find it foreign or strange. 
Except it is a fucking shitcoin - Blockstream killed Bitcoin
See you in a few hours!
Considering this as well... how old are you?
I want to hear about your planned trip
Send us a postcard!
Of you don't care if you have made enough to retire and travel the world.  But have fun and crypto will be even less important to you very soon.
On a bull engulfing candle? There will probably be better short entries in the near future if that's your thing.
You keep doing this as an ironic joke but you literally haven't been wrong yet 

Haven't you realized you're jinxing it lol 
Xcept bitcoin
Just forget about the market cap for these utter shitcoins. I'm certain that most of the supply is locked up or in the clammy hands of some of the insiders and then it is just pumped on low volume. There isn't nearly enough liqudity to support those "valuations".
'disposable' incomes. If everyone has 1k in can they be bothered to take it out?
Weekly RSI currently at 40, we were under 40 for ~9 months from September 2014 to May 2015
[deleted]
Yes this is a completely different market than a year or two ago.  It used to be so easy to trade, and I said that couldn't last, and of course it didn't.
That’s not funny 
Dont let bitcoin drag you down, when it can drag you up.
I hope you aren't seriouse, I know how difficult this market is but suicide is not the answer.

Don't overlook these kind of messages guys, they might be legitimate, not a joke.
Good luck, Ron Burgundy.
this is actually sort of accelerating. Capitulation is soon. imo market's about to purge a bunch of people who bought in Spring-summer 2017 and never sold

Anyone else notice the high churn for this sub? It's like new people are interested every 3 weeks. But more interested in how low it's gonna go 
I didn't want to say it, but we may never see $6K again.   And yes that is obnoxious, but we had people saying the price would never be below $15K again as well.
No, all bets are off now. BTC is teaching fear, crypto newcomers now have to learn that it is not invincible. 
You can find those stats by looking up BTCUSDSHORTS and BTCUSDLONGS on tradingview.com
31103 BTC longs and 28450 BTC shorts. On ETH 154000 ETH longs and 190600 ETH shorts.
You CLICKED it?!? Oh no...
That column validates positions opened in real time. When a position is opened, the bot checks the prices in the last 15 minutes to see if the value used is valid.
If someone tries to open and close positions after the movements happened they won't be validated. 
hope you did not look 10 min later...
People got gigarekt.
Been looking at bitmex for a moment, and i swear, it was trading at good 250 bucks premium for a few minutes.
> we all know what happens next 

Another manipulated pump and dump that causes bulls to rebuy the top only to get dumped again to lower lows where they again lose massive amounts of $?
Was a squeeze on OkCoin
Selling BTC is like shorting it. So, shorts doesn't neccesarily need to go down for this to squeeze up, maybe it was sellers who sold to rebuy lower. 
6300 looks like the squeeze
April 12th is being summoned.
>  If I lose it all, so fucking what, it's only money

That depends on how much money and how much of your net worth it is. If it is 2%, then yes, it's only money.  If it is 70%, then having that attitude is most likely very foolish.  Money is food. Money is a roof over your head.
*When is the reversal tho? Could be never, like Nikkei chart someone posted below. I assume the money is paper, unrealized gain or loss.

RemindMe! 6 Months "Did it reverse?"
Do we know what the longs consist of ? Are they just single coins at 1x? I'm starting to feel these longs are part of someone/s narrative.
Markets are made of fear and greed.
Can you explain what this means?
Man... Trav is still at it? Should we look for his capitulation as the bottom signal?
What? No X-axis?
This doesn't tell you much. A lot of days were destroyed previously and those coins may very well end up in the float soon, if they haven't already. Increasing the supply *then* (bump in DD) can still have downward pressure effect *now*. Supply still works independently of days destroyed.
Could get another leg up, who knows.
I tend to agree I am afraid. Yesterday's whale needs to bring some friends to push the price to 6800 levels again to speak about a false breakout - bullish. 
relax bro.

they'll pump it again soon
Make it 6 months followed by a move up into another 6 months sideways bull.
BTC could trade sideways for 18 months without really starting another bull market.  Although a bull market is defined by 20% gain, so it will probably do that again before long and then crash even harder.
[deleted]
This is not a V shaped drop, we had slow bleed, if it goes up it'll do it slowly, before people will notice the bottom it'll be already 30% up.
I've just been looking at exactly the same thing: https://tvc-invdn-com.akamaized.net/data/tvc_d3cbf19753bf62e2a8dfe55cc6aafad1.png   
   
I think a safe play here would be going long at the next leg down if it makes a higher low with a tight stop just below the previous low. From the other side shorting a possible rally to 6800 with a tight stop just above and closing it if we don't make a lower low can also work out.
History does not repeat itself.  This is not 2014 or April.  Although all of the past bull markets do repeat and we are certainly due for another one soon.  It is inevitable because of BTC's history. /s
>I see the discount on futures has closed *significantly*.

I still see a 1% discount to spot...? 
What exactly does this mean?  Why is there a discount on futures?
I'm just going to point something out if you're burning yourself and not being successful Trading. If you want to load your bags up at 3 K there's really not a whole lot of difference with loading up at 6 k if the market is going higher. If you knew for a fact 3K was going to happen sure but no one does. We do know for a fact 6K happened and it's on a major support level. This 5800 thing is nothing. Unless you see a decisive blow through 5700 going to 5300 quickly we are still at support. That might break. Who knows. Back to my original point. The people who have made the most money in Bitcoin are the people who believe in the technology and accumulate coins at what they feel are good prices at a given time. We are 70% off the high right now. Could it go to 80? Absolutely. Could it bottom here and start slowly trending up? Absolutely. Reversals are probably the hardest thing for people to do. You can even look at Major hedge funds and that's where they get into trouble. Following the trend really isn't that hard. You can use a variety of technical indicators but even if you're wrong the trend will save you. At a reversal everything goes out the window. This Market is basically reverse bubbling right now. If you have the common sense to sell when you see a bubble on the upside you should have the common sense to start buying when you see a bubble on the downside. If you were really cautious you could even wait to see a decisive break of this ridiculous 12 EMA  pattern we've had for the past month. Not sure how many of you have noticed this but on the one-day chart the 12 EMA has been the most reliable technical indicator on bitcoin. It's bounced off of it every single time for the past month. Now eventually that is going to end but those of you who caught it early like I did made out alright I would imagine. Technical patterns constantly are changing in the market. I remember one time around 2005 the arms index was working every single time on the Dow. It was like Rock Solid reliable. Then one day it just quit. That's the nature of technical analysis and something you pick up with experience.  I  have a background in finance and I've probably read over a hundred books on markets and fundamental analysis and technical analysis and you know what, I'm in the hodl camp for the most part. Do you know why? Because I can back test that and it's been extremely effective. I can't however find any Traders from 2011 that are still trading today successfully. I'm not even sure how many are left from 2015. I'm not sure if you've ever read the book Candlestick charting explained but it has effective percentages of all of the major patterns. To make a long story short and most are around 50/50 give or take a few percent. So far since Inception Bitcoin has always taken out the prior high at some point and the best thing a person can do is buy when it's in a major downtrend. You can back test that to 2009 and it has worked every single time. It's boring. It doesn't seem sophisticated, but the back test percentage is better than any technical analysis out there
> Longs are still going up after this fall, which just seems crazy to me.

Shorts are dropping too though.  So both are expecting some kind of bounce, but I am staying short until further notice.
you could consider shorting futures.
Yes join the light side. Complex games with this much chaos is a fools errand.
No, that's a Lisa silly. 
So you’re telling me there’s a chance?
Remember not long ago how jubilant BTCoiners were when we were watching the run to 5k, not long after the China FUD which dropped us to 3k. This dispair is depressing and we’ll weather this storm 😎
[deleted]
"Win".  A crappy victory, but a victory none the less.
noone is saying this thing will go to $20K from here.

but a test of $6,500-$6,800 wouldn't be out of the question. 
Lol permabear
Very unlikely.
The reversal of the bear market?? Almost certainly not
Humble opinion: I think so.  Or close to it.
Sideways
danup
Both, as usual.
Yes.
Yes
No
It held super strong on Bitfinex.  There was really very little challenge to it...no sellers, especially of any size.
Already too late to sell. Just find ways to get fresh capital and buy when it’s a ghost town. BTC fundamentally hasn’t changed much, and looks to be getting better. I’m not covinced that this is the end, so many institutions are setting up shop to bring on whale investors
Sell low buy high
> I want to see that happen so bad. I'm taking loans to buy. Every dollar possible.

Dude..
/r/buttcoin is getting their popcorn ready. And I am too. 
> I taking loans to buy. I pawning things to buy. Every dollar possible.

O_O
Until the next absolute bottom 
Uh oh dude. Yeah what you mention could happen... or not. This is bitcoin and a lot of those investors you mentioned are burned, this market can stay irrational forever taking loans to catch the bitcoin knife in technical terms is called "ES" Extremely Stupid.
Time to go back to 1k.
You do realize that people have called "absolute rock bottom" at every $100 down from about $10K...if not from $20K.  

I don't sense any kind of upwards pressure and can't see this reversing unless there is a big dump of 15+% and then a big spike up.   And I still don't see it happening until below $5K.
Bearish
!RemindMe 3 Months "Yet another incorrect bottom call?  He said 5300."
YOLOing wsb style.
There is a not so hidden massive bullish divergence on the Daily
What do you mean? 
My degen bottom short from $6200 would've worked :P 


Puto*  
Punto is “point”
Should have stayed sober.
I still have three buy orders left, I've had them there for a while. One at $5800 (which, if the bottom is already in, I missed by a little), one at $5600 and $5400. I'm a little afraid to go to sleep, but I'm going to have to. Liquidation is at $4800, so...

^(I've made a horrible mistake.)
it's funny how volatility/interest is up lately since we're tanking, but the $7-10k range was completely dead in between big moves
Isn't that risky?  Could take another leg down.
what are you seeing that suggests algos are off right now?
just place your buys all the way down, don't spend it all at one price

Nobody knows. I've bought a lot of dips but right now I'm staying on the sidelines. I'm keeping what I've got already and if we hit $5k (which of course we may never do again) I'll consider going back for more. If you're considering going in there's no harm in putting in half now, then half later if we go lower. Or go all in.  Entirely your call.  Good luck 
https://www.cftc.gov/dea/options/financial_lof.htm

You can search for "bitcoin"
Spring would be higher, to at least half the trading range, which was for a longer period between 6300-6735. Check my "unevolved" Wyckoff [here](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8ronjo/daily_discussion_sunday_june_17_2018/e0u326p/)

If this goes around 6400-6500 and there is no retracement, or retracement downward is with little volume, that will be then an actual spring.
Not so sure.  There was a lot of sell volume greater than 1btc, but not so much buy volume.

Even now with the price going up, sells > 1btc have more total volume than buys > 1btc.

https://trading.gear54.me/tradeflow/
I bought 5815 but the low on the exchange I was at was 5777 I think. Close enough but I don't consider it the bottom. Good luck to us both.

Also, don't worry too much about others. You don't want to base it on something as trivial as "oh when people make fun of me and I won, that means every time someone making fun of me, I must be doing it right".  Analyze each decision independently. 
Everyone thought there could be a bounce there. There can always be a bounce after a 10% down day.

And the price dropped 1% below your entry price, so you did not buy the bottom.
Do you think a reversal would begin with making fresh lows for the year?
We bounced from 7100 to 7700 and again from 6100 to 6800... What kind of bounce are you hoping for in a bear market when the buyers have dried up?
Username checks out
time to go long walmart
moment of truth, the support is pretty heavy until 5500
Do you feel like you are having a bad dream?

Maybe it's "a nightmare on bitcoin street" lol
You have an ascending triangle on there. It's actually a rising wedge.
Massive volume reversal V bottom that we haven't seen in a while. That's why. 
Probably. It wouldn't surprise me if we make a small rally in the 6-7k range before plummeting further.

Buy-in entry is just a gamble. 
I don’t know man, depending on where the day closes, that is a pretty big wick 
I feel like Pavlov is ringing the bell, but the dish is empty.
Funny how people are already saying it's the bottom of the entire bear market...some never learn.
6800+
Turns out it really is barts all the way down.
It's a battle between 1h EMA support and 15m Ema resistance 
Shorts have gone down for the past 24 hours? Not sure what you mean. Also, longs have gone up for the past 24 hours. I think it is a bit early to see a relief rally but not impossible. 
I think we'll see a BGD today.
I hope they all get completely obliterated for good with a mega green dildo. 
imo no way its the public as based on my friend/fam/co-workers they are def not buying and if anything can't wait to sell, but its good news for sure even though so far this year, the volume and price have been crapy
The public has nothing but scorn for BTC right now, they are generally more dismissive than ever and will probably not change their minds until they see someone "official" saying it is a good idea, and following suit. 
Folks waiting on those wire transfers to hit the exchanges tomorrow ;)
Would you rather have 1 btc for $18k or 3 for $6k each?

Also, at least add a 'probably' in that statement? 
> At some point it will break ATH's again 

ummm....nope.  There is some probability that it will break ATH again, but it sure isn't 100% or even remotely close to it.
Why would BTC break ATH again?
Yes, I was calling moonshots at $200 after a 80% crash back in 2014 I just can't help it, a now I also have a bank account full of digits as confirmation bias, so it's even harder.
It's a complicated signal. There were people in the 2015 dailies calling for $10,000 at $200. 


It refers to the majority. There'll always be a minority making bullish noises no matter how hard the price is rogering them. 
Between December 2008 and October 2014, your nation's central bank added $4 trillion to the money supply. Guess it is normal...
Those BTC are mostly bought up in mining contracts. Locabitcoins volume alone is almost enough to cover that, too.

What I wonder at is the added inflation from alts.
May last year:

Some people here saying there is going to be a serious move up. But the price has already increased from $200 to $3k. The serious move has already happened. Perhaps price will go up further, but imo this is selling territory. The sentiment has really swung from bear to bull. The higher the price the better the selling opportunity.
I favourited this post for meme-worthiness
Would you say an additional 25-40% from here would be significant?
EOS is the top coin by volume on Upbit.  more than 3 times the volume of #2 Tron, and 4 times the volume of BTC.

[Edit] ETH is still king when it comes to smart contracts.  EOS has about 3 times the volatility of BTC so great for scalping.  
How do you read a drop of over 300% as "buying territory"? Its not even 6k anymore. Itd be a seriously dumb move by anyone to be buying right now. It cant even go 1 day without dropping, much less reverse.
do you care to show us your "analysis"?
It's a challenge on its own staying sane in this market.
Dollar cost averaging is the only way to go for most.
You need to look at the aggregation of buy/sale orders on an exchange. Last night the order book was very thin on the sell side and very thick all the way down on the buy side. I had a pretty good inkling it was going up, and def. not going further down right away.
I think it's 30 days after which you need to sign in again on a trusted device. 
I would keep the window open constantly if I were you, though computer sleep, etc. is ok. They're pretty lenient about timeouts so you should be alright for a while.

I'd also go ahead and open Pro at some point to prepare for the transition. If you do it in the same browser, and you've logged in there before, you might get lucky and have the same session authenticate you in to there as well.

Don't forget your backup codes for 2FA...if you have access to those, or can get in touch with someone who does, you're good to go (you can set up identical 2FA on another mobile phone, or even another computer since the 2FA code generator is open source and widely available).
GDAX closes on June 29th, they sent email yesterday. You'll have to switch over to Coinbase Pro by then. 
Cryptowatch is used by a lot, but that's also browser I think
I'm trying drakdoo(android don't know if it's running on ios) since few weeks, not perfect, took a few times to catch how to navigate market and coin but it's pretty and quick! 
You can't kill a bull. You can, however, kill a bear.
How lol
6-1 tho 
Up from what point? 5900?
Gimme a break. There is no hope left.
Double bottoms rarely work out. It will most likely break and then a new downtrend will begin. Sub 1000 is likely this year. 
You where on a roll there with the clever names, what happened? Didn't like "Catch it"?
Also that "bounce" or BGD some expect might never materialize. We may stay in chop city here close to goblin town for months or even years and slowly creep upwards.
What bounce?  Are we watching the same chart?
That’s because it hasn’t gone low enough yet. Simple as that. $0.1 -$4000 :)
I do some trades but with my cold storage i want to go out in a fucking glorious life changing boom. So i keep adding up and will add shit tons more on the way down until hopefully the top of the next bubble. I’m well aware that a new bubble might not happen or that i might have to wait 10-20 years for that epic day of sell. IRL I’ve owned a few businesses and still do so I’m used to taking risks in life and everyone who owned a business knows that no matter how well is your business plan, you can lose it all. The risk I’m putting in BTC is nothing compare to the shit I’ve could’ve lost on my other adventures and the reward might be X10 times better
> Surely the smarter thing is to go short and pick up more coins.

The history of bitcoin is littered with people who had this plan, and then never got back in again.
Hi, permabull here. I'm calm and married to my cold storage holdings because this is nothing compared to the mt gox implosion and being a bull during those dark **years** made me rich in the end. So I guess my behavior is conditioned. That being said I don't hate any player at all I did cash out a good chunk and I short with my trading stash when I feel like it.


I'm not one, but It's an investment strategy in stocks, and btc. Warren Buffet claims he never sells unless he needs the money. If you look at btc it's died like this 4 or 5 times and come back much stronger...If you were a perma bull, bought btc in 2010, and never sold, youd be happy about that decision. You never had to stress about the decision or where to buy back... you just sat back relaxed and got rich.
1) I hate taxes, 2) F**k you that's why!

No seriously, I suck at trading.
I know for me, selling incurs large long-term capital gains and then resets me into short term when I buy back. I just hold and I'll sell when we hit my price targets, simple.
I hold cos it’ll go up as soon as I sell. 
bottom is in.
why on your weekly chart btc made 4 red candle in a row after ATH?

this is what i see on bitfinex btc/usd weekly chart on tradingview:
https://www.tradingview.com/x/42hLyBSH/ 
There's a difference between a bull market and a counter trend rally. A transition from bear to bull takes a lot of time.
[deleted]
'Capitulation' happened long time ago. There are right now fewer buyers than supply coming from miners and ico coins, that's why the price is more or less just going straight down. It's likely to do this until equilibrium is found and things stabilize, then we might see a runup again, as much of the fiat from folks who sold long ago is waiting for that stabilization before commiting.

(This is ofc just a theory, but I think it's by far the most likely story. Don't forget that BTC is not the only constantly mined coin out there.)
Not even remotely close.  There will be total carnage and bodies strewn about everywhere when it is capitulation time.  Also, the price will be much lower.  You don't get capitulation on a day when the price drops 2 or 3%.
confucius say: He who pick bottom get stinky finger
look down
The floor's still looking for the bottom, last I heard.
420 is a very spiritual limit
We are literally just starting the 6k breakdown. The bottom is *far* lower
Sure. It could bounce at $5 but it has to at some point...
It already bounced yesterday..and many large bounces since $10K decline.
I feel like it would've bounced back harder if this was bottom.
Do you mean tempting to buy?
Not untill sub 2k, thats for sure. 
When was the last time suicide hotline got thousands of upvote ?
Sell volume will be picked up slowly if there are no bounce, just like the last drop and multiple ones before that. 
Eth's low was ~$360 this year....
That was a 7.3% drop on Finex from $6259 to $5800.  So probably getting close to oversold. 

But the solid break of $6000 is huge and just don't see this recovering anytime soon.
So the millions upon millions sitting in tether and on exchanges can’t buy any btc we’re waiting for the wires?
I was thinking this too. If there’s no increase in buying pressure once Europe and East Coast deposits hit then that’s not a good sign imo.
Why?? 
There's no upwards pressure whatsoever yet. But the downward pressure (which is strong) seems to have to struggle more and more. Interesting times.
Drunk?
Is this a bot?
It just did (@ 5879)..  I'm legitimately feeling sick watching the charts.
It's been absolutely insane.
First time the 3D RSI is below 35 too since early 2015. Weekly also about to cross into oversold. Nothing indicates a bullish move here, but I'd be cautious shorting. 
that actually didn't happen..?

I can't see any period where that happened actually. Even in 2014
Always lock (at least some) profits 
Position updated with success.

* Position: long xbtu18

* Opening value: 6,070.00

* Average value: 5,935.00

* Leverage: 20.00X

* Stack: 25.00%

* PnL: -0.13%

[Check Open Positions](https://www.anotherbot.info/)


it needs to break $6,300 to start squeezing the shorts 
Squeezed me. Got in a new short @ 6280, 25x. This might be my last post.  
Edit: Not in the dramatic way.
move wasn't big enough to facilitate a squeeze yet.
Seeing as we were at 6200 only yesterday stops might not kick in until 6400 or so.
After the BGD the swaps have been trading at spot and funding is 0.01 again. So the discount on futures will shrink. The discount on futures only exists when theres large negative funding
I think we can bottom at $5300 before that. If we did get to $5k even though, the internet is gonna collectively lose their mind waiting and watching tick for tick as price battles the buy wall at $5k. Imagine the memes.
Why is he relevant? 
And in his prime he would've been ICOing it until his arse exploded. 
Guy looks like a stick of pepperoni.
Thank the gods, we were almost without FUD.
He says there won't be liquidity to cash out, right? Kinda silly considering btc has seen many a dump before and there's never been a lack of liquidity. Although I guess we're at prices far higher than we've ever been...

It makes a bit more sense if you see btc like btc maximalists see alts. A lot of people agree and understand that a lot of lower tier alts will simply not have the liquidity to cash out, which is why coins like Nano are already hitting like 6% ATH. 
Why care about his opinion? he is not a trader, he is not a programmer or anything related to bitcoin. He is just a scammer and really good at selling bs.
Ask the same question in reverse. Why should we go up? Is bitcoin actually being used outside of speculation? not to mention the bear case of bitcoin still being outdated and useless under heavy load. All the other altcoins are still mostly vaporware. The only way I see crypto go up is mostly just centered around FOMO and Hype and that also runs out.
just because price goes down does not mean demand increases, bitcoin could go to 0 with no demand
That is nonsense, they have nearly unlimited funds and access to all the OTC coins they could want.

This idea that market makers will run out of coins is ridiculous, they are rolling in coins like Scrooge McDuck, look at those top wallets.

We are likely to keep going down because fewer and fewer people are getting involved , speculative value will only take you so far before the shine wears off, the music stops, and only the greatest fools are left without a chair. 

Until you have a fundamental shift to onroad new users you won't see a new ATH. Frankly, BTC (crypto in general) doesn't even have a good user friendly wallet! And we expect people to use it freely?!
Bitcoin will continue to drop as long as more people want to sell then buy, end of story.

Right now people are starting to lose their nerves.

Btw don’t try to rationalize the market because the market is irrational. Do some reading on DOW theory before making such comments. 
Only temporarily
Your volume-indicator must be bugged.
100% you won't get props here because it's nothing but haters.
breaking 9.9k
Lol, breaking 12K
What is defined as a capitulation pattern to you?
Just type in 5000 for the price. Take the amount of tether you want to spend and divide by 5000 to get the amount of satoshis.
If you're using all your tether just enter the price (5000) and click the "100%" button below "amount"
I don't think you technically "sell" Tether on Binance.  Are you sure you aren't referring to TUSD?
Somewhere in 2017. 
but you are just holding bags, you have no more fiat to buy :( truth hurts, doesnt it?
b-ch falling hard makes its bounce look more spooktacular. basic maff.
The more illiquid a market is, the more volatile it is.
Price is arbitraged on the BTC ratio still.
Bcash usually pumps and dumps harder than those two.  
I'd go so far as to call it "critical" .
Not sure why down voted. Lower lows still coming weekly. 
> we are tracing out

ain't tracing anything
Yea the price is the same as it was yesterday, down for the week, and a new low achieved for the year.  You guys sure showed those bears  👌👏👌
Yeah, i already sold into this pump. 
its all about stop losses. 

you see the price consolidating? And you aren't sure how it'll go? let it ride, but set a stop loss $100 below the current price. So if it breaks downwards, you get out before the rest of the dump happens.

the dumps have been massive, it doesn't just drop down a hundred bucks any more, it drops down $500. And this isn't a bull market yet where people stop loss hunt before a move up. 

if you call it right and the price barts up, congrats, move up your stop losses and repeat the process. 

Look this is why you're a bad trader. Losing your temper and posting stupid comments. 

Take this as a lesson and move on... One simply doesn't attempt to short a 6 months bottom without the risk of being raped.
Judging by this post and your comment history , I'd say your a little upset for missing this bounce.

Edit: also wtf does LUL stand for? Laughing up loud? Laughing under loud? Laughing umbrella loud?
It never ends.  4K could be the bottom for the next 12 months and then could be 2k in 2 years.
Those deflationary central bank policies tho
Pretty sure the 100 BTC buy wall at 5800 on Binance was pulled
Oh shit guys. 100ppl said it's not the bottom on a shorting sub. It must be true. 
The poll was literally 4 hours ago. The day is still very young my friend.
are you trying to start a rumor right now
Are you thinking of Goldman Sachs predicting $2800?

https://www.bloomberg.com/news/articles/2018-03-16/bitcoin-s-death-cross-looms-as-strategist-eyes-2-800-level
Traders and TA folks have been talking and speculating about this breakdown for months now... It's not like this came out nowhere...
If whales/some people are already aware of something, once the news become public it might already too late to sell, and the price might be due to a bounce. 
My sympathies. If I'm reading your post correctly you've been holding onto crypto for one of its worst dumps from all time highs in btc december and alts after that.

If you're looking for quick advice on how to regain your lost investment, there is none.
Touching Bcash is not a smart move...
Bcashers deserve to lose money.
Said the guy holding an underwater short...
What are you talking about it already did...
for upwards movements it's called hype.
Is there a name for hodlers who come to post "great buying opportunities" and try to spread FOMO whenever the price tanks harder than usual?
A greater supply requires greater demand to increase prices.

It required less demand relative to supply to get to ~$6100 before than it requires now to maintain it.
Sub 100k
> MTGOX will suddenly add 137k BTC & BCH to the market in a short period of time. 

That's a long ways away. You can follow it all here: https://www.reddit.com/r/mtgoxinsolvency/comments/8t0lbq/latest_update_22_june_2018_civil_rehabilitation/

Also civil rehabilitation means they might just payout in crypto to those who have made crypto claims. 
> MTGOX will suddenly add 137k BTC & BCH to the market in a short period of time.

Not until mid to late next year, most likely.  And most probably won't dump their BTC when they receive it, although some will.  

> This explains the recent price decline

Ummm...no.

Source?
Source?
Source?
have sauce?
I personally think most of the people that receive their Gox coins will hold them. They might even buy more coins with the Fiat they receive from the settlement. Most Gox users are early adopters who believed in the tech. If you're gonna spread FUD, spread the right FUD...

What's more unsettling to me is we've been dumping since the "probe into manipulation" news came out at 9.9k. I also think Tether's escapade with the whole "questionably unethical **law** firm" screams of desperation. There's probably some fraud behind the scenes that will eventually be brought forth.


Okay, interesting theory, and I think you are forming your thoughts around too many assumptions. Looking at the buying pressure @6000 and just below makes me think whales don't want the price to drop to 5K levels or below. And what I understand is MTGox will distribute the BTC to their claiming customers and not sell it for fiat. With your theory it would be a high risk for whales to find out the price does not drop in 2019 (long long time for BTC) and see their stack shrink by 2-5x
Work on your entry next time
Think you are mad at the wrong people. If anything, your fellow traders help the market become more of a market rather than a manipulated whale controlled BS thing that it is now, lol.
I hope you don't lose yours or if you do you didn't need it.

it genuinely sucks seeing people lose a lot of money they needed. 
Someone is underwater, very salty water it seems
Im sorry. I will stop now.
why don't you buy more to try and reverse the trend?  If you can't because you were already all-in, why should anyone feel bad that your attempt at finding the greater fool failed?
You think delaying the way to the floor is a good thing?
There are real life consequences here that are nothing to laugh about. There have already been people posting about losing everything on the edge of suicide past. Even though investing too much is their responsibility this is in my eyes not a laughing matter. People are naive and make unintelligent decisions but the consequences can be REAL. Leaving families destroyed. 
Aren't you one of the moon kids?
Is this some kind of revenge post or something? Were you the one shorting BTC back in November 2017?
I think it would be much more cruel (and cheaper to do) to bring this shit back up to 7k, as in, now. That would confuse so many people. 
The bigger this crash the less BTC looks like a SoV. So no. 
As a lambo kid. No.
If right now is not the best opportunity to buy, it’s the best opportunity to sell. If you recognize that you should not be buying because you believe the price will go lower, why on earth did you hold from 9,000 down to $5800. You should have sold yesterday, the day before the day before the day before.. and so on. Not to late to start today though. 
When extreme bear circle jerking overruns the board don't bother too much arguing about it, just take the chance to quietly accumulate your opposite position.
noone likes the "i told you so"-posts!
sorry but your op was a shitpost even if you were right
LOL, stfu!
Or you set a stop loss at 5k, it touches 5k for a moment and then swings the other way never to touch 5k again. And you lose coin. 

You’re speaking with hindsight bias. No one knows what the price is going to do. 
You can believe in bitcoin and still profit off its downside, they're not mutually exclusive concepts. I think the moon is still in the forecast over the long term, but I'm not gonna miss obvious shorting opportunities waiting for it.
What if it hits $4900 then takes off? 
-73% portfolio
Bought most of Altcoins 25.11.-19.12.2017

No more fiat :( :(
I bet no one did like you at school lmao
> I'm not one to say I told you so

can't imagine how bad it'd be if you were, since you've said this about 15 times now
Deluded or 99% liquidated? 
I'm confused by the timing here
> hope you didn't miss the ticket for the next bull-run

The more downvotes I see here, the more bullish I get.
the more downvotes; the more money i make
Gox did them a favor and now they are getting victimized by this market.  
no, its just bubble popping
Could be any whale who is scared of being the last great fool standing
It's really just prolonging the inevitable. I just hate watching water boil.
Followed by a BGD to wipe out the get rich quick shorters. Then we can begin anew.
People who shorted at $17K with high leverage are getting rich quick.
To what zero? Give me a break with this it's going lower. I got it, that I can see that, make a definitive statement.
He strikes again!
Also bought. Didn't think it was bottom though.
You can send me a half a Bitcoin if you want to
1AYyNfzDGjKJPiC2Q5fz5J85QyKKXkM6pf
I'm looking through it, and it does't seem like the sentiment gets to what the bears describe as blood on the streets. There actually appears to be more bulls than bears compared to now. I encourage people to check it out for themselves since I am probably biased.
F!
He has increased his posting rate recently. I’ve also been watching this as an indicator :)
You know, when I look back, I never realized that the capitulation wicks happened *very* fast.

It was like $270 to $160 in 2 frickin days. Then back up to like $229 in another day.

That's insane!!! it's like $6000 to $3600 back to $5100 in THREE days. :O
Mr Craphole, can you please call the bottom when applicable? I recall that is your specialty?!. 
Thanks brahhh
or a stop loss at 6260
big green dildo

used to be $1,000 move in 5 minutes. But now adays, people call any green candle that's more than $100 one
Big green dildo!
big green dildo
Chewie is that you??
LOLOL 
Lol. So you're nor buying here? What's your desired entry?
Bullseye, gonna try stop watching prices so often and set the alarms for my layers. Thanks 
Which is why it was so easy for Jihan to cripple Bitcoin with fees and hash when he manipulated bitcointrash into relevance.
The worst case scenario is that if there is a drop in difficulty (i.e. drop in competition from, say, it no longer making economic sense to mine...) any large miner can 51&#37; attack the network like what happens with the tiny alt-coins. The usual scam there has been gutting an exchange by double-spending on them. It's potentially devastating AND short-term lucrative enough to be appealing if you think the party's over.
You could've told me :-P

I was close to closing at 5.8 but was in the car last 5h so was a bit surprised by that green candle...

Don't know what to do, but I think if this gets again under 6k then we're far from bottom...
Position closed with success



* Position: short xbtu18

* Opening value: 6,747.00

* Average value: 6,757.33

* Closing value: 5,950.00

* Leverage: 3.00X

* Stack: 50.00%

* PnL: 11.70%

[Check Open Positions](https://www.anotherbot.info/)


[deleted]
[deleted]
[deleted]
It's called securing profit. It's what everyone should do.
2.150 USD is how much I tip the workers at my local ice cream shop.
But the ratio is not recovering for ETH and LTC. My ratio shorts are in more profit than last night
BTC lead the charge last year on it’s amazing run up leaving LTC & ETH in the dust... don’t think they broke out until after 15K BTC (give or take).
Yes but the ratios are what I'm talking about haven't recovered. I kind of agree with you...but I'm trying to discern whether or not I'm hoping just to close lower or really believing it'll go lower hmm
[deleted]
Many of us turned bots off as it's dropped. It's probably just significantly fewer actually trading. 
LTC has always been useless, has nothing to do with BCH. And really, BCH is useless for the same reason.
Wat
That's basically what happened in 2014, too...I mean it went to like 3% of ATH didn't it lol 
Bcash lmao
Charlie Lee needs to buy back in from selling @ ATH, otherwise I fear doom. 
the difference is that a bitcoinist may use LTC for fast/cheap tranfert, but collaborate with BCH? never
I'm buying every drop below 5k.
[deleted]
I honestly can't tell. It's a dedicated LARP if he's actually roleplaying. 

He could've been a really good trader fucking around and shorting every time he longed. It would've been incredibly profitable actually. 

That's at least what I'll tell myself so I'm not sad at thinking he was legitimately that silly 
lol I can't tell if the dude was LARPing or legitimately that bullish. 

I really want to laugh but if he genuinely just capitulated it's kind of sad.
Wait, really? Was that their slogan or something?
Fascinating in that it will be removed from centralised exchanges at some point and see its value drop through the floor.

It's already happening in Asia.
machiavellic plan. I preemptively placed 21MBTC order at 0.01$ 
It's when people are desperate to sell regardless of the price
Wouldn't that be a sign, or at least what people would expect, for a V recovery, though? 
no capitulation comes after 1 % slow bleed per day for days
But isn't this more of a snow ball effect, increasingly gaining momentum? It has to start somewhere.

(Myself I am not saying anything. This is just an exercise in seeing what the vox populi is).
Right...

Edit: No disrespect intended, I just find it hard to see a drop of 50% in a week at this price, but can definitely see it dropping 50% in the next month if shit gets real grim.
How the fuck is that an octopus? Where are his legs?

AND WHY DO YOU THINK THAT IS CUTE? 
You said it, man.
Chicken and egg. We had a Vish bounce because people wanted to buy sub 6K. Fundamentally there isn't any difference between now and then. Hell, we just learned that Gox isn't selling but distributing coins and that tether might actually be legit. That was all major FUD and people were more bullish then.
Exactly, the lower it goes, the cheaper the coins, the higher the volatility, more liquidity. This doesn't smell of an engineered bottom it smells of a bulltrap short squeeze. Whenever the market is left to do what it want you see low volume sideways; that tells you all you need to know about what everyday people are doing in this space. 
Big money can only influence the market short term. Long term, the market will go where it wants to go. Bull and bear cycles are a result of the masses.
There are whales on both sides, so I don't think it's as easy as you think. It's easy to move the price, for a few days or maybe even weeks but hard to move the market which wants to go up. I'm frankly astonished that we're still above 6k given the scale and ferocity of this dump.
You seen Office Space (y2k comedy)? Reminds me of the guys reading a dictionary on 'Money Laundering' and then asking the first black guy they see if he knows how. They end up with a bunch of magazine subscriptions. Not ideal. 
Such a load of shit huh, glas you are calling it out
What do you mean?
In set-up like this, yes.  Here are some things I look for to know that the divergence may play out for several candles instead of just 1 candle:

Cascading Divergence:  This is when there are set-up for stronger divergence that will play out if weaker divergence succeeds.  For instance, right now we have a set up for MACD bull div on the 1 day and 3 day.  If we get 1-2 more green candles then these will confirm and may also play out.

Resistance Levels:  Look for nearby resistance levels.  If there is no major resistance then the div will likely continue to play until resistance is found.  **Resistance levels are the most logical place to take profit after entering a trade based on divergence.**

Bear Div:  Look for bear divs forming.  A bear div on the same timeframe (in this case, the 1 day) is a sure sign that the party is over.  You can often see the trend bounce between bull and bear with div's showing the end of each.  Here is an example from the last 3 months ('d' and pink lines are the daily rsi divs): https://www.tradingview.com/x/Fn0XJCzI/  We didn't quite get a bear div in march but if we had then it would been a nice game of div ping-pong there.  Even a bear div on 1/2 the timeframe could be your sign to exit your long.  I don't usually watch for hidden div but they can be a hint for determining an exit if you are trading momentum.  Here is a cheatsheet on regular vs hidden divergence: https://i.imgur.com/wVw4L6h.png

Forming Wedges:  When the price forms wedges it is less likely to have divergence.  Divergence is something that happens during price discovery, like following a break out from a wedge.  Not within a wedge.  If we are forming a wedge then stop looking for a bear div and start looking for an exit to your long at the top of the forming wedge.
You are still massively up on your initial investment.  It is impossible to time the top or bottom - you have done extremely well, and should be ecstatic, not in pain.  I missed out on half of my unrealized gains at the 20k top, but still made thousands of percent gains (some realized, some still unrealized)...it is unrealistic to expect to sell everything at the top except by sheer luck.
Ehh, I don't see how it's *more* bearish than the court agent holding it over everyone's heads waiting to sell at any moment.  A lot of the people receiving it will most likely have written it off as a total loss years ago, so why would they panic sell the moment they got it back?
Sweat to god I'll pistol wip the next person who says shenanigans
They temporarily disable wallets all the time, I very much doubt it's anything to be concerned about.

Just wondering if anyone knew why or when it would be back up.
Cool, thanks for letting me know. Usually dabble in Monero on there, so must have just missed BTC wallets being down before.
Haha. Tbf it could be "nothing" and still cause a price drop at this rate :)

All I know is their UI was playing up yesterday, and Bitcoin has now been disabled for about 7 hours.

Probably just Polo ****ing around though.
I think he meant that what needs to happen for the bulls. 


And that we can't drop down or we will lose this momentum. 
$6246 bfx
And this trade turned out profitable.

Short 25% of stack from 5935.

Let’s get it BB
If so we should see a 200-400$ Move down
8pm utc 
Bears take the stairs, bulls take the... BGD rockets?
I also expected real panic selling and dumping under 5.8k but the fact that it didn't happen is a bullish sign. I fully expect this to go lower eventually, this ain't over but you can only stretch a band so far before it snaps back. 

This green candle was almost 10%, not as insignificant as some here think. 
Yes I posted yesterday, there is no reason this can't be pumped to $8K before resuming the downtrend to new lows.  And no, that wasn't any brilliant statement..it should be obvious to all.  This market is so heavily manipulated that difficult to impossible to forecast short-term moves with much accuracy.
The trend is your friend until it ends. And what is a chart? It's an expression of human emotions, it IS alive. 
Bro didn't you notice an eight week downtrend? I'd say that's enough bearish momentum for a deathcross that basically shows you what already happened. 
yeah the absolutes it not so important, all is within a 200$ range to both sides anyway I think but yes
Seriously. We have a lot of decimal points to work with here. A unit name is just a unit name.
True, another 3 zeros. Gets rounded to the nearest sat on settlement
Yup. I was horribly wrong.
This sub is so jealous of alt coins 
Care to name a few? 
[deleted]
Yeh do not sell here, just become a bag holder if you bought way above.
it's mostly the noobs. veterans are hodling and buying.
Guess so but who's to say what if just keeps dropping and we keep saying the same thing ending up holding for no reason 
Why? $5900 is a lot of money. You can do a lot with it. There are a TON of people still who bought BTC below 1k. Selling now is still a 500%+ return
Anyone who becomes "fucked" by not selling their btc owns too much btc. 
Thank you for not letting survivorship bias ruin the sub!
The deeper we go, the more I bought.
Lurkingnnew calm down bro it's gonna be ok
Hah at this point they can buy the bank.  At least until the SEC comes knocking.
I don't follow EOS very closely aside from hearing the sketchy shit they do. I'm just hyped the day it will be listed on Binance. Gonna be a good bloodbath. 
Me down 95%....did I cure you guys?
My college admission is due in December...wish me luck.
[deleted]
The market won’t turn around until - you - envy the pizza guy for getting a cheap pizza for only 10k Bitcoin.
It's the Dark Knight

[https://www.tradingview.com/x/jHjNZiqt/](https://www.tradingview.com/x/jHjNZiqt/)
I don't want to get crucified so I want give my full opinion but one of these guys appear to be fighting a lot harder to go up then the other.
More shorts have closed after that candle than during it.  Surprisingly, it was not at all caused or amplified by a squeeze.
To be fair I’m not optimistic at all about Bitcoin in the long term. I find the concept interesting and I genuinely like the concept of a decentralised currency, which is why I’m here in the first place. I just also think you’re absolutely delusional if you think Bitcoin is going to become some kind of revolutionary new global currency. 
Cheers for the reply. Now dumb question, but where did you find my post? It's not popping up for me anymore where I posted it, which was Bitcoin markets/daily.
Yes. Not nearly enough despair this time around. Makes me think we are far from the bottom. 
Yes it would bounce back to 50 USD and you would be not so happy still with any long from here
Government issued crypto is the antithesis of what BTC stands for. BTC will also be the last one standing as it has endured the most and has the highest security. 
I think you have a fundamental misunderstanding about cryptocurrencies
This. They're the same people who will jump back in when the government, wall steet, etc.. tells them it's okay / not a ponzi, etc.. They just need to lick their wounds for a little bit before returning to the pit.
I was aware of that, while writing it. But in saying that, if I wrote it while we were mooning you could say the same thing, no?
What do you mean by decentralization? Is a project that has a foundation decentralized? Seems to me that decentralization is yet another marketing buzzword
That's the paradox with the space.  The blockchain isn't supposed to generate revenue.  Well only in the form of mining.
Yeah. In a way you could almost be quite cynical. Why invest in something that will only make the early adopters increasingly wealthy with their thousands of Bitcoin, while I pay a small fortune for just the 1.
We have a multi-Billion Market... “They” predicted we were heading for a multi-trillion crypto market cap, and indeed it did look that way... six months later, POP :(
Yeah I heard it's possible to ride a Segway mount. 
To be clear, i was saying blockchain is good and I believe in it. Don't know what the down votes are for. 
Blockchain is just a hyped up buzzword closely synonymous with slow database
The real trick no one does is buy high sell higher and sell low buy lower :) 
I’d rather not be blamed for their rookie mistakes. Lucky for me they told me after they bought and didn’t asked for my advice to do so. 
Until he broke even, then he would feel better and hodl for longer 😉
Somehow after all they have been through, this drop was much more painful for them. One of them is a very rich guy and he invested a really small amount comparing to IRL, he really shouldn’t care about it and i don’t even get why he did it, he definitely didn’t need the money. This is the very definition of weak hand, he could’ve easily forget about it for a few years or lose it all without any impact but he pulled out, because he is weak. The other friend is just retarded and if he sold it’s probably the bottom for the same reason that when he bought it was the top

Edit: both of them will be back, i have no doubt about it
Agreed. Several friends of mine have been turned off to Bitcoin and the broader idea of cryptocurrency over the last 30 days. Not sure exactly what the trigger was, but it's noticeable.
They're weak hands if they buy back higher; if they leave the market altogether I wouldn't judge 'em
They are done paying at a premium is what I think you meant 
You've got it backwards. People shorting are following a trend, not causing it
> many normies will abandon crypto entirely to never return. 

Is it really never though? What do they do once price is above what they sold at? What do they do when price is above what they first entered at?
If most of the shifts took place in China it could still make sense. 

But this would depend on the distribution of hashing power across the globe. 

Where does most of the mining take place right now?
That's kind of the point, however mining at a loss could be sustained for a short period of time if the expectation is that the price will resume upwards after. That being said, the economic incentive to mine if also subject to opportunity cost for time invested, a premium for risk involved, and cost of depreciation/maintenance of assets. As this premium is minimal as of now, and will keep decreasing as price drops and difficulty increases, we should be seeing a drop in hashrate, yet this hasn't occurred yet. 
Absolutely true, and probably already is the case. However, hedging can't persist in perpetuity, right? Mining operations running at a loss will have to make adjustments to their structure to render it profitable again. 
Yea I mean my plan was mainly to see what the market did around $6200-6300. We could still set a higher low but I'm not as worried about waiting to see what it does now that funding is back to normal. 

Still generally think this has more room to drop- trying to remain objective about it though. 
[deleted]
Yea, pretty cringey. 
Some people really don't understand how many other people who bought from 2013-early 2017 are sitting on paper profits. 

Saw some dude in /r/litecoinmarkets say he cashed out the last he intends on cashing out

>I'm all out. Turned $15k to $600k at peak. Leaving with about $120k including the previous profit taken. I'll get back in when the market looks good. Have to protect my future. If we go much lower I'll have problems paying bills. For now I'm safe.

This is ~~quite literally the only~~ the primary reason for the bear market. No conspiracies necessary. When people stop buying, people start cashing out and protecting profits. It compounds upon itself. The people asking "who's selling here?" are either extremely underwater or will likely sell a lot lower when it nears their entry 
ETH ratio absolutely dumping...down from .077 to .073 in 12 hours
Tether to flip Bitcoin?
no... buy
~~Te~~There no need to be upset.
Thanks. Yeah, I think that's more or less how it'll play out, very similar to the last bear market. Anything can happen in this space though, and bitcoin tends to do whatever it wants price-wise. 

Full disclosure, I've always been very bullish on bitcoin since I learned about it, and my price targets have always been in the six-figure territory (7-figure is too bullish for me lol).
That.
F
3 beers in and my crystal ball TA says so. 6025 is the absolute lowest. 
LOL! NOPE. Want to bet me money?
This isn't gonna happen. 

!remindme 6 months
A lot f people in here weren’t ready to just buy in yet. Maybe this one dildo could change the minds of a lot of people and caus a rimple effect
it was a 10 million btc buy wall being manipulated up and down the order book by a bot..
Some good truths in this comment.
LOL. That's not my point. However, you are in heavy denial if you don't think random pumps of that proportion aren't heavily from one single market maker (or makers working with eachother).

My point is - if people were SO adamant on 3K less than 24 hours ago. How can you say that a bounce (although large) is enough to end it from continuing down? Seems to me the logic of it hitting 3K was lost if opinion can be so easily changed. 

Obviously buyers helped with the BGD, I'm not disagreeing with that but the majority of it was likely from a market maker.
Me too.  But, and I don't really know enough about TA to back this up and this is definitely based on feeling, other times this has happened it usually slowly bleeds away throughout the day and we're back where we started.  If this is largely just only one whale, then is that real support?
Didn't short bud. Nice try though. 👍🏻 I'm just speaking the facts. 
>it was weird

Things are rarely weird, I think we only use that term when things don't make sense at the time but later when when we have the benefit of hindsight they make sense. 
>Adele

Aha?
yeah there's the part where the boy jumps over the creek why is my hope based on something so stupid
Open the link he provided and scroll down to where it explains how it works
i've been doing this too long to take advice from people who hold during a bear market.
Hey CG, still holding your short from this morning?  This is some crazy manipulated BS, I tell ya man.
So.. a technical bart?
You mean I can't trust my BM dailies' consortium?
Maybe try 6087? No point overpaying that $1
And it hasn't been a year since then yet so...
It's bitcoin gold's silver dude! /s
If I had to guess, LN compatibility with a 4x increase in block meaning the start up costs of channels will be low even if it takes off
Correct. Wait until 3 more months or 3 years of slow bleeding comes. Then we’ll see how you feel about it. 
I don't think anyone can be quite sure when a good time to buy is, but considering bitcoin is worth as much as someone else is willing to pay for it - I thought $7500 was a cheap price, why not continue my strategy and buy at even better price?

I've been playing this game since mid 2015, and a lot of the time buying around the prices I've deemed "cheap" has been extremely profitable.

Doesn't always work out as planned but obviously it's a risk/reward I'm comfortable with, and in this market movements like this are just noise. I am not convinced our long term bull trend is over.
Ok, since you asked nicely
Correct, reversal bullish signal. The support line that I drew is a little optimistic, so I wouldn't bet on it
reversal signal if they break up with high volume
I agree
Good point, after adjusting the support line, it looks more like a parallel channel :(
If you use futures, there are no fees except taker fees.
Not really imo. The price fluctuations at that time were extremely volatile, logarithmic almost. 
This entire sub is bearish. Wtf are you reading lol...
Hardly 90% is bullish.  Sentiment has become discernably more bearish throughout the decline.  It is impossible to say how far the trend continues, but when people begin to say it is certain we go further down, the bottom appears close. 
Well, yes but you could've said the same thing in Feb and April. My post presented a setup that's provided opportunities in recent past. I think we're ultimately going lower, but the short-medium term is what is harder to predict. I'm just pointing out that part of a recipe for a counter-trend rally are beginning to materialize.
Can we get a Milhouse plez
3k -> 20k in 6 months = legitcoin

20k -> 6k in 6 months = shitcoin
By the way, it sucks immensely that for the first time retail people have the opportunity to build wealth (by one time event called bitcoin) and distribute it much better. It takes nothing but holding the damn thing.

It seems it's going to go the usual way buy allowing top 1% to buy in cheap again, and retail investors are going to transfer more wealth to them in the next bubble by buying in too late. Of course it was a pipe dream all along.
Hm, I heard someone say it was at 35. I was on mobile so I couldn't verify for sure, but I edited. Thanks. Haven't really paid much attention to the charts lately since bitcoins been behaving exactly as expected and am completely fine riding out my September contract position.
\>And now they dampen the downside and make for a soft landing.

Yes, only 70&#37; down so far.
Still very easy to trade. Just short instead of long lol
Yeah, agreed on the churn, lots of new names, but unsure what that means. I mean people coming here to en masse short bitcoin would normally lead me to think the bottom is in. But... Then there is the lower highs and lower lows...

I don't know if we will have a complete flush down, though, to be honest. I think that is too much free lunch for bottom shorters. Traders will make too aggressive shorts get burned. But you my friend, you are banking right now! 
Spring? We were still in the 1K range in the spring last year. You really think we're going that low? 
You’re using other people’s baseless predictions as a justification for your own baseless prediction?
Oh honey...
never say never.

as long as bitfinex and tether are in business anything is possible. I honestly expect a $1000 15 minute candle any moment now(seriously)
>people saying the price would never be below $15K again as well.

You mean for like a whole week? 
Price has a ways to go down, we get it, but you don't have to spew bs like this
Some of us were here in 2014 and we've seen this all before....so no reason to think it can't go much lower.
>31103 BTC longs and 28450 BTC shorts. On ETH 154000 ETH longs and 190600 ETH shorts.

Awesome thank you for doing that. That's a lot of ETH shorts.
Holy cow that ETH long/short ratio looks squeezable. If we get the same ratio for BTC, i will scale into a long, i think. Might take some time tho, as BTC longs are greatly increasing in tthis 5.8-5.9k area.
That's great, thanks!
Sorry I don't get what you are saying?
they have to pump it otherwise they get cascading liquidations 
Less than 10k. 25% of my savings. Its a lot, but it could be worse. 
Yes they will be celebrating a huge 50% runup from $1000 to $1500 again...congratulations.
The units of shorts/longs are in Bitcoin.
They anticipate that price can't go much further down as holders aren't rushing to exchanges to sell and the only ones that are selling are the weak hands.
Yes - and it needs to happen soon, as on the 1hr chart we see a bull flag - and zooming out to the daily it looks to be part of another bear flag
Yes i agree, dont know how long we could stay sub5k for but its probably going to be months before we see proper capitulation(if it happens)
Well, most people aren't profitable traders either.
yea I will be annoyed but mainly at my own indecision if I don't close anything on the way up :) 

There's nothing barring this from behaving differently this time though
Would be a helluva fractal, but yea I'm watching out for the higher low too 
Lol! Your call yesterday was good. I should have taken some profits if not just to be safe. 
September is about 1%, June is about 0.33%. This morning it was closer to 3% and 1.5%,respectively. 
Because traders expect the price to continue downwards. 

Edit to add: futures have no funding fees, but rather trade at a discount or premium to spot. When things look bookish, they trade above spot (premium). When they look bearish, they trade below (discount)
I'm just going to point something out if you're burning yourself and not being successful Trading. If you want to load your bags up at 3 K there's really not a whole lot of difference with loading up at 6 k if the market is going higher. If you knew for a fact 3K was going to happen sure but no one does. 

We do know for a fact 6K happened and it's on a major support level. This 5800 thing is nothing. Unless you see a decisive blow through 5700 going to 5300 quickly we are still at support. That might break. Who knows. 

Back to my original point. The people who have made the most money in Bitcoin are the people who believe in the technology and accumulate coins at what they feel are good prices at a given time. We are 70% off the high right now. Could it go to 80? Absolutely. Could it bottom here and start slowly trending up? Absolutely. Reversals are probably the hardest thing for people to do. You can even look at Major hedge funds and that's where they get into trouble. Following the trend really isn't that hard. You can use a variety of technical indicators but even if you're wrong the trend will save you. At a reversal everything goes out the window. 

This Market is basically reverse bubbling right now. If you have the common sense to sell when you see a bubble on the upside you should have the common sense to start buying when you see a bubble on the downside. If you were really cautious you could even wait to see a decisive break of this ridiculous 12 EMA pattern we've had for the past month. Not sure how many of you have noticed this but on the one-day chart the 12 EMA has been the most reliable technical indicator on bitcoin. It's bounced off of it every single time for the past month. Now eventually that is going to end but those of you who caught it early like I did made out alright I would imagine. 

Technical patterns constantly are changing in the market. I remember one time around 2005 the arms index was working every single time on the Dow. It was like Rock Solid reliable. Then one day it just quit. That's the nature of technical analysis and something you pick up with experience. 

I have a background in finance and I've probably read over a hundred books on markets and fundamental analysis and technical analysis and you know what, I'm in the hodl camp for the most part. Do you know why? Because I can back test that and it's been extremely effective. 

I can't however find any Traders from 2011 that are still trading today successfully. I'm not even sure how many are left from 2015. I'm not sure if you've ever read the book Candlestick charting explained but it has effective percentages of all of the major patterns. To make a long story short and most are around 50/50 give or take a few percent. 

So far since Inception Bitcoin has always taken out the prior high at some point and the best thing a person can do is buy when it's in a major downtrend. You can back test that to 2009 and it has worked every single time. It's boring. It doesn't seem sophisticated, but the back test percentage is better than any technical analysis out there

that wall of text is hard to read :P
Good post, but man, paragraphs
I'm sorry, I didn't read the whole thing. Bottoms are long and a reversal takes time. If 6k is a bottom then we'll be here for months, and I'll have plenty of time to buy before it reverses. A DCA strategy is good here but that's not what I'm doing. I've been burned on trades but I'm still a trader at heart and I can't just sit here and buy at 6k and then watch the price tank to 3k and realized I could have double the amount of BTC.
I know, so what I've been asking myself: is the bottom definitely in the $x,xxx figure range? It seems likely.

But what are the chances it could ever go below $1k again? Is it possible in the next 1-2 years without a black swan event? What would such a scenario look like?
> This 5800 thing is nothing. Unless you see a decisive blow through 5700 going to 5300 quickly we are still at support.

6000 was support.  Support is gone.
> If you want to load your bags up at 3 K there's really not a whole lot of difference with loading up at 6 k if the market is going higher.

Are you serious? You will literally make *twice the profit* if you buy at 3k vs at 6k. That's a whole lot of difference. Selling at 50k vs at 100k is the same difference and it's not negligible.
I considered that, but it seems the ridiculous short funding fee is reflected by the negative premium on the futures, and by the time funding fee has turned to normal, people will start covering their futures shorts
 Shorts went full retard at the bottom and ended up getting squeezed. It was a good trap. Even if we close below 6k today (very unlikely) bulls will still have the upper hand for the day because of all the shorts that got liquidated.
People were despairing at these same prices yesterday, it's still in a vicious downtrend. Bull flag on the 1 minute chart hasn't convinced me to get bullish yet
[deleted]
 In other words low volume. Not exactly what you want to see for a bottom......
so what're they waiting for? why are we just tanking if institutions are waiting with millions upon millions of dollars 
irrational exuberance over there... buy signal.
I privately labeled him as Chad#2. 
I think a lot of people call moonmath win the absolute rock bottom, so he's fairly close to that.
since when are there Bitcoin faggy Ds?
It's hidden
https://cryptowat.ch/markets/binance/btc/usdt/5m

Market dumped 1k BTC a couple hours ago and now it unloads in an empy orderbook
just bottom reshorted here. We goin down
Leave Brittany alone 
This guy se habla espano.
Pull your orders. Set alert on highest price points. Go to sleep. Hopefully you'll have full night’s sleep 
Trading algos aren't smart enough to understand and trade this, or any new market environments, without human guidance and maintenance. I have a friend that made a decent algo for trading Oil futures but he could only turn it on from 3am - 5am EST because its low volume and humans aren't as present to outsmart the bot via news events and other market disruptions.
Obviously not all but some HFT algos shut off during high volatility periods.
Yeah... been doing that for some time on various coins.   Looks like I still lost a decent amount and would have rather waited.  But I guess that's hindsight!
Thanks! 
Thanks!
Maybe. There are a lot of "recipes" for a trend reversal.
That's actually a pretty good candidate for a short-medium term reversal. 

Not for a long term reversal imo but really this has all been a really great way to trap people at the bottom

I was scared of going to sleep to see it made a new low and bounced...smh why is what we fear so predictable sometimes 😂
It did last time? Didn’t it dump to around 150 then recover and never go there again?
If it turns out to be a false breakout it would be a good entry... but right now the candle is still very weak to confirm
You know, these bounces haven't been *that* bad as long as you didn't just hold until breakeven. 

Someone could've made like 30% off of longing the bottoms of these. 

The pattern was extraordinarily obvious in hindsight. It'd be hilarious if it happens again with $5500 then a 10% bounce to $6000

Kinda crazy to think 10% here is coming to ~$500
That nightmare quickly turned into a dream with flying and sex.
>Maybe it's "a nightmare on bitcoin street" lol

The other guy shit on it, but I'd say it's a good comment. I mean, it's no Hanibull, but... yeah :/

This whole situation *does* feel like a dream, to be honest. *Surreal.*
Do you think so, can you share your chart - like to see how you think? Anyway, presumed outcome is the same.
This is not a massive volume reversal V bottom, this is a slow limp drop through resistance punctuated by a big green candle put there by people with a lot of money probably to try and squeeze out shorts. 
So massive the price is sitting where it was yesterday and down 5% for the week.  You guys will cling on to anything, literally.  
Not put there through organic growth of new money rushing in to buy BTC > $6000. Why can't people tell the difference between large market buys and sells by single parties and collective growth? People haven't been interested in BTC, it is all bots and MMs increasingly since ATH.
Hilarious! This bear will last forever, just like the bull did. Irrational exuberance goes both ways. Not saying you’re wrong, but you have to know that you might be 
Agreed, the only way the public gets back in is FOMO, just like every time they've bought bitcoin.  Right now it is still a scam that lost them money, no way they buy at the year-to-date low.
My guess is the public will buy back in at $30-50k.  Institutional/smart money will bring us to that level, and the public will take over to bring us to $100k.  No idea on the timescale...could be this year, could be 2022.
Plebs be plebs 
Does that mean it’ll go up tomorrow then?
well, based on my experience (1 year) and others who have been in since 2013, everybody has awesome low buy in's and also terribly high buy in's.  The best strategy is to DCA and make the biggest percentage of your investment during a correction from the last ATH when its down over 50%.  Then once it passes the ATH you make the decision to sell or hold in hopes of selling higher.
3 for $6k each of course. However, this is easy to say in hindsight.  When BTC was $18k, no one knew it would fall to $6k.  Betting on that outcome would have been gambling - DCA is a sensible strategy.
I'd rather dollar cost average, unless I thought price was close to a bottom then I'd lump buy. 
It depends on how I got there. 
>Would you rather have 1 btc for $18k or 3 for $6k each?

If both are being sold at market price, it wouldn't much matter. 

Reminds me of the old joke: What's heavier, a 5lb pillow, or a 5lb dumbbell? 
If it doesn't break its last ATH then it will become a collectable like baseball cards
It is a 100% probability that it will break ATH. Fiat inflation > crypto inflation + new crypto adoption is >>>>>> than new FIAT adoption (lol). 

It is possible that the purchasing power of a new ATH will be lower than the purchasing power of the current ATH though. 
because the infrastructure is growing.  Regulation and decisions are being made to allow more traditional investment institutions to participate.  ITs really just a matter of time before most ppl have exposure to crypto in their 401k.  even if its just 1% of their portfolio, it would still have a huge effect on the price of BTC
Because it's a global currency built on a revolutionary technology. Bitcoin also have the first mover advantage. Its scaling problem will be resolved in a near future.
How much do you understand about this technology? How much have you read about it’s usecases and adoption?

Rhetorical questions on my part. Not much if you ask what you’re asking. 
Cuz Mcafee would have to “eat his” appendage and we’re gonna hold him to it! Think he was playin’ the newbs and cashed out at the top?
😂
And they were right eventually. Whereas the bears calling for double digit coins all the way through 2014 - 2015 were never right.
Fair enough, I guess the point is that it’s an objective signal and not absolute. Not sure Reddit is the best measure of market sentiment. Anyone got any good places the gauge it?
There is no ceiling to price on the upside, but on the downside it cannot decline below $0. 
3k wasn't a serious top. 
It could drop 50% from here. But would you rather buy at $20k or $6k? It's funny how people desperately wanted to buy near the top but won't touch it now. 
I mean typically bubbles deflate to 70-90% of the top, so I'd say the r/r on buys down here is much better than where we've been most of the year
Care to explain how something can drop 300%?
Where are u getting 300%? 

Back in 2013-2014 btc dropped 87% from ath. Currently btc is just starting to break 70% from recent ath. These drops are typical for btc 
Buy low and sell high.
Where can I view that at?
Gdax closes June 29th. Gotta switch to Coinbase Pro.
ty. Unfortunately i dont have the 2FA codes :(. If i cant get my phone working i'll probably have to take a week or so to get it straightened out with a new phone. Fortunately it is just a battery issue (the part that the charger connects to on the phone short circuited/is black) and I think i can buy replacement parts.

So i think i'll keep using gdax as normal up until the day of the transition and cross my fingers I can get into Pro on the 28th/29th without it logging me out.
I use a fairly dated phone (even so, it has 1280x720 resolution), and it doesn't have room for me to trade or add indicators on the [cryptowat.ch](https://cryptowat.ch) mobile site.  At most I can draw trendlines I think.
well 0.29 btc at 6630 is 1922.7 USD, so 1922.7 contracts.

Put it into bitmex calculator. 

Entry 6630 

Exit 5858

Need 0.71 BTC profit to show up. 

36000 contracts from 6630 to 5858 would result in a .7156 BTC profit, which means he shorted ~36000 contracts at 18.7x leverage. 
There's always 1k.
> Double bottoms rarely work out. It will most likely break and then a new downtrend will begin.

Yup, *about to press upvote button*

>Sub 1000 is likely this year.

Trolls gonna troll. Downvote.
You won't bet me money that this will happen. There's no way we go sub 1000
lolol edited 
Lower lows are coming weekly at this point. Bottom should be sooner than years 
Yes, you are just using the word wrong.
I tell myself I could have more coins if I short and rebuy but I am certain I would fuck it up. Patience.
Hear, hear! 
I could not ever lose 75% of my money without stress, even if I bought at $1.00.
> 1) I hate taxes

/r/im14andthisisdeep 
Lol
That is really odd. Looks like one of the two is calculating the end of the week at a different day 
Counting on that. Caught a knife at 6200 and hoping to drop these bags in profit before the trip to Goblin Town. 
I wonder if we can visit reddit's crypto pages as Bitcoin approached its bottom in 2014...I'd love to know what the sentiment was....its pretty gloom and negative around here and in /r/cryptocurrency. My friends are all now wondering if there will ever even be another bull run. Sentiment is pretty bad. I feel like even in 2014's lows you'd still see people who were optimistic. 
Confucius say, elevator smell very different to little person.
*****
^("Just a bot trying to brighten up someone's day with a laugh. | Message me if you have one you want to add.")

\*sigh\* okay...bring it on...I'm drowning in red now there's not much else to worry about.
Yesterday was not a bounce, that was a bear flag. Everything since 10k has been a bear flag/pennant. Out of the last 7 weeks, 6 weeks were red and we had one small green weekly candle that was just a bear flag. 
No I agree. That's why I will wait a little longer. Unfortunately, when it does bounce, it will be fast.
Yeah.
Suicide hotlines have always been stickied.
I mean in the context of this dump.
There's no volume, so there's no real struggle.
No struggle at all lower lows weekly 
What was that?
I wouldn't of said this is strong downwards pressure. Sellers have to have a buyer on the other end.
You?
Is this a bot?
Dont be. From a TA point of view, If we can just take one big drop to $5400-$4500 (ish) area in one go, the upside gains will return faster and stronger than if we just slowly bleed down there.
On Bitstamp it did. On Bitfinex it didn't.
You're right, I'll try not to get too greedy. Thanks for the reminder. It's sometimes hard to remember to take profits when in the green.

!long xbtu18 profit 6130 10x 25&#37;
[deleted]
Never revenge trade. Good luck.
that's not always true, is it? I guess you might be right
I guess that is only logical - supply and demand
That's why I'm afraid of shorting futures for purpose of avoiding large negative funding - when the discount on futures shrink, I'm fked
I tend to think it may be more like the 3K bottom where we pierce the 5K level, gather a load of shorts real quickly, carry on moving down for an hour and then bounce heavily 15% in a few minutes. My target is between 4.65 and 5K but I'm aware that we may not even get there but I don't think 5.2-5.4 will hold like 5K will(or wherever it bounces there).
[deleted]
Hes not.
Jordan Belfort, the Wolf of Bitcorn. Come on now.
yeah, fuck this guy, it's amazing to me that anyone listens to his thieving ass
I recall him telling everyone to sell all crypto on like Jan 6. Had I sold the first time he said to, I’d be up a fortune right now. 

Edit: Still a tool and looks like a stick of pepperoni (agreed). 
Doesn't the price going down always imply a lack of liquidity to "cash out" above that price point? In the same way that the price going up implies a lack of liquidity to "buy in" *below* that price? Or in short, volatility is always the result of a lack of liquidity in a market.

He also says all the "fraud" will start coming out, and ALSO says that cryptocurrencies will be big but not Bitcoin. Hmm... I wonder which Bitcoin dev has committed fraud. Was it Satoshi? I don't recall. Now how many shitcoins have committed fraud... HMMM....

Jordan Belfort is a fucking idiot. He ruined lives before and he's trying to do it again. :')
If he can get in my head (and I'm up over 20x), then he's certainly getting into the head of anyone watching those videos who's underwater.
Uncorrelated alpha. Paradoxically, holding a small percentage of crypto assets will reduce he volatility of your portfolio. Crypto trading desks are being created because there is a demand for them. Think about this: banks want to get into crypto, even though they don’t believe in them, because they know they will make money from them. Capitalist meet rope.
Bitcoin is being used LIKE CRAZY by people to protect the value of their wealth. It's like what swiss bank accounts always wished they could be but never quite pulled it off, and investors worldwide have started to figure that out.
Price is an expression of the balance between supply and demand. 

Diy is authoritatively spouting fallacies.
This is exactly why I'm almost positive we will see sub 1000 prices this year. 
Concur. Minimal incentive to buy crypto except to try to sell it someone else as quick as you can for more money. More adoption needed. One app, one company, one breakthrough use-case can and likely will change this. But right now that doesn't exist, so most demand is speculation driven. 
The last data I’ve seen for the top wallets shows that almost none of them have reduced the number of bitcoins they hold though.
>Bitcoin will continue to drop as long as more people want to sell then buy, end of story.

Hold on, let me get my notebook.
http://data.bitcoinity.org/markets/price_volume/all/USD?r=day&t=lb&vu=curr
That makes sense to me considering we just failed to break that level in May. 
tanking like a god damn motherfucker. they're just totally shitting themselves.

people in /r/cryptocurrency calling this a scam, saying they fell for the hodl meme and they feel like idiots

honestly this whole thing is really sad and depressing. It's nice to be shorting this but damn I feel really fucking terrible for some people, like it really is bringing me down :( it was kinda fun at first but now I just feel awful for some people...

https://www.reddit.com/r/CryptoCurrency/comments/8tfwcd/daily_discussion_megathread_june_24_2018/e179td6/

>Technically I could afford to lose what I put in as I'm not broke yet. But I put in the money I had planned on using for life advancement like a dumbass. I pushed my life goals back years now.

>The only way to get our money back ever is by shorting the market. I don't know enough though to attempt it. Have you thought about shorting?

Man. First of all. Yet another buy signal.

Second of all, jesus christ. Some of this stuff is legitimately hard to read. :( 
Sorry should have clarified I'm using TUSD not USDT, seems to work differently 
Yeah its TUSD I just assumed it was the same, do you know how to do what I want to do with TUSD or should I just switch to Tether
Fuck yea I do. I know how to a plan. Get your projection shit outta here.
Same
These next ten eons are absolutely *critical* for bitcoin 
I suppose if you're blind. Maybe you little fucking pieces of shit shouldn't and just downvote people and can take 5 minutes to look at a chart pattern. Like do you seriously not understand what an inverse head-and-shoulders is? It's a potentially bullish set up the left shoulder is already in and we have made the head right now it's tracing out the right shoulder. The pattern would be complete with an upside break which would be the inverse neckline
Much appreciated. ;)
Don’t use raped as a a trading term
How do you know I’m a bad trader? Projection? LUL
Absolutely but that doesn't change the prices I'll buy in at. 
Hahaha 👍
Lol no! Good Lord the downvotes. Back in February on a discord channel someone linked a photo taken of an internal memo at one of the big firms. I believe it said 4700 was the bottom. I mainly posted this here hoping someone would remember and post the photo. 
sure, i get that.

but it happens.... the day after phil potter quits and a few days after another bullshit report and they announce they can't ever do an audit 
Bcash can also make you money.

Isn't that the endgame of this? To make as much money from this market as possible? 
This comment is not very helpful 
I’m Under water 

But i still want it to break 6200
Im not shorting lol. So idk where you got that at. Im waiting to see the next move 
But we went back down and can’t seem to stay over it 
...and where rejected every time is the point I think he was trying to make
Yes, people who had poor entries above
Any price sub 100k is sideways action and distraction 
and those who received crypto can sell them? even buying at the previous peak of 1k, they are still having a 500&#37; profit
I've already written them off. Mine will simply add to my cold storage.
http://www.mtgox.com/img/pdf/20180622_announcement_en.pdf
> I personally think most of the people that receive their Gox coins will hold them

IIRC, there was at least one hedge fund that was buying up Gox debt for ~$0.20 on the dollar a little over a year ago. I would presume that those who bought up the debt would likely sell a good chunk of the coins they receive, as this is likely part of their strategy. 


Also, a lot can happen in 5 years, so someone who believed in the tech in 2013 may not be in a situation that allows them to continue holding 5 years later. 
Exactly. I just wanna be beaten quicker 
Which floor short term, intermediate, or long term...or any of multitudes in between?
Couldn't agree more
Expensive lesson learned... I just wanted a Mustang. 
It wasn't even about the "I told you so" it's more about the downvotes for going against the sub.

My comment about the BGD was in reply to someone who also went long. 
Aww did someone short? LOOOL
And doing this has potentially incurred a huge tax bill if you’ve been holding those coins for years.
everyone briefly wanted to be my friend in december, now i am alone again :)
It's going to bounce pretty hard here relatively soon (not necessarily here or now, but once we establish a new downwards range it'll bounce). Probably after the majority of people stop expecting it (myself potentially included)
watch and learn
Moon time
As they should. Shorting with high leverage requires a bigger stomach than simply buying hoping it reaches 6 figs / coin.
It could easily go back down to $2500, and $1000 is certainly possible as well, but that would take a good long while, unless there is really bad news that pushes it off the cliff.
Segwit man
I mentioned it in the other comment- the doom and gloom actually comes a little before the end of the bear market. Once the get-rich-quickers get purged, the sentiment improves and then price follows on a delay. 
:D 

We're waiting...!

Any idea where you closed that one? Pretty sweet to have longed the bottom like that 
I don't even think we were below $200 for more than an hour, if that. It wasn't very long at all and we rebounded nicely. I remember a big fat dump to $160, turning off my tablet and tossing it screaming. 

Forgot all about Bitcoin for years, considered it an expensive lesson, until I wake up one morning and I'm like "Hm, I should get my bitcoins off of Bitfinex." I pull up Bitfinex, trying to remember my password and a notice pops up saying they just got hacked ._. fuhh
I sold all my coins at $165...
Which is why I refuse to give up my leveraged short and my BFX short unless I need to... Both are in the clear. Only thing to do is take my june profits and perp profits when this dump is over and add to the short (and maybe create a new one on Dec futures). Put 0.045 btc in mex approaching 10K and put on 3 main trades and I'm currently at .2 realized and another 1.2btc unrealized so not a bad month for my gambling money.
gave it a shot already, knew it wouldnt last, but still... landed right on that local low. https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8t7fc6/daily_discussion_saturday_june_23_2018/e16q2rm/?st=jisdz655&sh=bd206019


im thinking this gets bad, i mean, lower lows and all.......  so, i guess we'll see.... Im gonna scoop up when it feels right.... when the orderbooks are squirly and thin and comments are pouring in here like hotcakes... could be tonight at 5500 or a week from now at 3k.... or it fizzles sideways for 2 months....  either way, I will be watching regardless...
this was an 8.7% 1h green candle, it really isn't anything to be scoffed at. That's about half of the original green candle 
Percentages, how do they work?
I’m not the elusive chewtoy, sorry for the disappointment 😭
He doesn't have an entry. According to this megabear Bitcoin is going to 0.
My desired entry is not right now.  I will know an entry when I see it.   There are literally thousands of desirable entries, both below and above the current market price.
It's massively unfortunate, but it's a simple fact of life that no one else can do anything about for the near and possibly far future.

I presume his Bcash attempt was a wee wakeup call. You can only push the mindless masses so far and beyond a point there is certain shit they will not eat. 

There are now millions who didn't get it for free so it's now a threat to their holdings, not a wee boon. 
My bad :P I was out to lunch and saw that last leg down to 5750, decided I didn't want to give up a run back over $6K. I had opened something on June at $6K and added at $5900 that also got stopped. Took a bit of a hit on that, but still a 10% stack increase. 
strong hands man, strong hands
since when can you short on Coinbase/GDAX?
Aah sp not a real short. cuz that would be 20% a year interest on open positions 
Waiting 4 months to close at breakeven is just silly. At that point you should really leave it open. 
He shorted at 6k , 4 months ago, and secure a profit now at 5.8k-5.9k? Common it does not cover the trading fee and interest rate.
2,150 USD. Fixed. I'm used to different number formatting.
Alot of European countries use a decimal point to separate groups of three digits, it's not uncommon 
They will catch up if BTC will follow up.
Oh ok, I was just looking at the USDT price on Binance
It was like top 5 coin last night wasn't it lmao
[deleted]
I think if he bought back in, that would be the worst possible thing for Litecoin.  Why would you trust him if he did that?
I'm not going to buy, until this bottoms out & starts to go up again. so consequently I won't hit the bottom, but should get in at a lowish price. 
I can't see us going that high. It will carry on dropping all day. Maybe have a few days going sideways , then maybe a mini bounce which adds another  $600 max from the lowest point.  Over the short time frame, the fall will probably continue. 
He had some longer posts that made me think he was def not LARPing. I think he thought he could have an effect on the price by posting bullish sentiment
Pretty much.  Its basically what elastos is, a blockchain internet. Has a lot of other stuff to it and had some good exchange rumors floating about. Instead they released 2 million tokens on the market and it crashed lol. 
The Feds just came out yesterday and said privacy coins like XMR are a national security threat. I love XMR but be careful 
This is precisely why I sold it months ago. 
What us/cad/eu exchanges with fiat onramps have xmr listed?
Per months dude, per months...
Right, so it's possible that the whales who know that those news items are bullish now want to increase their stack and will wait until the panic sellers make new lows.

If the news is good, but without immediate effect, you'd want to get in cheaper and waiting til capitulation is easy if you're confident (which whales should be).
If Gox were to sell it would have been OTC thus not affecting market price. Instead the coins are redistributed to thousands of individuals who will sell on the market. This is bearish news.
> Whenever the market is left to do what it want you see low volume sideways

Exactly. It seems the directions were essentially dictated by some big market orders and the sheep just follow.
I didn’t know that cheaper coins translated to higher volatility and liquidity. We seem much less volatile and much less liquid than we were a few months ago, when the price was much higher.
Look closer. It tends to drift up during periods of low volume.
Long enough term those people above are not going to live forever, so of course they can't influence the market after they are dead.    

But long term, big money can certainly influence the market dramatically.   Of course it depends on what you call "short-term" and "long-term" and you were purposely vague in your statement, but the reality is what it is.
What typical MACD settings do you use for best resolution? The defaults on traidingview are 12,26,9. Thanks.
I appreciate the perspective. The thing I am struggling with tho, I took zero profit. I can concede the top, but I have still taken zero profit. The second guessing is killing me. At this point tho, I feel like the risk reward for selling is long gone. Even if what I’m holding becomes totally worthless, I won’t sell down here, because I feel selling here or below here would be just as foolish as me not taking profit when we were up. This is the reverse of the lesson I learned. 
Just suspicious it seems to happen a lot around times when BTC price gets interesting.
Still sucks, I do my trading there and can’t do anything just watching myself getting burned 
Thanks, I misread that
All that needs to happen for bulls is to wait it out until the dumper runs out of coins.
right lol like this price action is very odd. 
> And what is a chart? It's an expression of human emotions

That's not what a chart is. Everyone doesn't trade with their emotions. Algos and bots certainly don't.
Yeah bro this DCB is totally a trend reversal! 
I'm not jealous at all of what's going on with alt coins...
No way :) 
I own a good actually. However, they are in the top 15 and are promising.
Tron, Cardano, Dentacoin
Morons were. Even if we go down to $4500 how much more are you actually losing. Might as well go with it now. 
If anyone has been bag holding since 17k like me, I cant fathom a reason outside of an emergency that would make me want to stop now. It is bizarre to me for anyone invested to be pulling out now.

 Like fuck, at this point I'm ready to just let it all go down the drain because I've come so far that the risk of taking out what I have left far exceeds leaving it in. If I needed the money to eat or pay rent, then I'd be out I guess from desperation haha but I'd never invest that deep to begin with personally
That makes me feel better
Lol. This is a trading board. The veterans here either sold a long time ago or went short. 
That's a silly post. Then they should have sold sooner. At this point it can't go much lower so might as well hang on for the ride. I got BTC below $100 and it would be fantastic to return, but what's the point when it's close to reaching bottom.
[deleted]
This is quite nice :D  https://www.reddit.com/r/eos/comments/8t1elh/ecaf_ruled_to_block_27_accounts_with_no_reason/

literally the definition of funds are safe.


However I think since there are so much capital tied to EOS and Block.One, buying within 4-6 weeks when the prices levels out at 3-5 is probably quite a good bet
It is on Binance. You mean delisted right?
Can't have dropped 95% without trading, so yeah, you should quit that trading.
2014 - no you haven't. Clearly, you're the one getting fucked.
Well now i want to know what your full opinion is...  
You're actually right, I shouldn't have called it a squeeze, as not many shorts closed there, and most shorts would get squeezed if $6300 breaks. It's just my natural tendency to call big sudden pumps like that "squeezes" nowadays.
> I just also think you’re absolutely delusional if you think Bitcoin is going to become some kind of revolutionary new global currency.

But it already is for so many reasons. Just take a moment and think about it, skipping the whole trading/speculative angle.

The problem isn't with what Bitcoin is. The problem is with what people overhype it to be (or not to be). The same applies to Lightning Network. People expected the next Paypal overnight. 
There's a few here who are skeptical but by and large even the bears are very optimistic about its future. 

I agree with the global currency. I mean, in theory, it sounds nice and  great but in reality it's just...really not gonna happen. Not to mention deflationary currencies are widely regarded as inferior to inflationary currencies in lots of very significant ways 

the store of value use case is probably the only likely use case there is.

Imagine taking out a loan with BTC and then having to pay back 20% more on it over the years because it's a deflationary currency? Yeah, no thanks. 
Not popping up? What do you mean? 

What do you get if you click this link: 
https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8tfcql/daily_discussion_sunday_june_24_2018/e17dhs0/
Have u seem the state of /r/cryptocurrency recently?? Not sure how it could get worse lol
That doesn't seem right. Someone reposted the daily from that lowest low from that bear - there was little despair. Just a lot of technical trading talk. 

If you want despair though go to /r/cryptocurrency 
I still think "not nearly enough despair" is a dangerous metric to use on its own, because you need to factor in that at least some traders expected this. You may never see "real despair" in this cycle.
Absolutely. It's a valid question no matter what the timing is. 
It means the state of the network is formed by consensus, and if a consensus cannot be formed, there is always the freedom to fork. In this way, there is never some central organization that indisputably control the network value, and the users has more control of their share of value in the network. The transfer of control is the fundamental value proposition of decentralized tech and why it has a future.
That only goes for pure currencies. As far as those go, they still have to be adopted by retail businesses. We all know how that's going.
I'd play that.
following the trend works wonder
You're neutral, not influencing their decision.

You're simple providing clarity via questions. They're reasoning & deciding.
>The other friend is just retarded

Damm bruh no chill
> heavy load. Al

Or he saw that once it broke 6k and did not reject it outright that the cat is out of the bag and the speculator magic is gone, and it may have a lot further to fall, such that he would need to 4x+ to break even. 
> because he is weak

No. He's smart. Even if you're worth 700 billions you should always think in terms of percentages.
I was talking about maximum pain for the larger market, not for your two individual friends.  No offense, but I really don't care about them.

And your definition of a weak hand is very unconventional.  


tl;dr: 

>My friend who is *actually* rich (in real-money terms) thought that gambling on internet tokens wasn't worth his time. My bags are heavy enough that I *abuse my friends* for leaving the cryptocult.
There is a concerted anti-crypto propaganda campaign that has been expected for years, but finally here.  Articles about how BTC mining uses more electricity than Ireland and is causing rates to rise and causing blackouts, along with the usual line about it being terrorist funding and fraudulent and everything else.  This definitely has an effect on the easily influenced, as well as people who are barely paying attention.
funnily enough opposite among my friends, they seem to find the lower price more appetizing. Many of them first heard about bitcoin at 5k (GBP), tried to buy but literally couldn't get registered fast enough before the price went nuts.  


Now they see it back at that price, they consider it affordable again. These are also smartish people, they understand that to make money you ultimately have to do the opposite of what others are doing.
Theyre ignorant about the technology and can't be bothered to learn. They got jealous because someone else is making money and they jump aboard. The market crashes and they sell at a loss, then they tell everyone it's a scam and a Ponzi. 
Well, the sentiment of this sub along w/ the trend, BTC is going to goblin town. So w/o a new influx of normie buyers, prices won’t reach their break even point which results in a loss & leaving the market entirely. I would assume Blockstream, exchanges & others have a vested interest in keeping BTC a viable asset class and would expect a marketing campaign of some sort. That would be a logical & hopeful step in the right direction.
I think the majority of it happens in China as of now based on the mining pools. However, I can't find an exact geographic market share chart. 
I saw that bounce started when Eth hit 420 which is a long term log support. I knew it should've bounced but to the level that it will drag the whole market up. It's almost as if the market is grasping for a reason to bounce and the MM is pushing it in that direction. If it doesn't incite FOMO soon, it might turn out like the pump to 62xx yesterday. Just speaking my mind, just kinda waiting and seeing myself.

Edit: also kinda nuts both yesterday and today's pump stopped right at 6250. What's significant about that number?
This is what happens when dumb people use Reddit. Hardly indicative of anything. 
>This is quite literally the only reason for the bear market

Very few things as complex as financial markets have "one reason" and it is doubtful you have hit the nail on the head with this one.
Why would they not have sold sometime in the previous six months?  It is ridiculous to be selling now.
FINALLY someone with some sense about the mechanism behind this. 
Doubtful but could make it into the top 5.
I've been saying that for a while now. 

the Tether use case is the best use case for crypto. You have the convenience of being your own bank and no price volatility. One Tether = One USD

Frankly if any gov't decides to switch their currency to crypto, it'll look a WHOLE lot like Tether. 

Because "OMG its so centralized" is only a concern for libertarians, no gov't will ever give up the ability to issue currency.  And regular folks will appreciate the gov't having the option to reverse fraudulent transactions, so you don't suddenly lose your entire savings if you get hacked 
short the bottom  
long the top
That didn't end well lately ;-)
It is photosynthetically unfathomable to see bitcoin go below $5950 
Well
We might need 3 digit numbers soon. Perhaps remove the 5 from your figure?
I will be messaging you on [**2018-12-24 04:23:50 UTC**](http://www.wolframalpha.com/input/?i=2018-12-24 04:23:50 UTC To Local Time) to remind you of [**this link.**](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8tfcql/daily_discussion_sunday_june_24_2018/)

[**CLICK THIS LINK**](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=Reminder&message=[https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8tfcql/daily_discussion_sunday_june_24_2018/]%0A%0ARemindMe!  6 months) to send a PM to also be reminded and to reduce spam.

^(Parent commenter can ) [^(delete this message to hide from others.)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=Delete Comment&message=Delete! e172zg3)

_____

|[^(FAQs)](http://np.reddit.com/r/RemindMeBot/comments/24duzp/remindmebot_info/)|[^(Custom)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=Reminder&message=[LINK INSIDE SQUARE BRACKETS else default to FAQs]%0A%0ANOTE: Don't forget to add the time options after the command.%0A%0ARemindMe!)|[^(Your Reminders)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=List Of Reminders&message=MyReminders!)|[^(Feedback)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBotWrangler&subject=Feedback)|[^(Code)](https://github.com/SIlver--/remindmebot-reddit)|[^(Browser Extensions)](https://np.reddit.com/r/RemindMeBot/comments/4kldad/remindmebot_extensions/)
|-|-|-|-|-|-|
What exchange? And bot buy/sell walls are an everyday occurrence. 
I’m not your buddy, pal. 
Yea short from 

$5935 25%

$6074 25%

$6135 50%

Terrible entires. Didn’t expect such a bounce off 5.7k. I was also working when we dropped and didn’t have time to close at bottom. 

Stops over $6300. Let’s see what happens 
I have my reasons. $6090 can be a target of a stop loss hunt, so that extra couple of dollars will give me a bit more breathing room 
I never understood that analogy.  "It is just like Bitcoin, only cheaper, less popular, and the voice of the community sold at the top and called for an 85% correction!"
> cheap

The price was $2500 this time last year.  There's no reason why you should consider $6000 cheap.  If anything it seems ridiculously over priced with bitcoin's existing utility and use cases.
>I've been playing this game since mid 2015, and a lot of the time buying around the prices I've deemed "cheap" has been extremely profitable.

>I thought $7500 was a cheap price

Well it was $200 in 2015, but you thought $7500 was cheap too?

You've really had no strategy or valuation model then, just buying constantly, and you've been lucky that up until this year price has gone up.
Thanks btw
There are still funding fees which are ridiculous right now
People have been saying this is the bottom for months now. And people are still trying to find a bullish perspective where there is none.
I'd qualify comments like "the bottom is close" as bullish.
This has worked above $6k, sure. What's your strategy for identifying a price to *stop* shorting?
I think it's because these people aren't interested in shorting; they're interested in getting out of this market that went from euphoria to the depths of hell. They never had a plan and are now winging it

They're not traders coming in here- they're people who bought in a ridiculous bull run and never thought they'd have to make a decision on when to sell.

I've said this a few times before, that there's so much supply overhead from people who have had no desire to sell because their entry was $2000-5000. Once the price begins to near their entry they will be forced to make a decision on what to do. Most of them will panic sell (which is what they're doing, clearly)
sorry I forgot how fast it rocketed up. I mean $2000-5000. 

It's not that I think we're going that low, it's that people will generally sell at a small profit instead of at a loss. If I had to guess, the people selling here bought from $2000-6000
I never say never, but just had that thought.  But it is a dumb thing to say and was mostly sarcastic.
Hello Bitfinexed
Well good point there and if Tether/Bitfinex did really implode that would probably cost BTC $1000 in one day easily.  The tether reverberations would ripple through many exchanges.  It could be more cataclysmic than Mt Gox ...scary thought.
if bitcoin goes to 1300 and bitfinex/tether still in business, would you stop trolling?
No they said it would NEVER be below $15K again...as in forever.
i mean you posted this just 5 min before the BGD :D
You comment on every single post lol 
Are these the same weak hands that sold at 15k and 10k ?
Hard to beat this ^ type of context if you're a long term, well capitalized player.
Cool thanks for the info!
No, they anticipate a bounce is in order and it isn't likely go much further down on this leg.
We can stay sub 5k for many years (or decades), but will take awhile to get firmly below it.
I'm not saying it's a reversal. But TBH, you're so up on your position that you should reduce it. You're being greedy.
I didn't call for this spike, and others pointed out the likelihood of it, given the large short positions that were inviting a manipulated squeeze.  I knew it was possible, but not that likely.  And maybe it was very unlikely, but still happened, so have to deal with the reality of it.  I should have taken some profits down there as well.
>September is about 1%, June is about 0.33%. This morning it was closer to 3% and 1.5%,respectively. 

June expires in 4 days, should not have any substantial discount. But yes, it has reduced to more reasonable levels since the crash. This is common, happens after every crash or rally. 
Ha. You're absolutely right but I'm half asleep sitting here talking to my phone. Thanks for breaking up the paragraphs. 
> I can't however find any Traders from 2011 that are still trading today successfully. 

Ummm...that's because they all retired to their private islands that they bought.   

>  So far since Inception Bitcoin has always taken out the prior high at some point and the best thing a person can do is buy when it's in a major downtrend. 

Yes it works...until it doesn't.  If you have play money and don't care if you lose 95% of it, then buy any time and sleep like a baby.  If you are investing real money, don't assume it will get anywhere near to $20K again in your lifetime.
You're a hundred percent right. I'm literally laying here talking to my phone with a cat on my lap. I wonder if he would be a good Bitcoin Trader? He's pretty lazy. I'm fairly sure if he bought a Bitcoin he would forget about it by the next day. Years later I could check on it for him.

Maybe that can be my new advice. Trade like a house cat :)
Everyone has to find what works for them. The only thing I would suggest is look at patterns and look at the probabilities of success. See if you can find some good information over the past 5 years. The crypto Market is pretty technical so there's a good chance you might find some reoccurring patterns that everyone is not aware of. If you start finding patterns that work at a really high percentage like 60% of the time you will be onto something. You may even get lucky and find something that's really effective during a certain time. Like this month and the 12 EMA on The Daily. Bitcoin has bounced off the 12 EMA every single time like clockwork. 
I will share a couple of my own thoughts before I go to bed and keep in mind this is just my own thoughts. I look at the cost of mining. I have pretty cheap power and I'm good to about 3,500. If you live in Los Angeles you have already shut down. Network hash power is still going up which means people are still long-term bullish. The Winklevoss twins have not sold. Neither has Tim Draper. Bitmain is still researching and creating newer  Asics. There is however a major problem if we get under 3 to 4000. The problem is hashpower. A ton of people are going to be shutting down. If that happens a lot of mining equipment is going to get sold very cheaply. That makes the cost of doing a 51% attack on a lot of these tiny altcoins pretty realistic especially with what you can rent from nicehash. That's really terrible for Market sentiment.

Litecoin is going to have a having next year. Next August if I remember right. Bitcoin the following year. Historically that has been incredibly bullish. A lot of people who have been around for awhile are bullish long-term. That's a good thing really it means they will commit capital. Currently no one wants to be the first guy to do so. Letting the sellers exhaust themselves seems like a viable strategy. If we get a flat bottom it should be somewhat easy. If we get a v-shaped bottom it's going to be pretty difficult. The question I would ask yourself is this. What will you do if you're wrong? Because that's what you really need to concern yourself with. If you expect the market to go to 3000 and it does that's awesome. However what if the market does a v shaped recovery. Then what will you do? Will you wait? Will you fomo. You have to make your own choices but I would go over all of the possibilities that can happen in the market and also your own likely reactions. Develop a strategy from there. What will you do if the market does what you don't expect. Because there's a really good chance that's what's going to happen
That's not really how support works. False brakes are actually pretty common. You could look at 6,000 as the support of the past two drops or you could look at a trend line at 5800. Technical analysis is about probabilities. It's not mathematical facts. Until we go through 5800 hard the technical probability is not fulfilled to the downside. If you pull up a chart of the Dow from 1950 until now and look at the major patterns the double bottoms are not textbook. The cup and handles are off. There's definitely a reasonable chance that we are going to punch through 5800 but it hasn't happened yet. Litecoin is the one grabbed my attention the most on a technical basis. All the support is down in the 60s if you draw trend lines. We have already taken out the psychological support.
I said that because it's not something you can realistically predict or do. For example we could have a v-shaped recovery. They happen. If you are completely out of the market you're going to pause because you might think wait a minute I don't want to chase this. If the move is real and it keeps going higher eventually you're probably going to fomo.

Any trade that I put on I look at probabilities and back test. There's no real reliable indicator that tells me where the bottom is going to be. What I'm looking at is 70% off the high. I can back test that. My odds of success are outstanding
Twice is a rounding error. 
It's not ridiculous at all, people are shorting futures more b/c of the funding fee on swaps and that creates a discount. Opposite when we were in a bull market there was a big premium. 
Did shorts even close? 
It depends on what people mean by "reversal" 

Nothing exists in a vacuum, so I'm just thinking about our journey from 200 to 1000 to 200 to 20,000 to ?

And again, it's all ballpark.  I think were close, that's all.  Could be wrong but I'm not trying to pick anything perfectly.  My trades also take place on long time frames.  The last big moves I made were to go long at ~$800.  Took profits at $18k down to $10k, but 75% of my coins never moved.
A 1600 buy wall has popped up, we'll see if that helps. 
Regulatory clarity, custodial issues, ease of getting money in. 
They want low low prices to accumulate via OTC
Why are you being downvoted?
New $ low but not a new RSI low = NOT Hidden
New RSI low but not new $ low = hidden.

It's not hidden
Yea, it looks like it. We could see it bounce from here though. We've pretty much seen this pattern before. I'd get out of that fairly quickly if we go above $6000-6050 again, but that's just me. You could also get faked out, too
I'm familiar with the topic - just interested in specifics about what people are seeing compared to normal. 
I think it's great that mostly non-whale orders are what pushed this up.
Looking at how ETHUSDSHORTs started stacking up in the mid-upper 400s I had a feeling it was only a matter of time till a move to the upside would be more favorable. Especially considering how much support there was for ETH in the 420s ( a breakdown of my trading the past few days [here](
https://www.reddit.com/r/ETHInsider/comments/8s7nug/biweekly_rethinsider_discussion_june_19_2018/e1553zm?utm_source=reddit-android) and my thought process) 

Edit: sorry about talking in terms of ETH, it's what I trade, but prefer this community.
That bounce wasn't just you covering your short? :P
Yeah, I remember that /u/L14dy called it... though that was right before the pattern ended.  I hope he made a good profit off it while it lasted
Lol I just said that in reply to a comment made by the OP.

But yeah sounds like you are right. 
Sure. fyi, an ascending triangle is a bullish pattern because we assume that the resistance (horizontal line on top) is being tested over and over (weakening it) until we break upwards. A rising wedge is a bearish pattern.

[https://www.tradingview.com/x/1SxMqb6M/](https://www.tradingview.com/x/1SxMqb6M/)
So those large market dumps that pushed us out of 7K and 6K were organic? GTFO!
Was there a single large market buy that caused this bounce? Honestly curious 
I'm not saying it's not the bottom.  I'm saying it's unlikely to be the bottom.  I don't ever claim to have magical powers to see the future, unlike many here.
agree.  I never thought i could buy back in at these levels.  Only thing that sucks is...im out of Fiat pretty much Lol
It does seem close to the bottom... Only thing that worries me is the early adopters “Capitulating”...
To be fair, if you said you were going to start escalating your dca long term stack right now with disposable income and plan to hold for 3-4 years where you think that another run will occur with LN, an ETF and further 'insert bull scenario here' , I'd have not said a word. 
Exactly...my buys range from $200 all the way to $9000.
He did not mention DCA in the above post. I support DCA, not everyone needs to trade. 
A lot of people knew it would drop to $6K.  Trading isn't gambling.
Are you guys f#cking with me? If you were holding for 3-4 years, why would you want less btc? 
A) that's an awful joke
B) my sentiment remains, black or white versions of investment are so misleading. Stock, bond, bitcoin, baseball card, whatever. If a trend is changing, saying blindly to hold on to the position for years = money is silly

By the way Big Mike, nice holding your breath underwater this weekend. Bravo, merman. 
No part of this thought process isn't retarded 
It would be fun to own 10000 BTC for $100 again, considering I missed the opportunity the first time.
> It is a 100% probability that it will break ATH. 

Just going to leave that there.

But perhaps it is likely that BTC does hit a new ATH in the future.  In 100 years, $20K will buy you what you can buy for $1K today, so makes sense.  But still not 100%. The sun rising in the east tomorrow is not 100%.
Look up "strawman arguments".
and even if thats's not the reason.  The world is a big place with many moving parts.  Bitcoin provides the first time in history that now there is another option.  a store of value where there are different rules and laws outside of any government.  Over time this technology will increase in value as more ppl understand and begin to respect it
That's great, and everything you just said adds up to about $7525.00 per BTC.
I'm just asking a question. I'm very receptive to sound arguments.

You are just making assumptions about my character based on a perfectly valid question.
Well, seeing as we hit $19900, yes, they were clearly very right. :P 

My point is there always be some crazy moonboi calling for ridiculous prices- it doesn't mean the bottom isn't in. and like you said, it doesn't mean he's necessarily wrong. 

Although I think calling for $300k btc from here would sound just as crazy 8)
Looking at shorts to longs ratio helps in assessing the sentiment. There's also this page: https://solume.io
Google searches statistics are not directly showing you the sentiment, but interest correlates closely
It's more like what /u/blessedbt said. It's about *how many* people and which ones are saying it.

For example, /u/Stokinator deleted his account a few hours ago. I think that guy was actually being pretty genuine. Seeing people like him get purged from the market is one of those things you should be watching out for as a potential signal
Unless you use log scale.
The price floor is above zero. Personally I don't think price will drop below $4k. 
Sep last year:
 
Some people here saying there is going to be a serious move up. But the price has already increased from $200 to $5k. The serious move has already happened. Perhaps price will go up further, but imo this is selling territory. The sentiment has really swung from bear to bull. The higher the price the better the selling opportunity.

I'd rather buy at 20k in an uptrend than 6k in a downtrend TBH but I'm always buying anyway 
There is this oldfangled ancient device called a laptop or a computer, which most people use to trade and do TA on
correct, thats exactly what I did
I'll bet money if you find an escrow service to handle the transaction. I won't bet just on some sort of reddit agreement because then I'll never get paid when I'm proven right. 
There's no way we go sub ~~15000~~ ~~10000~~ ~~8000~~ ~~7000~~ ~~6000~~ 5800.
Then, perhaps crypto is not for you. 
You sharing your favorite subreddit with me gypsy? 
Cryptowatch puts it on wednesday . What does tradingview use?  (I'm having a hard time figuring that out because their candle countdown doesn't appear on 1D+)
You didn't catch a knife at 6200...if you're long at 6200, the knife caught you. 
The dailies here are all available. Half of my trading strategy is based on 2014-2015 dailies. Those things are like fountains of knowledge. I have studied them extensively :P 

okay I'm exaggerating - but they're super useful. Sentiment is roughly the same. Talks of short squeezes, a few bears who stuck around and annoyed people, lots of people talking about ATH still.

Oddly enough as they neared the bottom sentiment got better because all of the people who were in it for a quick buck had been purged 

What's odd is the sentiment was better but they generally expected lower
There will be even more dreamers and optimists this time, regardless of how low it goes. It will take a long time to break them.
Awesome bot
A bear flag can be a bounce as well..it depends on the percentage. And a 10% bounce is a bounce.
Right
Tell me about it.
Producing bull divs all over the place... Wouldn't wanna open large shorts right now, TBH...
the downwards pressure means that those buyers are content just waiting and don't FOMO in when the price bounces 

so there is no follow through on the pumps and the price slowly bleeds down 
Ah okay. Interesting
Position updated with success.

* Position: long xbtu18

* Opening value: 6,070.00

* Average value: 5,846.70

* Leverage: 0.00X

* Stack: 75.00%

* PnL: 4.60%

[Check Open Positions](https://www.anotherbot.info/)


Yeah that's a fair probability, I'm not looking for an exact level but rather just start averaging into a larger position once we get to the $4400-$5300 zone. That price range is where I see the bottom for this dump.
If you die in bitcoin, you die in real life 
Nice meme. You've been preparing, I see.
what kind of logic is that lol.
Who cares 
Nah, he's a baller. Have you seen wolf of wall street? Nigga is my idol "sell me this pen" large ball motherfucker. The dude is a legend. But yeah he knows fuck all about crypto
Anyone not consumed by the hype knew what was happening as it was happening.  It was clear as day.
Yes but he's talking about a complete lack of liquidity where there are simply no buyers at lower price levels. It's possible but highly unlikely in btc at this point
I watched it just now, wrote that comment before I watched it.

Yea, it's a pretty lame video, but it's hard not to be like "I wonder..." when you hear shit like that from a guy who basically did this exact stuff. 

I just don't see him having a vested interest in "spreading FUD" or whatever. He didn't talk about bitcoin for the entirety of the $14,000* movement down. He's not exactly obsessing over it or anything
Yea, I feel a little bad for anyone who takes his "it's going to $0" shit seriously. But sometimes I really do wonder...it kinda scares me a bit every once in a while lol
exactly, most young people on social media right now don't know the history of Jordan Belford, and they'll take every single word he said to heart because he's a motivational speaker
banks will get in when they see that they won't lose money and that will be when bitcoin goes sideways bull, they aren't going to turn around the markets just because people want them to. Right now it is like trying to catch a falling knife, its not worth it just to try and catch the bottom.
Totally man. There’s no better way to protect the value of my wealth than to invest in something that loses 70% of it’s value in 6 months.
What. Who buys bitcoin to protect their wealth? 
While its true that bitcoin (better would be something like monero IMO) is good for money laundering and such the volume for demand just isn't there yet and people are afraid of the volatility of such speculative assets especially on the downtrend.
Totally agree with this - BAT could be one of those mainstream onramp use cases - at least that’s what I’m betting on. 
And yet...they are running out of coins to sell?
6 month range, 1 day blocks, volume in btc is a better pic
yup, that's just the first meaningful resistance to break
There were plenty of people who lost their "life advancement" money shorting the market last year too.   That is just volatility for you ...and opportunity for riches or ruin.
I'd say that their grief at "hodling" is misplaced. Holding with a smile is easy in the bull market seeing easy daily gains. The actual holding means in the first place making it mentally through downtrends. Many people don't seem to acknowledge that. I've been holding for a longer time, started trading not long ago, and the first thing I learnt, in general, is that nothing in Bitcoin is final. Whatever happens now maybe be completely invalidated next week or next month. People have no patience at all, or put differently, the patience they think they have melts quickly under pressure. 

As far as I remember we were already having funeral for Bitcoin twice before this year, definitely at the end of March. And then another cycle happened. I think many people too much look up to what's said online instead of trusting own instincts or common sense, too. It's hard to feel bad for them in the sense you described. It's like most of them *refuses* to learn.
Well if his investment had worked out his money will accelerate his life advancement multiple times. A lot of life is just dumb luck.
That’s terrible.

On a similar note, I had a passing interest in a few very shit coins.

Not too long ago they were filled with people going “all in” during “the dip”. 

Now the subs are almost dead. Like no posts for nearly a week. Reckon they lost almost everything.


> saying they fell for the hodl meme and they feel like idiots

the hodl principle was created for bitcoin not for alts
Ok, yeah, that's Capitulation.

If it helps I've be holding 15k worth of coin since $7000+

I've just written it off for now, I'm not angry, just looks as though I'm in it for the long term. Miners are now off though and going on ebay.

But if Litecoin hits $20 I'm buying that shit.
There's a lot of emotional trading that will happen in the next few days I think, and people like the one you pointed out will be boned again in their desperate attempt to recuperate their losses. 
your call.  There is undoubtedly more liquidity in BTC/USDT than there is in TUSD/BTC, but if you're setting it at a round number (0.0002 BTC, which would be the equivalent of $5,000 TUSD unless my math is wrong) at a price that would probably send the market into a frenzy, you'd probably get filled OK.  Switching to Tether would cost you another 0.1-0.2&#37; in fees too.
hot damn son
Triggered
More that you end every post with "LUL", letting everyone know you are no older than 14... or at least the mental capacity of a 14 year old.
I don't know but being too emotional is how to lose trades. 
What will change the prices you buy in at is your mind, which will likely change quite a few times before 2k.
> Bcash can also make you money.

only if you wiretap Ver and Wu or befriend their secretary.
That's the spirit
Make a low value comment get a low value reply.
Wrong again. It's been through at least 2 times and maybe 3 but I would have to check.
Yup
You assume that they would all sell the moment they get their BTC...
I am not really counting on getting mine back, although I probably will.  I should be hedge shorting the approx value, but just don't feel like doing it for some reason.  
I would like to claim mine as well. They said they will be updating the new claim form? Is it out yet?
hot sauce
I dont know where this made up fact that:

>"MTGOX customers love Bitcoin and would never sell for DIRTY FIAT" 

came from... People in here seem to keep repeating this as if its their religious mantra...
I wanted VW Golf, guess I'll have to wait a couple months maybe even years
Go finance one for $500 a month like a normal person. 
No, someone can read. You didn't say shit about 5800. Go masturbate to your fantasies somewhere else.
Nice life 
Upvote for boldness.
!remind me 24 hours
Based on what? Go on explain why it will "easily" go to 2500-1000k. 
People will literally fight over buying BTC at 1000. I know I will. 

I think, psychologically, the question is: when would you feel it’s a steal? That’s where we’ll see a convincing reversal. 

Would be nice to have a sharp drop to that point, but much more likely it will be a slow bleed. 
Thre are too many people who missed the boat this past year when it was going past 2k ....   They are already on the side lines... they've seen the potential but they want a good entry point.   At least that's my guess  but I agree it will go lower since nobody wants to buy too early
Honestly I feel like we past that. I remember there was a day...it was I think the dump before the BGD in april where we were at 6500 and /r/cryptocurrency was basically dead, there was a suicide hotline on the front page and in the daily people were literally calling themselves idiots and saying they were depressed and they took too much loans out...there was very little positive sentiment. It felt like a tomb.
it's not going to be tradeable.. after it crashes to 2500 or whatever the fair value is it'll sit there in a low volatility accumulation pattern for years.  We'll all long have forgotten about the corn until one day we look at the news and it spikes to 20k.


Wow lol. You guys really dealt with some shit.

I still can't wrap my mind around a capitulation wick like that. It's hard to believe that could happen here...would be absolutely bonkers. 
lol no you didn't :P
Good luck man. I'll be bottom fishing with ya
The impressive thing about this candle was how much bigger it was than the red ones with similar volume. That is extremely informative as to the actual state of the market, whatever the price might be.
We have not declined neatly enough for a $100 move to be the same % change as a $1000 move. If we do we might actually get the suicide numbers posted here. 2k BTC would be savage. 
you tell me....the original BGD happened at $6,800.

Gotta catch that Chewie-kemon
Zzzzzzzzzzz....I said it is likely to go down to $2500 or so in the next couple of years.  I didn't say anything about 0.
Great non answer. Useless response
Just closed my hedge. I think this will paint a bf and go more up. If not I'm gonna short hard on 6k break.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Is that even shorting???  All he did is sell and buy later.... Is everyone else confused here or am I?      That's coinbase pro. 
I know "alot" of Europeans, so I know that. :P
Not necessarily...
well you mentioned you prefer BCH over LTC. 

I personally don't really see the point of LTC anymore either but to each their own...

I think LTC will generally disappoint people. But yea, no one is going to believe that or swallow that pill very easily
Charlie Lee buys low and sells high. Good signal so far on the LTC ATH.
i feel like i'm getting a great deal after selling the majority of stack in 12k-15k area.
every fiber of my being wishes he was a LARPer as it would give me hope the world is full of secret genius.  But alas, it's not true.

Lmao wow. Jesus christ
I definitely want to own a coin that is called a "national security threat" by the Feds. Who wouldn't? LOL!
When will these BTC be distributed to the lucky holders?
> If Gox were to sell it would have been OTC thus not affecting market price.

OTC sales absolutely do affect market price, just not with the same immediacy as a massive market order.
also giancarlo is going to need a lot more tether to prop up the price lol
Yes, I agree, but at least here below 6 there has been a little more natural appearing small scale movements. 
I should have clarified, as the cost of the coin goes down similar $ moves are usually larger correlating percent changes. 
Depends on the day and the price level, but yeah I have seen both and I would partially agree to that. However, usually it looks like tiny bot micro transactions drifting rather than the kind of human looking movements I would like to see. 
There are whales on both sides. It's not as easy as you think.
Just look at the precious metals markets for example. Manipulated for ages already.
I use defaults :)
If you believe in the tech long term and can afford to wait, you are still 90% safe, in my opinion...it is unlikely we never again exceed the ATH. 
You should take profit. You should always have a plan for taking profit when you invest.
Meh I'm in between. Although I always question  huge 5 min candles, where it happened (ETH S1 fib pivot point on the 4h and daily) wasn't too much of a suprise. Not to mention that and what you stated in regards to people panic buying trying to time the bottom, the r/r imo lined up for a decent trading opportunity 
So what is it?


But they're designed around emotions, a lot of times. Like a range bot trying to get in at the start of a rally, for example. In some instances they amplify emotions. 
“My alt coins are the ones that will succeed”
Depends where you bought. If you bought at $6k you're losing 25% of your investment...
How do you know we are close to reaching bottom? Bottom to me seems around 2k...
That seems insane.
Thanks for letting us know, it's valuable data.
deposits are not open yet
Unless he bought bitconnect or some other shity coin. 
Damn Yes brother.....but the fact that I was in XRP says a lot to!
> But it already is for so many reasons.

Well, no, because people really rarely use it to spend it on things. I wanted to buy reddit gold for someone with btc the other day and...well, realized I couldn't even do that...
"Global currency" as in "replacing USD"? Of course that won't happen. But who expected that? That's pure hype and delusion. But as an alternative global means of settling transactions, Bitcoin already succeeded. Worse, it's never going to go away. Speculative price action is what is is, but the fundamentals won't die away. It doesn't matter if Bitcoin is worth 10k or 50 bucks in this regard.

An example: You can sell everything you have. Everything. Just keep a few hundred bucks for travelling expenses. And maybe a small laptop, 13" or something. Put all the funds in Bitcoin. Memorise your wallet seed, in Electrum's case that's usually 12 words or so. Put your ass on a plane and fly across the world flying luggage free, no redtape, no bank transfers, no bullshit of any sort, and start anew there. Completely impossible even 2 years back.

**Bitcoin promises you shit. It simply gives you options. Options you didn't have a moment ago. It's up to you to either use them or not.** FFS, you're a Bitcoin trader. You can now operate freely in high risk but also high reward market. You don't need any twit from Wallstreet and their shilling, their bullshit, their promises, their soap in your eyes. You can do that yourself. Be own hedge. Fuck, be your own bank. Make a few good choices. Make a fortune quickly. Again, impossible a moment ago.

Edit: I upvoted you.

Again, this is all speculation, but I would imagine if BTC were to become a global currency then the growth rate would be pretty steady, gaining a small percentage a year vs the dollar or whatever else you want to pin it against. Also, the people who loan BTC will take in that growth rate when calculating the interest, so in a free market people will still fight to have the lowest possible interest rate.
Yeah I see it that way, but when scrolling the daily thread it just doesn't exist. Like it's hidden . Weird.
Yeah, it's sad there -- there's even a trending guide on how to dump what's left of your bags -- [https://www.reddit.com/r/CryptoCurrency/comments/8thh18/do\_you\_own\_a\_shitcoin\_a\_beginners\_guide/](https://www.reddit.com/r/CryptoCurrency/comments/8thh18/do_you_own_a_shitcoin_a_beginners_guide/)
You’ll see what I mean if we keep going the way I think we will. Too many people think bitcoin will go up again later. Despair will set in when people realize (even if it isn’t true) that bitcoin is worthless and never going back up to where it was (once again, even if that isn’t true, but the fact that people believe it is what matters). When that happens, and we skip lower and lower and lower, and people have moved on and forgotten is when whales will buy in and the reversal will begin. 
All of those people believe in bitcoin long term though. When people start truly questioning the longevity of their investment and wonder if it will ever go back up again is when true despair sets in. Possibly a market crash or mass global unemployment will spark it, but I think we have a good ways to go until we bottom out. And this year is not the year for any reversals. 
Would you consider wikipedia to be a decentralized project then? Not trying to be smart here genuinely asking
It's not his fault he's like this, it's just the way things turned out
He doesn’t look at charts, know what resistance/support is or go to bear subs at Reddit. He doesn’t even give much thought about his actions, it’s all feeling and for some reason today he felt a pain he didn’t felt all the way down from 20k
Buy high sell low is the new smart?
Please go and read the dailies from the 2nd half of 2014 to very bottom of the market and tell me what the sentiment was. 

The entire notion of a "maximum pain" period before/around the bottom is a bear fantasy. It didn't happen 2014, it did not happen with the dot com bubble, it did not happen with Nikkei. Its literally never happened. 
I don't think the general public will find Bitcoin or any crypto more appealing if it is "on sale".  Look at how many penny stocks there are that maybe went up 300&#37; in a week, but are now down 60&#37;, and tell me how appealing those are to "normies."
My friends think it’s just a big scam and only for big whales to manipulate.

I’m the last one standing. I see opportunity, they see failure. People became rich and wealthy buying up dirt cheap real estate after the crash. I view the same for crypto.
Most everything in this space is a scam and a ponzi and uses bad technology though, and who is making money besides the vast minority since ATH? 
Yes a lot of people are angry because they were too lazy or not smart enough to profit from the rise.  Also, dumb people get angry when confused (which happens often with crypto), and poor people hate wealthy people (speaking generally).   So all this causes the low IQ crowd to think BTC is "imaginary money" and scam/ponzi, etc. 
It's the beginning of the area of support we had goin on for the longest time. Market was unable to drop below $6450 in April, now we should have a pretty hard time going above it. $6250 is the beginning of that area of supp turned resistance.

Plus, there's a fatty sell wall at $6300 on bfx. 
I guess we'll know on Monday. Not sure how much mooning can be expected on a Sunday.
Most lambo dealerships dont accept crypto, so you need that paper money. 
Give me any other reason. I'm genuinely curious what other reasons you could come up with

Okay I was obviously exaggerating just a little bit by saying "quite literally the only reason" but really...it doesn't need to be much more complicated than "people taking profits are overwhelming people interested in buying more"
Not when you're holding hundreds of thousands of dollars that came from $15,000. Not everyone likes to watch their $600,000 turn into $450,000 just cause it's "house money"

For someone who invested $15,000, that's life changing money. It makes perfect sense to cash out now. Really, it's not hard to understand why when you realize there are still thousands upon thousands of people holding 6 figures from crypto gains in 2011-2013. It's life changing money for *lots* of people and squandering it away because of a meme ("hodl!") is very silly

e: he also says "Doesn't feel good. Lost $350k so far this year. Totally changed my plans for the future." so I imagine he just really doesn't want to see more money disappear. When you started with $15k losing $350k feels terrible. Losing another $100k would probably feel even worse because it starts going from "awesome life changing money" to "well this is nice for a year or two"
Some people somehow don't understand this. I don't really get how. I mean I still get pretty mixed reactions for mentioning it but it's really the simplest and clearest explanation for any downwards movement we're seeing. 

Everyone keeps asking "who's selling?" when the significantly more important question is "who's buying?" 
F
F,  no lambo, just me and my used electric blanket mobile. 
bitmex there was a 10million btc buy order that pushed the price up that entire way.  It would push to the front, get eaten a little, pull back a bit and refill up to 10 mil then push the front again.  Every few seconds the entire push.  We stopped going up when he flipped short
Alright, bud.
I’m not you pal, guy.
Yea, GL man. Looks like it might bart down, bit way too many fakeouts to make a call lately man.
That depends on your perspective. To people like me, who got into this market last fall, anything in the 5-8k range is "cheap". And I think that's one of the reasons it's been so difficult for bitcoin to find a bottom: people entered at dramatically different price ranges.
and yet I do.

A lot of things have changed since last year, don't get stuck in your graphs.
Sure, i'm more an investor than a trader. Would you buy bitcoin if it hit $1000?

If you would, go back in time and tell people in 2014 you think $1000 is cheap.
No funding fees on futures 
You stop shorting when you’re no longer in a downtrend. Limit every trade’s loss to a max of 1-2% of total equity and you’ll be fine. Switch long when the trend is up.
when major supports start holding, when major resistances start breaking, when i stop making money off shorts
Ok, well this market did not screw anyone over. Any market is designed to extract money from some distribute to others. Gold, soybeans, whatever. 

You may be right on rats fleeing the sinking ship though, bu IDK. My entries were in that range and I cannot concieve of waiting until break even to make that call. This cannot be everyone's first market cycle, not everyone is 19....I stick to my call that there is no free lunch and no matter where we land, it won't be straight down, even stupid shorters will have to lose some just like those that longed the top. 
Well said.

I can't wait for this shit to be over.  As much as I like being right after permabulls crapped on me for months... It'll feel better when I'm "right" in the next cycle beginning in a year or two.
not everyone who criticizes bitfinex is bitfinexed
no
Dude, seriously...get there faster.
Yeah haha spot on this time with timing the bottom :D Thanks to the proprietary Palmerstoned Crypto Hack EMA's ™ lmao https://www.coinigy.com/s/i/5b2fce05e50f4/ 
nope, and your obsession with me is creepy.  

But it's bedtime, so no posts for awhile, and no sick fantasies from you.
No, those were strong weak hands.  These are the ones who only held through a $14,000 drop, so they must be very weak.
I doubt it, halving is going to kickstart shit. I know ill be buying all i can next year, doubt im alone in that
I'd like to see a little more price action first but I am leaning towards doing that fo sho
I hope you realize I just copy and pasted what he wrote and formatted it :P
Neko-chan the pro trader!
> That's not really how support works.

Actually, it is exactly how support works.  6k was support and it is broken.  Next support is arguably around 5500. 
I fully agree with that. I may have been triggered by someone *apparently* repeating the meme of "bitcoin goes to 100k anyways and it doesn't matter where you buy in", which is patently bad advice.
Will you kindly send me half of your bitcoin stack, then?
Yes, that in turn leads me to short futures at a lower price. So there really isn't that much difference between shorting perpetual + paying funding and shorting futures.
About 5% shorts closed on this leg up, barely anything.  The 12% of shorts that opened after the previous drop to 6k during the bounce back up to 6250 appear to still mostly be open.
Looking at the chart in TradingView, looks like about 1000 out of 29,000 of them closed on Bitfinex...not a lot. 
It will get pulled
How long do custodial issues take to resolve? I was reading it could take up to a few years before institutions would ever consider getting near this.

What more regulatory clarity do we need from the SEC/CFTC? Genuinely unaware
probably because that conversation has played out about 2 dozen times in my comment history alone lol.

I ask that question all the time. Never gotten a particularly satisfactory answer which is why I keep asking but people for some reason still seem to believe in it 
I feel like we are in a hidden uptrend. 
Yeah this is one I'm closely babysitting on the 3m charts
oh guess it depends on the exchange. Usually I find bots that make it next to impossible to set and fill limit orders for shorter term trades that I'm trying avoid taker fees on. I assume that helps a ton in scalping bounces but I've been short so I haven't been been making frequent trades to know exactly.
It's interesting. This could've just been a big coincidence and lots of little orders lined up to make it look like there is more support here than there actually is. Either way, this will frighten some shorts and may cause them to stop being complacent.
Lol! It should have been. I'd have set stops at $6k but I was exhausted and my internet went out so I said fuck it I'm going to bed. Bad decision :(

I also probably would've gotten fucked on slippage though f
Man, I have lost most of my profits trying to call a bottom. Getting ready for one more kicking tho :)
Thanks, I see I included some candles earlier. I thought an ascending triangle in a downtrend means continuation of the trend - down right? Same as my bear flag/pennant
Thanks, I see I included some candles earlier. I thought an ascending triangle in a downtrend means continuation of the trend - down right? Same as my bear flag/pennant
I never said that either. When market makers aren’t trying to incite FOMO or fear the market largely move sideways on low-volume. 
Check the heat maps. Do you think all of the sudden out of the blue all the masses decided to start buying up BTC and then abruptly stop?

Look at buys <1 and look at buys >10.
What does capitulating mean?
Ok great reply, i spent the majority of my investable funds last summer.  Very lucky to still have a foundation and not completely underwater, but i did keep buying after 6k last year and am down a lot.  While i could brag that my cheapest buy in is 2250, i can't brag about my most expensive which was 16800 and 14k and below
ahh cool thanks for sharing
point is, the technology is valuable and unlikely to become a hobby. Bitcoin provides a store of value that is globally recognized, trusted, permissionless  and censorship resistant 
Lol lets hope that never becomes reality 
in 100 years 1 BTC will be 1 trillion USD or none at all, b/c USD won't exist anymore. That could mean 1 BTC buys a small island or a loaf of bread. That's my point, the purchasing power might not go up again but it is a fact that 1 BTC will be worth more than 20k USD at some point in the future. You are just restating my point.
> Over time this technology will increase in value 

The technology you speak of is blockchain technology, not bitcoin technology.
Pulled that number right out of your ass or do you have a reason?
Well ok, didn’t sleep to well last, annoying air conditioning. 

Anyway, look at the historical price movements. Bubbles are what makes bitcoin. So not making a new ath would be breaking the 10 year old pattern for one. 

Second, adoption is growing, scaling is coming online, new solutions will be built on top of that, smart contracts coming to bitcoin... so much will happen. 
Remindme! 3 years
It *can* help. Remember that not all longs/shorts are equal. A whale with a good track record opening up a 3000 btc short isn't the same as 1000 disillusioned investors opening up a 3.3x short at the bottom. Same for longs obviously 
I think the market is pinching out a log right now!
True.  But if someone put a fixed dollar amount in bitcoin at the top, the majority of their dollar losses have already occurred.  For an early investor, when $3000 was reached only a minority of their dollar gains had already occurred.  This is why the situations are not comparable. 
I agree it is extremely unlikely, but there is always a chance, even if 1%, that bitcoin fails entirely.
They wouldve been right. The higher the price the further bitcoin got into the selling territory. I slowly offloaded some coins once price got above $12k. Now I'm doing the reverse. 
It's risky buying if the trend has been going for a long time. 
not disagreeing (I don't do TA on my phone or tablet), just pointing out the limitations on mobile.
Yeah definitely don't want to analyze much on a phone, but it's nice to have when I'm laptopless.
LOL. okay. I'll look in to it. 1 bitcoin you're wrong. 
Yeah, except I never said any of those. 
Or perhaps I know how to trade profitably and not hold like a helpless victim.
One of them, yeah!
Still bleeding at this point regardless.  A DCB would be welcome. 
He didn't say he caught the knife by the handle
oh nice, i didn't know this sub existed back then. Ill go check it out.

Thank you :)
No buyers in sight just bots and scalpers. Long at your own peril. Long term trend not close to broken. 
[deleted]
you won the daily
[deleted]
Right, being an ignorant narcissistic thief is baller. I forgot. Sounds like you're more enamored by Leo and a hollywood script than the real thing.
Well all the hype, media, social, influencers etc, sucked in the average joe unaware of that “clear day”. “You’re early, get in now... It’s digital gold blockchain, and HODL”. Looking back, seems there was a big plan & marketing strategy for a great transfer of wealth.
That's...not how it works. The lower we go the stronger support we will hit. There is more liquidity farther down...starting at 5100-5400 level, 4700-4900, 4200-4400, 3700-3800, etc. These are all stronger levels than anything we've dropped past so far. I didn't watch the video but if that's really what he said the dude is retarded.
He said "you will hear from me a lot more often now" at the end of the video.

He is going to be all over the place now, just wait until he is back on TV with his FUD.
There's plenty of stuff to be scared of, just don't let that scumbag dictate what it is. 
I am right there with you. I can't imagine most people not thinking about that from time to time. I'm not a very technologically-inclined person. I can't rattle off bitcoin facts or explain its fundamentals and history like some people here can. So I stick to technical analysis because I actually "get" that.
It protects your value from becoming too high if you're not worth it ;-)
Since I've been hodling it, my value has gone up many hundreds of TIMES. 

You kids with your crazy-short time horizons will learn eventually. 
Nobody, they buy monero.
Wasn't that the mantra, “storage of value” to “hodl”? I’m not bitter, just a shit trader ;)
Lol... Cmon, does this really need an answer? HODL is the mantra of Millions of bitcoin believers around the world, including some very public people like Tim Draper, the Winklevii, lots of self-styled cypherpunks, including a fair percentage of all those bitcoin devs sitting on tons and tons of coins waiting for the day when there isn't another currency to cash out to. 

You dip the price 50&#37;, that only means we get to buy twice as many. 
You're barking up the wrong tree completely. Read Saifedean Ammous' "The Bitcoin Standard" to fully appreciate what I mean by store of value & wealth.

Bitcoin is something the world has never seen before and isn't powerful enough to resist. 
lol
I’m not OP, I’m just responding with what I know about top wallet census data.  My best guess is all the selling is coming from smaller fish or the top wallets are selling and  buying back lower.  The top wallets are actually gaining btc.
Yea, but with traders they basically signed up for that. Some of these guys are just really naive and hopeful and really fell for some of this. It makes me sad

I know it's their fault, yada yada. But I just feel bad, man. Damn, shit's bringin' me down. 
Yea, unfortunately with alts hodling is not the way to go imo lol because some of those alts will go to like 1% ATH and never come back 
Well it didn't and now he pushed his life goals back years. :'(
Man this shit's too depressing. People just getting suckered out of their money. And they probably feel like huge chumps. That's the thing that pissed me off the most when I finally sold my investment at like breakeven and then made a bunch of bad trades. 

I just felt like a god damn chump that gave my money away to some asshole whale. 

That's what motivated me to keep trading this, actually. I was like there's no way in hell I'm walking away having given my money to some rich dickhead like a total chump lmao
That you understand that makes you far ahead of most of that sub.
Yea. This is a pretty pathetic "bounce". It's frustrating and odd seeing the market so hesitantly step downwards. I have a feeling we're going to basically throw up and then bounce and people are going to get rekt from all sides. 

None of this has been real market panic yet. Just despair. The panic selling doesn't seem to have started, just a weird slow downtrend 


Thanks, mind sharing how you did the math to come up with that?
If people are on a trading sub and too stupid to see a pattern tracing out. What else is there to say to them?

Are there a bunch of YouTube video traders in here or something? When their favorite rock star says something then that's what they go with?

Like the people down voting Me Above are literally too stupid to know what an inverse head-and-shoulders is. That's a bull break if the pattern completes. The second scenario would be a fall which I laid out. I'm reasonably sure the people down voting that have no idea what an inverse head-and-shoulders even is and they are on a trading sub. Seriously what the fuck

This has me salty. 
Possibly but I've always said I'd buy in staggered as each of these prices is reached. That definitely won't change. I have the mi ey set aside, will keep the plan as it/if it plays itself out.

Should we go below 2k,ill buy at 1.5k and 1k 
Or if you just watch BTC, Bcash moves more percentage wise than BTC and if you are working out your gains in % then it's a winner.

I trade other coins not just BTC, trading profitably means to diversify your portfolio. 
Yes, and rejected back under it every time so far. But don't ask me ask him ;)
Not sure. Check your email.
I was hoping my “crypto” investment would allow for such financing. Obviously, “normal” folks were aware that this asset class would crash 80% in less than six months...
So tell me what the fuck is this??

https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8tfcql/daily_discussion_sunday_june_24_2018/e17bvms?utm_source=reddit-android
Based mainly on the chart, with consideration to Bitcoin's deteriorating fundamentals and general level of adoption, along with how many gov'ts are banning and restricting it.  The point is that it's becoming less useful, not more useful over time.  But mostly, it's the chart and a return to the long-term uptrend line.
Every other bitcoin bubble.
History repeats. both the good and the bad bits! 
> People will literally fight over buying BTC at 1000. I know I will.

You would today.  I would today.  But will you after 8 more months of pain?   And will you after all the bad news that comes out that forces it down to 1000?

I would feel it's a "steal" whenever the market price is too low for the current reality of the fundamentals and technicals.  

But I might build a long position when there was some support at around $2700.  But again, it depends on a lot of future variables that cannot be seen accurately right now.
It’s all relative. I remember thinking I missed the boat at $50. 
Yea, it's crossed my mind more than a few times that this could be the bottom and we're seeing people panic selling a little too late. But the V bounce would've been at $6k, which was literally 2 months after the ATH. I don't think we saw 2 years of ridiculously insane gains just to see the bottom in 2 months. 

I still think this thing's got a bit lower to go personally, but we'll see 
lol yeah basically. Deep down I really think this market has a long bear market ahead of it. if the tech never improves/finds a use case, I can't see it mooning again.

But I can't really say that here because people flip out and get upset
Yes I did actually. Rebought them at $200 the next day and decided I was going to the moon or to $0 but not missing out if there was another run.
It shows that some people are definitely ready to panic buy as soon as they see a hint of recovery O_O

We'll see if they follow through though
> 2k BTC would be savage.

So would ponies and unicorns frolicking on the grounds of your mansion in the sky.  But it ain't gonna happen. :p

Useless to you, because you don't understand the very basics of all of this.
I can't really decide what to do, so I'm not going to force it. If we don't get over 6300 in the coming hours, I'll probably reopen the hedge and add heavily on a $6K break. I'm not confident we did all this just to reverse off 5750. 
I get what you're saying, but that isn't shorting.  Just an FYI, since using the terminology incorrectly can make your post seem misleading.
Lol. Did you actually hold it open that long? There's no way lmao. 
Oh sorry, didn't realize you were just being a douche? 
Not saying it'll be instant. If this is reversal they'll eventually catch up.
totally agree. markets are expression of free will.
I'd agree, except for the part that you don't find out about his move until after the fact.  If Charlie Lee bought LTC today, and a month from now it is at $300, when do you think we would find out about it?  Don't get me wrong, he has every right to keep his moves to himself, but his actions are a major lagging indicator.
Inconclusive, but it brings a smile to think he might have been -- just hope he didn't capitulate, if so, r.i.p -- was good entertainment
They have the potential to affect price if the holder decides to sell on the market. The OTC trade itself does not affect the price - the coins are just transferred from one whale to another off of exchanges.
Lol. tether is a drop in the bucket, they couldn't use it to prop up a bear market even if they wanted to. And I personally don't believe in the theory that its not backed
exactly i was just thinking about this today.  And down at these prices i imagine its more risky to manipulate the market
Do you have experience trading the precious metals markets?
Yes, exactly.
I’m in agreement with you. I don’t know how long it will take but I believe a new ATH will eventually be had. Since I did get my initial investment out, this is money/coins I don’t need, so I can afford to be patient. Stubbornly patient even. It still hurts like hell tho, and has done a number on my mental health
I just want my -8.7% red 1h candle! Is that too much to ask?! :P

The green candle gets all the fun panic pumps but red candles have been laborious and measured in comparison -_-
[deleted]
if he bought bitconnect maybe he should reconsider college 
Well, then it is a revolutionary global store of value and if you like to, you can even spend it on things. I also think it is better than gold because I can't spend gold anywhere, but I can spend Bitcoin in various places already.
But that's reddit's problem, not Bitcoin's? A counter argument: Now you can make a transfer to a friend in, say, Tonga islands without any red tape involved. Without hassle. Completes in minutes. Impossible a few years back. That's just one example.


Actually the price of bitcoin does matter because there will come a point where if it is too low it isn't worth mining anymore even with difficulty adjustments down. And/or there simply won't be enough of them to mine left to be worth it at such a price. But I guess you can't rule out charity miners to keep the torch lit.
And why are you so quick to dismiss that it can't happen? I will concede the fact that some centralization will have to happen in order to conduct all the transactions but it would be no different than what we have today, like Visa. Visa is a second layer onto the dollar, which is what LN could be. For me, scalability is the only issue stopping BTC from becoming a global currency. Granted, it is a very big and difficult issue. 
No. Wikipedia database can be overridden and censored and users don't own their contributed content.
Yes, as I described above. He probably saw that a new low for the year was in and no one was scrambling to buy it up, in a continuation of a downtrend from ATH. It was a lesson that should have been clear to all who are watching that crypto is not invincible and speculation is not the same as bringing in real world value and it is only worth what someone is willing to pay and there there are no hard and fast rules about floors when a bubble is deflating. 
Cutting losses is a smart move, can't win em all.
So if you buy at $20k you just hold til it goes to $0? Genius.
The dailies don't reflect maximum pain.  People don't post their goodbyes here before they jump off the ledge.  

And I never said there was maximum pain at the bottom.  I said that we likely aren't even close to the maximum pain level for longs/holders.

At the bottom, the remaining sellers have capitulated and already sold.  That's why it is called "capitulation"
I wouldn't call the blockchain tech "bad technology", but yes the exchanges get hacked often and there is general incompetence and fuckery everywhere.  I never knew how many scammers and thrives there in this world until I got into crypto.  (Yes I was naive, and now I am not).
There is a place in your mind where you say you can't handle the thought of it shrinking more, and that overpowers the desire to see it maybe grow more some day. It is a bad idea to sell until it is a good idea. 

I know if I was sitting on a million that was now 500k or something and I had a house and car to pay off I would create a "stop loss" to preserve the life changing component. 
If it was life changing money, why not sell at least a portion on the way up?  I sell some every doubling of price.  Why did they hold all the way from December only to sell now?  This irrationality is dangerous. 
Okay it's *ACTUALLY* really truly unspeakably uncool of bitcoin to go below $5800. It's simply...mathematically impossible. 
So now when it *doesn't* Bart it is a fakeout.
And yet, nothing has changed. What has changed? Who is regularly transacting with BTC? Did all the exchange hacks go away? Did all the transaction fees at peak get resolved or is LN still just an infant? 

The only thing that has changed is that a speculative bubble started deflating and more people thing POS/DPOS and governance are good for blockchain. 

Absolutely nothing is better since last year. 
At what point during the price decline will you stop making unprofitable purchases of a speculative asset?

'Investing' is a charitable description of bitcoin collecting.
Oops, you're right. I meant to say the following:

>I considered [futures], but it seems the ridiculous short funding fee [of perpetuals] is reflected by the negative premium on the futures, and by the time funding fee has turned to normal, people will start covering their futures shorts
Are you using a weekly chart to identify the switch in a trend? When we zoom way out, previous trends do indeed seem obvious.
I edited my comment from "fucked people over" to "went from euphoria to the depths of hell" lol. Cause really the market has been quite nice to everyone who got in in the first half of 2017.

and it's not that I think *everyone* will sell. it's just, there are sellers waiting, basically. 

I'm curious what your plan is actually, and what your entry was?

I don't think it's because anyone is 19 and dumb- I think it has more to do with the euphoria and a lack of critical thinking because of it. It's very easy to sit back and endure this bear market when you're still up 200-300%. 

Once that starts nearing people's entries, they pop in here because they're worried.
**T**here in no need to be upset.
I knew what you meant, but if they said it for a whole minute, it doesn't change a thing.
Which values do you use ?
😂😂😂 you’re a strange one. Go up and down this daily and it’s riddled with your comments. Funny you only show up to patronize folks who are losing money. Think you’re the one with the sick fantasy. 
> I know ill be buying all i can next year

I know you won't buy any next year.  Because I have magical powers to see the future too.
Don't be the guy who didn't close longs or take profits on the way up! You've earned it, enjoy the wins man!

But yeah, we are likely going down more..... 
I went for 30% kicker at 6.1 on Sept, if this will have a big follow up then it's gonna be a nice starter. To bad I missed 5.8 :-\
I didn't realize that, but not surprised.  That sounded a little overly simplistic for you.
There is no such thing as a Pro Trader. I mean maybe there's a handful of guys who are just wildly successful but if you met one I really doubt they would want to be called that. I have no ego and really try not to have any emotion. It clouds your judgement
Lol says some guy in a YouTube video maybe. Backtest the markets and get back to me on that
These things take time.
"a few years" ... could be right; not sure why that's pessimistic. If 2018 is 2014, then that timing could fit history quite well. 
I don't want to rehash a bunch of stuff if you've had this conversation a million times already but, do you know about the Investment Advisors Act of 1940?  Kingdom Trust is the only authorized custodian for BTC and they are some small shit company out of Tennessee I believe that no institutional investor would ever stake their reputation on?

If you don't that's the rabbit hole to go down as to why there is no institutional money yet.
where do you trade mostly?
Haha good luck with it.  I'm just reverse hodling until the cycle competes... Only with the trading stack of course.  I take few risks, lol
Had to refresh on my patterns real quick. You're right. It's a continuation pattern. Usually occurs in uptrends because of its bullish implications. Sometimes it occurs in a downtrend as a reversal pattern. According to Bulkowski, ascending triangles are more reliable as "continued downward movement" when they occur in a downtrend.
It means giving up on making as much profit as they had expected.
Good luck man, I really want and hope for another run, next time where the use cases are a bit less speculative.

I made a ton of mistakes last year also. Hopefully btc comes back with a vengeance sooner than later. 
so point is I'm not selling and holding.  If i were brand new though id probably be buying big here, cause to ride it down 50% from here would not be a big deal, and then i could buy more down there to DCA
All of those things are true but 100% irrelevant to your baseball card analogy
It isn't globally trusted.  In fact it is globally not trusted by the overwhelming majority of humanity.
USD will probably exist in 100 years.  And BTC probably won't be $0.000000000.  That means that no one would even pay a thousandth of a penny for all the BTC in existence, which is unlikely.
What is this, 2014?
Bitcoin is more than just blockchain, it's multiple technologies that have come together for the first time and have proven to be a robust time tested secure store of value that has first mover advantage.  You have a naive opinion of it.
Cant have a blockchain without a currency attached to it. Crypto 101. Unless you are talking about a centralized blockchain which completely defeats the purpose. 
Here we go again
He definitely did, and it was pretty funny. Lol he says some funny shit sometimes. 
A little slow there, aren't you.  The point is that # is just as valid as $20K or $25K for Bitcoin's fundamentals.
Thought adoption of btc (used for payments) has declined and people begin to doubt its actual use. Got something to support your claim?
There is little that says bct willl break ath again. Especially not now when manipulation of market is under investigation. Crypto has been a rulefree playground of speculation WITHOUT possibility for shorting (betting on value decrease). Now when shorting/futures exist as an 'unofficial' value regulator of a market that before only could find profit on constant escalating values, and governments are interested in manipulation... there's little that speaks for bct breaking ath ever again. Hope it will though.
BTC has indeed known many bubbles. There may be more coming (I think we all hope so at least), but past performance is no guarantee of future performance.

Adoption is actually decreasing, and while I think smart contracts have much potential, ETH has been doing it successfully for a while already and is in just as bad as position a BTC.

I believe in the technology, but looking at the market BTC, (and definitely most alts) seem to be overvalued (hence everything is dropping like a rock). It's very quiet regarding use cases, and at this point I'm doubtful we'll see ATH for a very long time, if ever.
Well yeah, true.
Fair enough.
Ok sounds good. I was around during the dotcom bubble. Can’t tell you how many times I heard “that cannot possibly go below” x amount about a dotcom on yahoo messageboards which was the only place to communicate online about stocks. A lot of them went to zero.
You're right, $1000 is a super duper magic number that BTC can never cross... Because muh fundamentals.
Naw, I'm good.
[deleted]
Yup it's super useful. You're probably going to be depressed/creeped out at how similar it is. 
Breaking log support is unprecedented. I really doubt it will do that. 
I'd rather be a narcissistic thief than a wage slave. Nigga is a baller for gaming the system and becoming a god
Absolutely it did.  
He's suggesting some sort of mass exodus where a bunch of large players scramble for the exits and there is no liquidity to support it. Compared to normal financial markets, btc's liquidity is pretty poor, so I see what he's saying, although like I said, it's very unlikely

Has nothing to do with support levels etc. He's saying supply will completely overwhelm demand in every single way
The main thing that threw me off and made me go "ehh" was his "I'm a believer in blockchain technology though" line.

like lol
I think I'm mainly just uncomfortable holding a lot of btc, especially on some of these exchanges. I'd much rather hold it on GDAX or something, but mostly I'd rather cash some out and hold less

I'm just hoping we hit my targets soon so I can close my positions and cash out a bit of my holdings. 
I found your comment funny due to the current situation. Anyways, keep one thing in mind: crypto isn't guaranteed to go up forever. Eventually we will hit a ceiling. Do I think that ceiling was $20k? No, I think we will have a new ATH. But is there a guarantee of that? No. Expecting past trends to continue indefinitely isn't a very smart way of going about things.
If all Bitcoin is to you is a "store of value" than it is useless because it just based on what people think is worth. The dream here is actually using it for stuff which it can't do because its outdated *and volatile
I made the same "investing" mistakes when I was younger, and yes it is sad, but it's a dangerous world out there and so many traps you can fall into. 

It's not like they didn't have plenty of warnings about crypto and a chart that showed very clear brutal bear markets that are possible.  But people are oblivious and I have been in the past as well.
I was specific about Bitcoin. When anybody said any alts were safe to handle? The ICOs started popping up like mushrooms after a solid summer rain. It's always been a gamble. People gambled and lost, and they gambled because the greed made 'em. There is a significant difference in holding/trading Bitcoin and investing heavily in yet another <Some-shit-prefix>coin overnight.

This said, for Bitcoin more alt bleed and/or end, the better. How much funding did Bitcoin "lose" due to alts this year? I read 10B somewhere.
> here's no way in hell I'm walking away having given my money to some rich dickhead

This drives me too. Capitulation happens in your own mind first.
I think panic has already passed. Most of those who bought early and multiplied many times should have already taken profit if they want to preserve their gain. It is now just gradual bleeding due to the constant selling pressure from miners and ICOs overwhelming the [lack of] buying.
If 1 BTC = $5,000.
$1TUSD / 5000 = 0.0002.

It's the same as a 16 oz pack of strawberries cost $3.
$3 / 16 = 0.1875 per oz.


1/5000
Well you didn't post a chart, which generally helps. But he's a bit of a troll lately so he's probably just messing around. 

I think mainly you just need to post a chart for people to see it so they can agree/disagree on its formation is all
> That definitely won't change.

Famous last words.
I dont have access to that email any longer. Thus why there is limited info I can provide at this time.
Oh of course but

>this asset class would crash 80%

sure but, that wouldn’t change if paid bitcoins for it, you’d be using a deflationary currency to purchase a deflationary asset. The smartest way to get that mustang would be to lease it if you had to have a new one and make payments because your ROI would be greater investing.

Edit: unless you want a GT. They don’t lease for shit. 
Obviously, you're not a golfer.
[removed]
Post your chart homie. Based on the rest of your post I doubt you have one.
Past performance doesn't indicate future results...try again.
I know it’s hard for many people to see the bigger picture and put your money where your mind is. 

Obviously nobody knows the future, but you can make a theory based on parallels you draw with the early development of the internet and other digital, exponential technologies. 

Based on that, I build my positions. 

8 months of pain is a long time, when you’re new to this game. Otherwise it’s just the normal market cycle. 

The pain comes from the failed expectation of getting rich. Getting rich was and is never easy. And it never will be. It takes endurance, perseverance and you have to be capable of dealing with a lot of pain. 

That’s my 2cts. 
I would after riding the 2014 crash and not buying anything in 2015 or 2016.
Maybe the fact that r/Bitcoinfightclub will exist is good enough for me? 
> after all the bad news that comes out that forces it down to 1000

That's some next level TA you got there that can predict what kind of news will come out based on the charts.
Imo, and im a permabull, but I try to be reasonable...since the meme triangle broke down, I've been very bearish. I think this is going to go to 5.2k at the VERY least, and most it will drop to 4400 dollars. It will not see 3k, 2k or anything like that. Nothing that would break the logarithmic support that's existed since 2014. 

I also think the low will be found before October. 
it'll moon one day.  It's a new paradigm.  It has die-hard geniusses working on it all the time, for free.  How can that not create value?  The ICO's will all crash and burn when the devs abandon them as the price falls.



Gotta love that quick acting rational FOMO. Grats mate :) 
I mean, I see 2k BTC as very, very, very unlikely. At that point in time, anyone with simple arithmetic will look at 2014's behavior, look at this most recent behavior, and back in the truck. There would be to be some type of external event, or at least excuse, for things to fall that far. I kinda see 3200 as the lowest things could actually go without either market wide collusion or some type of external justification. 

What's more funny is those prices just happened a year ago. 
Remember first bounce off 11 from 20? It felt like nothing is happening until we were back at 14.

This is how reversal will look like.
Yeah.. weird how everyone is reacting... How did he short if it's just in coinbase?  It's just a sell and a buy... An the highlighted positions are almost the same price. 
English doesn't use periods to denote every third decimal place above 1.

You're sassy like modern teenage girls. Maybe you do need a douche.
No not necessarily. If we see a long term reversal of btc I honestly do not expect alts to recover/follow perfectly. We saw this last year already 
It's unfortunate that this stuff gets you downvotes but oh well. Lots of tribalism in crypto haha 
I feel ya, the best approach is to have a set plan to profit taking and following it like a disciple. Like "at every X% of profit I'll take Y% out." Greed is a crazy emotion and without a plan you will always get burned.

Seems like the red days take more patience with these green days holding us hostage so much 
Ya sorry. I’m honestly asking. I never short but that’s not a badge of honor, I just don’t trust myself. If I could have called anything near the top I’d have twice as much bitcoin.
Agreed. It is.

Plus nobody promised any adoption since people like to point out they "can't by shit with it". Any expectations on adoption is pure hype. This said, there are several Bitcoin ATMs in my city and there wre none last year. Anybody can buy some Bitcoin, effectively anonymously, and rent e.g. a server in China or buy a domain in Venezula. Impossible just a few years back.

Plus, Bitcoin and its volatility, if used right, can be to a huge business advantage. If you run a company accepting Bitcoin, in an uptrend you can keep received payments in Bitcoin and make gains (I myself made a lot of money this way in Q3-Q4 2017; good 300% profits this way vs. "flat" payments received), and if you're in a downtrend there are payment processors which allows you to convert the payment in real time at spot prices to whichever fiat you want, so you end up at zero difference. 

People who ever lost money on using Bitcoin in a business setting, simply mismanaged it. Completely. The only actual problem I can think of was with Bitcoin fees in December and January.
Well yeah, it is great in theory. In reality, how are they going to cash out? They can't buy anything with it. Maybe a few dozen things online accept bitcoin. 

And then you have the issue of it tanking in price lately, so you can't exactly feel super comfortable holding it for any period of time :/

and it's bitcoin's problem as long as it continues to see a lack of adoption. If btc explodes in adoption then yes it will be reddit's loss
Did you watch the videos and process the arguments? Both of them? Because likelihood of that happening would be lower than one of those 500M whales deciding to dump all their Bitcoin at 10 cents on a dollar. That would instantly crash the market too and somehow nobody does that.

It makes no sense at all for Bitmain to attack the network. It will cost them *dearly* for no effective gain. They are a *mining* company, which means *all* the money they make comes from *mining* crypto (or selling the equipment). They will not bite off the hand that feeds them.
But if consensus on the database is not reached it can be  forked and someone can create its own wikipedia site. The content is open source. What distinction is missing?

It won't go to 0.

It will go higher again, higher than the price he sold. Only valid reason to sell low in this scenario is to buy back even lower.
Please show me where capitulation was on the 2014 chart. Was it the 7 week period with one single weak weekly green candle right before the bottom? Because we're doing the same now for the second time in bitcoin's history. We've been red for literally 6 of the past 7 weeks. The past 7 weeks have been the most consistent drop in Bitcoin's history since late/early 2015. So what make you think capitulation isn't happening as we speak or hasn't happened already. I don't think this is the bottom mind you but your notion of "This isnt even maximum pain bros wait for 2k" is completely wrong imo
Some of the tech is very good, highly polished, battle tested, trustworthy. That is limited pretty much to BTC or BTC forks that utilize that base code. Nearly everything else is sloppy, and buggy, and not to be trusted. Most of the top projects are governance based...bringing the human element of trust into something that is supposed to be decentralized and trustless to function. 

Almost everything in this space is a short cut through mining debt, a mining economy, and the decentralization that only comes with community driven fair launch projects like BTC. Immutable? No? Throw it in with databases because you may as well use that and cloud computing models. 
Yup, I believe there's been studies conducted that show people are more inclined to take losses harder than gains. called loss aversion: https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Loss_aversion

No one has to think about losses in a bull market because...well...chances are you were in profit within 2 weeks of buying unless you were incredibly unlucky and bought the top of a 4 week correction. Aside from that, there really wasn't a whole lot of time to consider: "when should I cash out?" because you couldve just watched it grow and grow and grow for literally months to years. There was no planning necessary. 

People from 2015-2017 are now coming back in droves because the fear of losing money is generally more intense than the prospect of gaining it. 

It's just...like I said. No one had to fear it for the past 3 years. 
> Why did they hold all the way from December only to sell now?

Greed/euphoria/complacency.

It doesn't really matter *why* they didn't sell or have recently sold. The fact that there are still a lot of people who haven't cashed out is my only point, really. When the gains stop rolling in month after month people are gonna take profits and get out
Haha, like i totally don't know mannn
Reality is bitcoin trades speed for security. There isn't a single bank in the world that can secure my money as well as the bitcoin blockchain can. Raising the block size limit is an obvious answer to the scaling issue, but something like LN will in time outweigh any advantage a blocksize increase can offer.

As for adoption - you're right it's not a perfect scenario but adoption IS rising, the fact that your grandma has heard of bitcoin now is a meteoric rise from June 24th 2017. There are more ways to spend my bitcoin than ever before.

Since 2018 began we have had regulatory clarity from the SEC, ETF's popping up, and best of all lightning network on fucking main net. Don't be daft, that is huge.
Segwit? And the BCH reducing in fighting?
When it stops going up for 3-4 years I imagine. At that point people will give up 

After 2014 people will be even less likely to ever give up hope 
Because bitcoin has a long history of being a depreciating asset...

This isn't fucking beanie babies we're talking about lol...it's a technological breakthrough that has the potential to disrupt a lot of the financial sector.

If bitcoin can capture even 1% of global transaction volume you and me both are going to wish we bought at $20k. Whether it will/can is a whole other story, but at the moment all we can do is speculate.

$6000 is a good guess as any as the bottom.
1 day candles are all you need to get the big picture.
Fair enough, I know what you mean, just clarifying for anyone who is feeling sorry for themselves. And yes, no plan = bad decisions. I am not sure how people watch their portfolios get hammered without taking profits, but whatever I guess. 

My 1st entry for investing (not using, which was lower) was $2500. Then more at the dip to $1900. Then more at the dip to $3500. Because we were in a bull trend and I was a swing trader, no time for day trading. My plan was to ride the trend, which I did, and took some very good advice and bailed in early January. yes, I made a few bad calls along the way, but I was new and since I was not swimming upstream, it was all good. 

My plan now is to take the cash I have sitting on gemini and wait for the weekly trend to change. Then I am back in because I actually believe in bitcoin, at least with enough confidence that it will likely lead to something new in finance. But I am not an idiot and Id rather buy more at a lower price. It could do nothing, of course. 
Homie, people said that at almost every level, up and down.
He always uses that line “your obsession with me” whenever you call him out on something.  It’s his first line of defense. 
dont need any magical powers to know price is going to increase when the supply is cut in half, srsly stop acting dumb
> But yeah, we are likely going down more.....

lol yea I mean this is why I am hesitant. 

I also don't wanna be the guy that cashed out at $8k and watched it go to $20k :P A drop from here would mean my BTC holdings go sort of parabolic compared to what they have been so far. 

I'm being kinda ridiculous here, but yeah. Dush and I were talking and shorting here would be the counter trade of the year lmao

Still unsure of what I want to do. What I really want to do is finish some of my work I've been putting off since charts are so addicting lately 
Haha to be fair, I don't see *that* many traders from 2013-2014. Most of them seem to have quit. But there are definitely quite a few people still at it. And they seem pretty decent at it. Anyone who's a bad trader would've quit a long time ago I think 

The second part, yea, you know I'm not in total agreement with it :P 
I didn't say it was pessimistic. Just said that's what I read. 

Agreed, really. I know it seems like I'm a perma bear but I'm just waiting for some good news to clear up the future of bitcoin. 
No, I mean this is the kind of stuff I'm looking for. I would love to know more about it. Most people seem to have no clue on the actual legal details on financial regulations. I mean, neither do I, but I can clearly see that no institutional money is touching it. 

They say institutional money is waiting and I'm saying "okay, when?" and they say it's either already in and reaccumulating or it's on its way. 

What kind of steps and measures would have to be taken to get more authorized custodians? Is there any reason to believe that there are several more on the way? 

I thought coinbase had recently announced they were trying to comply with some more regulations to facilitate custodial issues, but I'm not sure
Kraken.
well if it doesn't come back then that means that Crypto in general will die.  Coinmarketcap will become a joke, the whole industry a scam and we can all go back to our boring lives and say Its a cool technology but just a hobby
ok bad analogy 
The price's volatility is not trusted.  But the technology is , it works has never failed or been hacked. Understanding that is the difference between holding and speculating.  Right now this technology is valued at less than 1% off all global assets
Yes Bitcoin is more than just blockchain, and the technology you speak of is blockchain technology, not bitcoin technology.  

And Betamax and Blockbuster video and Yahoo all had first mover advantage.
Yes you can have a blockchain without a currency attached.
You are an idiot. Enjoy the downvotes. 
> Adoption is actually decreasing

How dare you, sir!    
It's because that's not how markets work. Even in one this speculative
You belong there, buddy. 
Just noise. I have a number in mind. No way is this bear market over or the ‘bottom in’. I anticipated that we would maintain the 6200-6800 range for a few more days at least when we had the big drop and my orders filled in the 6200 range. 

Although I think it’s reasonable
To see a bounce into the 7000 range, I have no illusions that there isn’t further correction in our future barring some miraculous news. 
Well I just looked at Jan 16, 2015's daily....which is the bottom day of the bear market and the overall sentiment is actually neutral. Hell the sentiment is worse right now. 
No he didn't "game the system" he just gamed lots of naive investors out of their money and lost most of it. He promised to pay back the millions he owes yet hasn't done shit yet - he's just all talk. A coward who hits women and endangers his own children. 
If you idolize this tool, you're an idiot, and hopeless. The guy committed securities fraud, who knows what else, and STOLE from thousands, maybe millions, of Americans/people. He didn't "game" the system, he's just a fucking thief, who got caught, and sadly served only a minor jail sentence for the many lives he ruined.
Becoming a god? :( I’m sorry for you 
Blockchain doesn’t do anything 
> I think I'm mainly just uncomfortable holding a lot of btc, especially on some of these exchanges. I'd much rather hold it on GDAX or something, but mostly I'd rather cash some out and hold less

totally fair, holding more than you're comfortable with is a nightmare. 
Bitcoin, not other cryptos, has every reason in the world and nothing considerable in its way from going up many more times. Maybe another full 1000x. At that time it will have eaten all the value from other currencies and savings vehicles like gold and yes, then, and only then, will it have any reason to stop going up over the long term.

There are even great arguments to be made that the world will be far more wealthy by then because of all the new people recently added to the global financial system that couldn't join before bitcoin... Technically bitcoin could go up another million x if they all become productive in that society.

Of course I can't say when any of this will be, surely not before 5 or 10 more years has passed, but this is exactly the same answer I've been saying since 2012 and everything that has happened between then and now has only strengthened my resolve.  
I didn't say that's all... But it's damn well the foundation, as Austrian Economics fully describes.

[https://wiki.mises.org/wiki/Regression\_theorem](https://wiki.mises.org/wiki/Regression_theorem)

This is the basis for the whole school of economics, Menger's Regression Theorem. It explains where the origin of money comes from. Pay particular attention to the last couple of paragraphs where they say that between the two (store of value and means of payment) money had to be a store of value first.

Roger Ver always gets this backwards and it's the reason why Bitcoin's developers can't stand that guy.

Anyway, doesn't it make perfect sense to you that no one is going to take a money you offer in trade if they don't value that money yet? Why do so many people get that backwards, as if the visa or paypal network must exist first without the dollar existing to be transacted over it? Madness.
Yea, I mean there were really plenty of rational people. It's just no one wants to listen when they're that euphoric. It was hard for me even. When I got my first taste of loss by selling at breakeven after being up 200-300% by just holding, I realized I was being played for a fool and just doing everything on emotion...it really sucked. 

Felt completely helpless to the whims of the market
I hated feeling like a chump most of all. Fuck the money and fuck the losses, it was that *I fell for it.* That I made the mistake *everyone* said I'd make. It really upset me. so naturally I stubbornly refused to give in lol
I'm pretty much as sure as I've been yet that we'll see panic selling soon. Capitulation will occur and then it will bounce and people will flip the fuck out, get angry, buy the top, sell the bottom again, then quit. 

Market continues to bleed for another 3 months
That's a solid point. I guess I kind of naively assumed people had glanced at the market a couple times today. Or at least in the past couple hours I should say
No it won't. I've always had those targets. I know that seems hard for you to accept but some of us actually stick to a plan and carry it through 
[deleted]
I don't have my own unique special chart.  I have the regular chart of BTC that I have posted before.  Just pull it up and draw some very simple lines and you will see the same.
Except the last 5 times.
Thanks for the inspiration: all in on Tron at 2 cents!
Not based on the charts...based on the real world and what we've seen this year so far and also last year.  I realize you and others are in total and absolute denial about all the devastating news that has come out this year, but the market doesn't stick its head in the sand...instead it drops lower and lower...and lower.
He's saying if it gets to $1k everything will look and feel like shit. Which is true. How else would it get to $1k?

What he's saying makes perfect sense. You want to buy at $1k because it's $6k right now.

If  it were actually $1k that feeling would probably not be there (hence why it's there) 

Would you wanna buy at $5? Hell no. same thing just different degrees 
That's pretty reasonable, and I would certainly say it's a pretty good prediction. 

I think if we get to $4.5k we will see a lot of capitulation and depression but a lot of the stronger hands going long/buying
Thanks. Ya thank God I did or I would have hated myself forever.
Sure bud
I'm really literally just waiting for the panic dump. That is my signal to buy. This has been way too slow and measured. People are not expecting a big dump anymore, they are used to slow moves down. When it happens it will be very profitable, which is why I don't want to miss it :(

e: but I mean we don't *need* one 
In theory? My business pays 2/3 of its bills in crypto. Collocated servers and shit like that. As long as datacenters accept it, it's all good. And if they use payment processors turning crypto into fiat on spot price in real time, it's all the same to them. The same applies to any online resources really.

So not such "theory". I've got one provider I've been paying in Bitcoin for over 2 years now. 

It's all relative. Some fields are ready for it. Some are not. I personally can't see any purpose in e.g. paying for the proverbial coffee with it. What the fuck for? That's just hype.
Bitcoin is great for business’. It’s bad for consumers because the risk of being hacked, and the inability to chargeback. Business’ can just convert the BTC to usd as soon as they receive it and you can’t charge back. You’d have to be a fool to buy things online with anything other than a credit card. Credit cards are the worst option for businesses because the threat of chargebacks plus the transaction fees. 
This is so true, which is why I'm looking forward to what happens in Japan. They have already declared it as legal tender for settlements and major retail stores already accept it. If we were to have full adoption, it will happen in Japan first.
That's true. But that's also the opposite of what a decentralized currency is supposed to represent. We're not *supposed* to trust that Bitmain won't do that. We shouldn't trust anyone. So even though it would be unlikely for them to attack the network as this is their cash cow, a single entity that is *capable* of doing it drastically lowers the security of the network. 

Edit: Yeah, after thinking about it a bit I wouldn't hold a lot of money on BTC if there was a chance of it being attacked. Maybe I would load up a wallet for travel but the store of value aspect of bitcoin would be gone. 
Because content can be censored in the database, both by competing contributors and site admins. You cannot own your value and decide what to do with it. Third parties cannot easily build apps on wikipedia to extract those value.

If wikipedia is decentralized, you don't need to trust the admin and competing writers to show a "correct" view of content or implement the right app features. Instead, some decentralized indices to content of varies opinions will be published by decentralized nodes and apps, and only your private key can control what to do with your content.
We all hope it goes and makes a new ATH, and the odds are really good it will, but for all we know this is the last time it will ever be over $6k

Facts. 
$167, or whatever it was.
Of course there was planning necessary. A bull market is exactly when you should be thinking about losses - people become complacent at the worst moment. 
>There isn't a single bank in the world that can secure my money as well as the bitcoin blockchain can.

If you take a ridiculously narrow view that may be the case. I put more faith in the Australian banks' government-insured accounts, that can reverse fraudulent or other crime-related transactions, and help me out if I lose my PIN code or card. Plus I can actually use fiat for things, which is sometimes a handy feature of money. When I use it, it is instant and free. Call me old fashioned.

I put no faith in chinese mining cartels, capable of a 51% attack at any time. They literally build the equipment that does the all the mining. Just because cryptography is secure, the human elements involved are not. I am not enthused by losing my life's savings because I lost my key. If I enter a wrong address when making a transaction, I lose my money. The software and exchanges associated with acquiring and moving my money are repeatedly hacked.

It truly is laughable. The only person who thinks BTC is better than fiat is looking for a shortcut in life, and thinks that their rudimentary grasp of 'the tech' qualifies them for early retirement when they pawn off their internet tokens to a greater fool. Instead of the reality, that gambling in a negative sum, unregulated casino is going to have far more losers than winners. But that won't be you, will it! You got in 2015, so of course you have a rosy outlook of the ponzi scheme, you are several tiers up the pyramid.
LN is further from reality than it is close. I am long term bullish, however:

Regulation is not clear, if it were we would know what is being done about ICOs, and tether wouldn’t be a debate.

You still can’t use crypto in any reasonably commonplace ways, BTC is best in this regard. 

Ma and Pa’s fund manager still isn’t putting 1% of people’s 401k into a vanguard total crypto market index fund. 

Grandma has known about crypto in New Hampshire for years, so geriatric awareness clearly isn’t the bottleneck. 
SEGWIT is not fully implemented, and BCH probably sabotaged the bullrun prematurely. 

The truth is that the only reason BCH is even around is corporate interest in ASIC product performance, so I don’t see any of that development as a positive. 
3.3-7 transactions a second = technological breakthrough
Did you sell any above like $10k? You don't have to tell me, just curious really
The supply is not cut in half when there is a halving.  The supply never decreases.  If you are that clueless about the most basic fundamentals of Bitcoin, then can't help you.

And yes the price will increase from $1200 to $1800 from the next halving..congratulations.
Hey man, your call and I totally get it. But I literally typed this note >5 times to YRUAFRAID and he was a millionaire at one point. Now, he is just young with more cash than he should have =)

But trust yourself, you are a smart guy. Just remember you are not the smartest guy in the market. 
Nothing stopping you from re shorting later, it's not like you wont have the opportunity to do so when we inevitably hit resistance, go sideways for days, have no volume and we start another dumping cycle. If I were you and wanted to be careful, I'd wait till the monthly close though or the first week of July when we have our 6th of the month meme day again. 
I don't think you're a permabear from the conversations we've had. I think you're rational. You're not a exuberant 1-3k bitcoin Megatron bear but you're no moon boy either. 
Yes there are actual several companies that are trying to become custodians. The most interesting is Centra Partners is partnering with Bitgo.  Centra is a big trust that holds paper for some of the largest institutional investories in the country.  Think of things like state pension plans and bitgo is obviously a technology company that actually works with Kingdom trust and built their system from my understanding.

So basically Centra is going to use their name and reputation to bring in the big institutional money and Bitgo will use their technical expertise.

Also yes, coinbase is working on a solution and so are the Winklevoss brothers.  Centra is the big player in the room though and if they get fully in the game think of that 1% BTC hedge coming to fruition.

Edit:  Also to answer your comment about if Institutional investors are already in, no they aren't people confuse institutional investors with hedge funds and investment banks.  Players like GS, AQ capital, Man group, etc are probably already in the game but they don't pump sectors with capital for long term investment.  They do the same shit we do but on a bigger scale, they use private desks to trade like they are on some black site Bitmex.
Well, maybe. What if the fair price of a bitcoin ends up being somewhere around $8000. Just like gold has been around $1250/ounce for awhile? Does that mean it failed?

I mean that sounds weird to say now, but many of the OGs thought $10k was the moon.

BTW, I think it will be back, but just playing devils advocate. 
> Understanding that is the difference between holding and speculating. 

Why would understanding that prevent you from generating trading profits?   Of course that is nonsense.
You make no sense, if Bitcoin is more than just blockchain technology and I said that, then how am I talking about just blockchain?  Again Bitcoin is a confluence of technologies more than just blockchain ie asymmetric cryptography, peer-to-peer networking, and POW.  This is the first time that all four of these technologies came together.  Most other cryptos skimp in one part or another.  You can't just say crypto is blockchain because without the other technologies removes the trustless and censorship resistant nature of it.

Ok. Let's hear it then. Tell me how. 
Very non excellent.  I have reported your post to the moderators.
You're right... To go below $1k it would have to lose 83% of its current value. It's lost 70% since December... but surely an 83% drop could never happen.
[deleted]
Why would you tell us or anyone that your orders filled at $6200 then tell us that you believe that there is going to be further corrections in the future? Corrections that would put the price below what you bought at? It doesn't make sense.
Ok, I'm not saying he is an upstanding citizen or he has good character. But anyone who goes from rags to riches and makes $100 million + is a legend in my book, regardless of the means
I am more comfortable holding BTC than USD even if the price is going down. I have zero trust in any bank or entity that will hold money for me, and I will not put hundreds of thousands into my mattress.
Yes that is the worst feeling...when you are helpless.  I felt that way earlier this year when the price was dropping, because I wasn't comfortable hedge shorting the amount of my stack.   I had never had a short position nearly that large.  

So I just couldn't do it, and ended up losing a lot.  Then I did finally open a huge short near $10K....and it was no big deal.  I realized how easy it would have been months earlier, which makes me feel even worse.

Just have to attribute that to lack of intelligence and temporary insanity and a defective brain...there is no other excuse.

But that same brain allowed me to build up a relatively large amount of money from $0.0 in 2013, so I have to give myself some credit.

I think the worst part is feeling of helplessness, i.e. "...but it was supposed to be different!". If you have a strategy, or even if you make a sane decision, i.e. "fuck it, I am going to zero with it" and you actually hit zero on your own terms, that's another story completely. That's death on your own terms. But falling for a market trick, giving into panic, being hyped either way, being talked into desperation? I refuse.

Plus, an expert is somebody who simply made all possible mistakes in any particular field. If you fuck up, and don't stay tall, see the problem and try again, how are you supposed to learn? Nothing made me learn more about markets, TA and gauging sentiment as the initial losses which I incurred.
you must have missed the IH&S meme-athon of 2018
I find it interesting that some of you are so oblivious to how much you can change your mind as the market conditions change...and as the world changes around the market.   

It is more accurate and honest to say "My current plan is to buy at 4k, 3k, etc".  Not "I'm sure I'm going to buy at those numbers"...that is just nonsense.
Good one, bro!
 Just some simple lines and stuff huh? Sounds technical. Was the school long? Good grief, sit down son.
Then show us what lines you've drawn.
Drivel
Count me in.
What's if this bounce is just some big elaborate  fake out bulltrap that's actually a bear trap trying to get people to reshort?

A small part of me (like 2%) always considers these weird possibilities ever since the barts started happening, where the improbable becomes probable 

Not talking about long term of course though
What happens if you accept bitcoin as a business for 6 months when it is in an uptrend and then it crashes 30% overnight and doesn't recover anywhere near that price?
Right so why would I want to use it as a consumer :P As much as businesses love to do things that benefit themselves, most things are directed towards simplifying and facilitating a good consumer experience
You're right, of course, ideologically. But at the same time I don't think there is an actual threat there, especially as during the downtrend which we are facing now, it is more likely than not that Bitmain will keep on mining whatever the price (vs e.g. western competition which will start to drop off). It's China after all. Half the province they are based in is deep in their pockets expecting being nicely greased every month. So in the end and in practice they don't work against us, but for us, to a high degree.

Plus it's enough for a next gen chip hitting the market to invalidate their lead. The rat race there is still very much on.
Thanks, I am genuinely asking to get a sense how people percieve things in this space. From the above coment I would assume you dont consider EOS/ETH to be decentralized projects since their admins censored the content on its database?
That's not how it works. 
A "narrow view" is thinking that banks can't coexist with bitcoin, when it's in fact the opposite. The vast majority of people are not willing to or tech savvy enough to use bitcoin as intended, sad but true.

I'm not ignorant enough to think fiat will go away (ever), but I do think there are use cases for bitcoin transactions on lets say the internet. I think we are still in the infancy of this technology and there are a lot of things that can be done better for adoption. It's an entirely new asset class that will eventually find its true value over time, and from my point of view we have a long way up.
Buddy...who are you lying too? lol

https://lnmainnet.gaben.win/

https://www.cnbc.com/2018/06/14/bitcoin-and-ethereum-are-not-securities-but-some-cryptocurrencies-may-be-sec-official-says.html

https://blog.coinbase.com/announcing-coinbase-index-fund-3925fbf548db
Why is nobody investing in the NYSE stock, they are running millions of transactions per second and billions of USD per day in volume.
Also they don't had to do an ICO as far as I know : )
I think I've mentioned it before here, so no big deal. I listened to a very specific podcast on January 7, and sold everything over a few days. Highest btc was 16.2 and eth at $1250.

 The podcast compared this market to dotcom and it clicked for me, having been through it I guess. So sold out of btc, eth, xlm, neo, drgn, sold it all.

Now if I had shorted there, wooo, baby. 
You know what i mean u little troll
>  Just remember you are not the smartest guy in the market.

\>:O

Nah, you're totally right. Thanks man. Keep me level headed. 

The primay reason I'm hesitant is with BTC and in general with trending markets- the end of the trend is the strongest part. It's where a *lot* of the profits are- you can see this with blow-off tops and panic dump capitulation wicks. 

Perhaps I am being greedy trying to get the exact bottom- but I just don't think that was it yet. Well, it's not that I want to close the exact bottom, it's that I want to *see* the bottom. The panic/capitulation. And then I don't mind closing above it. But that could have been it, who knows. 

These buy walls starting to pile up down to $6k have me a little skeptical - I am thinking someone's trying to sell a bit more above $6200 before letting it go down again. 
I just don't want to close at the top of a fakeout and then see it tank again. I think this is going to move faster than people expect, actually. The interest right now is kind of booming- volatility should be up for the next week or so. 
Haha thanks mate. I try not to be exuberantly bearish - I was for a little bit a few months ago. I've toned it down a bit now mainly because I know that I can't predict the future and the future is definitely uncertain. One step at a time
Gold is at 1250 an ounce but has also been almost completely mined and  adopted by society/the world for over 5000 years.  Bitcoin is a baby compared to that
He's a troll, man.
>  Most other cryptos skimp in one part or another. 

Most cryptos add something even more valuable to the mix, like smart contracts and privacy/anonymity, etc.  Of course most cryptos are lame, because there are thousands of them now.  But there are scores that are technologically superior to BTC.
No, I would rather you stay clueless and ignorant. 
He literally called me slow. Grow up.
Nope. Not an 83% drop after a 70% drop. That would be a drop off over 95% from ATH. Not gonna happen any time soon. 
Agreed. The daily RSI is in a historical bounce range. But I am feeling less confident about the market at the moment after being so far off on my target with the drop. Bitcoin always finds a way to bring the Pain.
Buy low sell high. 
> because I wasn't comfortable hedge shorting the amount of my stack. 

I still talk to DushmanKush a lot and he was holding like 15 btc and 30 eth or something at around $8-9k. He'd been holding the btc since like 2014 

I asked him "if you're so bearish why are you just holding? You can short 2-3 btc all you want. You're still extremely net long" and he sorta kinda agreed with me.

Then I asked him "If someone forcefully cashed out all your crypto holdings, gave you the money, put it in your hands and said 'here you go.' would you walk straight to the bank, wire it all to GDAX and put it back in? Because that's what you're doing every second you're holding."

and he said no, then he sold like 80% of it at $8.5k. :)

It's hard to see all of that money you guys hold as something you need to touch and move around. I can't imagine how hard it is to buy/sell with that much.

I understand why people kinda "freeze" upon thinking about selling. For some long term holders, it's so much money to them that it's not even real, so they have trouble understanding how to even deal with it. For a lot of people all it takes is converting those holdings to cash. And then suddenly it's all real 
Was it calling attention to what a unreliable pattern it has been this year? 

Yeah....I get that.....sadly
You need to read again..

I actually said I AM buying at 5,4,3 and 2.

Not..

Im sure I'm going to buy.


I trade bitcoin daily, it's actually my job. I'm merely saying that I will be buying in at these levels staggered. Simple as that. Nothing to do with changing minds as you put it.

If the bottom is 5,then great.. I got some.more bitcoin at 5.
If it's 4 then great I got some at 5 and 4.. 
Same for 3 and 2k.

It's a simple plan that for some reason you find ridiculous 
Simple lines have served me very well the past few years.
I've posted the chart before and not really in the mood to do it right now...time is money.
You mean what if this goes down, sets a higher low and traps even *more* bottom shorters/sellers?

Like April? $6450 then $7200 then $6800 then $8100
Oh no, you don't keep it that long. A sound strategy has been this: 

* Set a target, e.g. 10% gain. That's a 10% bonus on all of your services. Greedier you get, more risky it becomes. Or cash out at X day each month, so you make it cyclical at your end regardless of market action.
* Use tight stop losses and move the step every X hundred up. In bull market this isn't hard.
* Follow common sense. If you accept e.g. 1000 bucks in one month and it doubled within another month (e.g. September 2017 vs November 2017), so you have 2000, even if it drops 30% you're still ahead 400 bucks. That's 40% gain.
I don’t know why you would, like I said you’d have to be an idiot, but there’s immense benefit for the receiver of the bitcoin. In theory, since there’s a greater benefit for the business because the risk of chargeback is gone, they could offer a discount for payment via BTC. 
I don't think ETH can censor things. They did a hardfork for DAO, and those who disagreed with the consensus forked to ETC.

For EOS, one can argue that that as long as its users agrees with their way of governance, it is still a consensus. It is up to EOS to implement a way of governance that it actually provides value above centralized database for some target user group, otherwise no one is gonna use it. Like other platforms, EOS is exploring it own way and will surely adjust in time if it doesn't work.
>The vast majority of people are not willing to or tech savvy enough to use bitcoin as intended, sad but true.

Or they prefer to make instant, free transactions with fiat. Or they have no choice but to use their super-convenient fiat, because merchants don't accept BTC. Tech savvy--my sides! No one knows how financial tech works now, but it doesn't stop them from using fiat gladly. 

If you think the value of BTC is going to keep appreciating, why would you spend it?

>but I do think there are use cases for bitcoin transactions on lets say the internet.

Something that fiat banks couldn't possibly achieve with any changes in policy or back-end technology? Without burning a nation's worth of electricity to do so?

>I think we are still in the infancy of this technology and there are a lot of things that can be done better for adoption. It's an entirely new asset class

10 years, nothing but farts. dApps? LOL! Adoption is always 'around the corner', but always someone else's responsibility. Nothing about BTC compels a consumer to use it over fiat. It will exists as long as people think they can get rich by tricking someone else to buy it from them at a premium.
Did you even read the article that you linked? The headline says all you need to know about why I phrased my sentence the way I did: “Bitcoin and ether are not securities, but some initial coin offerings may be, SEC official says”

An informal comment about ETH not being a security does nothing to further the discussion about how ICOs will be handled. There is an international community trying to figure out how to deal with potential regulatory arbitrage and the market response between a slap on the wrist vs restricting access to US customers or forced delistings, and what that criteria would be, are all incredibly important points that are not clear.

You didn’t even mention WHY the ETH comment is significant: I would actually love to see if you have the perception to read between the lines and tell me what the implication and precedent is?

Furthermore, if you can’t see that an in-house coinbase crypto “index fund” is nowhere near what the effect of a large market fund manager putting just 1% of a 100 trillion market into a total market index fund would be then you need to revisit this concept. 
Holy shit that's awesome. I'm really glad to hear that. 
I know what you said..and not interested in trying to read that twisted, confused mind of yours.
And sorry, am reading When Genius Fails right now, probably skewing my perspective.... 
You'll be ok man, just establish a plan and stick with it. 
Interest is booming? Among who? Fewer and fewer hands. 
My position used to be uncertain, but bull biased. We seemed to have a lot of support, making higher lows (something not seen in 2014) and we were in a meme triangle that COULD have broken up. Once it broke down, my position has become the following:

- Out of the last 7 weekly candles, 6 were red. We are due for a breather. If we get another red weekly candle, then this is the most consistently bearish weekly period in bitcoin's history. The past 7 weeks have been absolutely brutal. This has been a capitulation. Maybe not the final capitulation, but a hard capitulation no less.

- I think the low of the market will be found before late September 2018.

- I think the low will be in the 4500-5200 range. 

- I will likely sell a decent amount of my holdings if BTC goes above 7k again in the short term. Once the meme triangle broke down, it dumped to <7k very quickly and stayed down. Prices I refused to sell at.
I don't disagree.

I always try to devils advocate my presumptions though.
Thanks I appreciate that, but it doesn't really matter.  Trolls don't provoke generally for those they are directly talking to but for the lurkers.  I am answering him on in that it's good to remind everyone else that is lurking or a noob that BTC is more than what he is saying.  It's also a common refrain that everyone in the MSM spews and I like to refute it occasionally.  
I said you were slow there, which you were.  I am slow with some things, sometimes as well.   

The point is that the above post pointed out all the benefits of Bitcoin and arbitrarily assigned a value above $20K for that.   I could pick any other price, arbitrarily, and would be just about as valid.
Yes it didn't seem real and I didn't have the option to convert it to cash (long story) or I probably would have least done that with most of it.  Plus I didn't want to convert all my alts to BTC, because I had grown attached to them and took me so long to buy all of them and figure out all the wallet software, etc, etc.  

My net worth doubled in one month last Nov and I just didn't have the ability to lock in all those sick profits.  It was too much to process.

Anyway I am still doing ok and at least shorted a good bit the last couple of months, so that cut the losses somewhat...still a shitshow, but I live to fight another day.  It's still one of the biggest fuckups of my life, but got to let it go and focus on the future....which I apparently am no doing well, because I still talk about this and obsess about it too much.
"I AM buying" = "I'm sure I'm going to buy".  It is the English language.
Were they white in color and from south of the border?
You've posted 3 external links in the past week, and none of them were a chart.  So you're just wasting *everyone else's* time by posting a load of crap with nothing to back it up.
Oh well when you put it like that hahaha yeah
This is a bitcoin trading subreddit, and as far as I know ICO's don't have anything to do with bitcoin.
Thanks man. I am glad you are making a killing now =) 
Rude
Huh interesting. Never heard of Meriwether. So he basically thought he had it all figured out and went from mega rich to a nobody?


Interest in selling is booming, my man. Look at the uptick in comments on these threads. People are coming back in droves to panic sell. That's why volatility is up and the downwards trend is accelerating. 

People probably set alarms for sub $6k. Now it's sub $6k and they're all back- can't ignore the charts anymore. 
Google worldwide search trends did actually show a bit of an uptick the past few days too.  


If you break the search trend down by region, alot of south America seems to be picking up interest atm too.
> My position used to be uncertain, but bull biased. 

> I will likely sell a decent amount of my holdings if BTC goes above 7k again in the short term.

As far as I'm aware, you hold a decent amount of BTC as well.

I know that it's somewhat anecdotal, but this is one of the primary reasons I'm not expecting a particularly large bull run any time soon. I think people like you have learned by now that the bounces/run-ups will not be sustainable and you will get out at the earliest sign of an overexuberant run up.


We definitely are due for a breather- it's just this sell-off has been so slow and measured that the weekly candles  being red don't indicate relief simply because of how many there are. There was a period of literally 11 out of 13 weekly candles being red in 2014 (the left arrow):

https://www.tradingview.com/x/hzKgTYjg/

Not to mention I am noticing a disillusionment with the alt community as well- most of those are on-ramped from btc, and when they cash out, they willl cash out of btc immediately as well. That is a large part of this aggressive sell-off- bitcoin has retained a lot of value from those alts. 
absolutely that's how you got to play this game.  Everyday you have to research and find info to reinforce your holder thesis 
I said you were an idiot there, which you were. I am an idiot with some things, sometimes as well.
I can't blame anyone for making mistakes in this market in the past 9 months. Shit has just been absolutely bonkers. The sheer euphoria from October to January was absolutely insane. I can only imagine the strongest and smartest of hands actually cashed out $15k+

Hope you're doing ok though mate. I'm glad you finally decided to short this thingy. I think you've been hedged since like what $8-9k? It's not a bad cash out point. A lot of people got rekt on this last downtrend 
I feel you bro. Expensive lesson that had to be learnt. Wiser now tho - few scars & bruises but keen take that knowledge and turn it green. Been a good month. Onwards..
My God you can't be serious. They are not the same at all. Are you even an English speaker? I hope not for your sake.

Not wasting time on this anymore. Enjoy your day, think about getting an English tutor 
Not my problem if you don't know how to draw trend lines
lol no I was asking if that's what you meant 
They do: imagine what would happen if binance was forced to either restrict access to US customers or delist securities alts? Do you think that would have an effect on the BTC price or is your head in the sand?

Add tether to that concern: it could be 100% above board, which would raise confidence in the legitimacy of ATH, or it could be found to be some book cooking nonsense put together by the incestuous BFX group and call into question current and past speculative valuation. Furthermore, the flight from tether would create massive short and long term price effects.
Its a good read, give it a try if you have read the big short already.

Basically, every smart strategy can work, trend or not, until it doesn't. The smarter the guy, the longer it can take to realize it isn't. 
I'll give you that!
That is like saying rubberneckers on the side of the road are somehow good for the victims of the car crash. 

Forget search terms: we are in a major downtrend since ATH and we could reach ~2500 and still be in an all-time uptrend. Even the people within this space don’t understand blockchain, or we wouldn’t be led by governance based projects like EOS.
Yeah because of this very reason I don't really think we will have a large bull run this year though I do believe we will touch 10k again. I'm mostly in my long term alt positions currently and hold a very insignificant amount of btc. I still think we will have a small alt season this year once btc is done its corrections which I think will occur before September 
I definitely have been shorting pretty hard since $10K.  That's where I opened that biggest short of my life, although I was shaken out of some of it before the big drop.  I still managed to screw up some of it, trying to catch bounces, but definitely taking less damage than I did earlier in the year.
They are both absurd statements, because it's impossible to be sure of anything in the future, but they are basically equivalent in their absurdity.
I know very well how to draw trend lines.  I just don't know what trend lines *you're* drawing.  If any, indeed.
Yes lol, I thought I came up with a scenario we hadn't seen before, but as you have pointed out, we have seen before lol
Lets just assume those are the only two options binance has (it's not).

Wouldn't people be selling their ICO's back into ether/btc? Creating massive buying pressure? Fuck if I know let me get my crystal ball I guess
that's why I'm looking out for a big ass dump here soon. People are watching the charts again- more prone to panic selling. 
I didn’t actually say it was good- it’s just a fact
Dear oh dear. I'm buying at those prices. Sorry that offends you for some unknown reason. I suggest you lighten up and take a walk somewhere in the fresh air. 
Hahahaha yeah. Would just laugh if it happened again. I don't think it will tbh, I think market environment has changed. Notice the spike in interest + volatility lately. People are interested in getting out, some are interested in buying. I think we really have one high volume movement downwards left, some craziness, then back to low volume sideways/up
I don’t know what would happen, that would be a great discussion, but the point is that potential sudden cutoff of a third of the market, or delisting, would have all sorts of big implications. 

People might not even have a chance to sell their ICOs for anywhere near what they paid depending on the press release and implementation. 

Even if none of that happened, let’s just say ICOs are subject to typical IPO standards: when judged by the standards of a tradition market where production of value is crucial, and speculation is no longer magic, you would see a precipitous drop in most projects, particularly utility tokens.

So would people buy BTC? Leave the space because the dream of 1000x returns is only distant legend? 


I doubt you will, or at least that probability is much less than 100% that you will.  Sorry that offends you for some unknown reason.
I mean you're not wrong it wouldn't be fun times, I guess I just see binance taking a different route and implementing KYC and complying with the SEC - thus legitimizing crypto even further (which is desperately needed)
Well I've already bought at 7k and 6k so I have no idea how the prospect of me buying bitcoin at predetermined levels is so difficult for you 
Sure binance could do KYC, but that doesn’t matter if you are listing unregistered securities. You either delist them, or cut off customers from regions where they are regulated.
> I have no idea how the prospect of me buying bitcoin at predetermined levels is so difficult for you

Your reading comprehension is very poor.
Your comprehension of basic concepts is very poor. 
